Barney: Training for a marathon.
Barney: You don't need to train for a marathon. You just run it.
Barney: Not at all. I could run a marathon anytime I wanted to.
Barney: Absolutely.
Barney: Here's how you run a marathon. Step one, you start running. There is no step two.
Barney: 50 bucks? Gee, Grandpa, if I win, maybe I can buy myself an ice-cream cone. Make it $10,000.
Barney: Fine, then no bet. Okay, $50.
Barney: What up, non-finishers?
Barney: Right? Yeah, my time would have been like a half an hour better, but I met this total hottie on Mile Seven. We took a quick detour and had our own mini marathon behind a Nathan's. I won.
Barney: So where's my 50 bucks?
Barney: Huh? Can't believe they haven't made a coin for this yet. Anyway, I'm heading home. Might go hit the gym.
Barney: Wow. You know I really should check out this "subway." Heard so much about it. Wow. Look at me. Slumming it. Maybe I'll make a weekend out of it and I'll call my bridge and tunnel girl tonight.
Barney: No.
Barney: Ted, it's Barney. Listen to me, I need you to come and pick me up on the subway.
Barney: I was sitting here, totally minding my own business.
Barney: Finisher. Yeah, you know what I mean.
Barney: My legs don't work. I've already ridden the subway twice end to end. I've seen where it turns around. Ted, you don't ever want to see where the subway turns around.
Barney: Listen to me, Ted. I'm going to lose you any second. I'm on the fourth car of the six train heading south from Pelham Bay Park in the Bronx. Meet me at the 86th Street station in, like, half an hour?
Barney: Ted, Ted.
Barney: I'm sorry. I can't.
Barney: Ted!
Barney: No...!
Barney:  I can't go. I've got this thing.
Barney: A pen1s.
Barney: Ted, why are you dating our arch-enemy?! I mean, Wile E. Coyote wasn't trying to sleep with the Roadrunner.
Barney: Quit GNB?! Why?
Barney: Saving chicken bones and an old boot to make hobo soup? Marshall, you can't pay your mortgage with Hacky Sacks and good vibes.
Barney: Well, then, you're not going to be able to pay for that trip to Spain that you've been planning. (Barney snickers) Say good-bye to riding around in gondolas, and eating bratwurst and seeing the pyramids.
Barney: Well, I know that a trip there costs some serious lira.
Barney: Where? I want his autograph!
Barney: Yeah. I've been there, too. Every time I'm done having s*x with a woman, at first,I never want to see her again. No, that's pretty much it.
Barney: No! You can't quit tomorrow! The lady with the big nipples is coming back to give another sexual harassment seminar, and I bribed one of the maintenance guys to keep the room at a brisk 55 degrees!
Barney: It starts with an... "L?"
Barney: And I said my name was...?
Barney: It's always the one in the turtleneck, Ted. And no, I don't want to play. Stupid Marshall-... ruined everything.
Barney: I'm sorry. Sorry. Something Hershel said at work today.
Barney: What, don't you guys know Hershel? Didn't I tell you? Oh, he's the new lawyer who replaced Marshall at GNB. He is so awesome and funny and tall... taller than Marshall... and he knows way more laws.
Barney: There's no Hershel! I was just saying that to make you jealous! Why do you insist we play these games?
Barney: Just come back to GNB already!
Barney: That's how I'm gonna use mine.
Barney: Care? I don't care. I'm like, whatever. Marshall who? He's stupid. Hershel's way better.
Barney: Oh! Ugh! You are worse than my shrink. "Barney, we have to talk about your father." "Barney, I'm not going to teach you how to hypnotize people. You'll only use it for evil." "Barney, I am not going to conduct a couples session "between you and this woman. She's obviously a prostitute." I don't need this!
Barney: Hey, Marshall, it's me. Listen, I know I've been kind of a jerk about your leaving GNB. I just wanted to call and say I'm sorry. No apologies necessary. We're good. Good. Um, hey, any chance you might maybe... I don't know... if you're not busy, uh, want to have lunch today?
Barney: Oh, that's cool. No biggie. Another time.
Barney: How long have you been there?
Barney: Oh, no, I'm fine.
Barney:Sure. Hey, are you okay if I invite Marshall to join us?
Barney:Right. So, um... Chinese?
Barney: There's nothing to talk about.
Barney: I don't want to talk about it, okay?
Barney: Because I don't. And why am I explaining this to you? You're the most secretive person I know. You never tell anybody anything.
Barney: That's... the most harrowing story I've ever heard. Is it true?
Barney: Fine! The reason I'm upset about Marshall leaving GNB is... is...the meatball sub.
Barney: It all started months ago in the GNB commissary. It was Meatball Sub Day.
Barney: Oh, how I used to love Meatball Sub Day. And then, the most humiliating moment of my life.
Barney: I plotted my revenge for weeks. But nothing seemed right. Then it hit me. The answer was so elegant and simple-- an exploding meatball sub. For months, I experimented. More... marinara sauce. Finally, the sub was perfected. The plan was in place. The snare was baited. And then...
Barney:...he quit, Robin, he quit! It's Meatball Sub Day today, which is why I wanted Marshall to come over and have lunch. But no. All that work wasted. (quiet sobbing) You want to make God laugh, tell him your plans, right?
Barney: Eat this meatball sub.
Barney: I don't have much time!
Barney: Well played, sir.
Barney: I would say even more. You, sir, did think Stella. "Ted looked so cool now. Do I chose the wrong? "Wait a week. The bush on the back. And belly. Have you felt that? There was an earthquake "Tope-there".
Barney: It's a very big check. IF big, that if you sleep with, you would not tell your friends.
Barney: A very big check!
Barney: Okay. Today, I had a $ 200 fine for speeding.
Barney: You can not blow a fine.
Barney: I would have done that too, if I went to a barbecue.Slim, I went there.
Barney: You think I can not blow a fine? You think I can not blow my fine? I am Barney Stinson, master of manipulation. If I managed to make me pay for a stripper to dance, I can blow a fine. Challenge accepted... wait.
Barney: Let's go.
Barney: Of course, officer. On.
Barney: So, what's good?
Barney: $ 375! And he kept the gift certificate. Emilio and I'll call him tell him to shorten the crotch.
Barney: Anything, Robin. Like you've already blown a fine.
Barney: Excuse me. I left something in New Jersey.
Barney: Come on. Mr. Officer, please, my wife is having a baby! She just lost the waters!
Barney: She took the other car. It's Italian leather, so... I... go...
Barney: OK, you can do it. You can do it! You can do it.
Barney: Licensing and registration papers.
Barney: You must have a permit to be as pretty. And this body? I imagine that something as explosive must be registered with the authorities.
Barney: Why, am I under arrest?
Barney: When will you understand the difference between my life and a porno is that my life has better lighting.
Barney: I'm not lying! I swear on my mother. I swear Goliath National Bank. I swear on my costumes. I... do... mens... not.
Barney: It's me! This is Barney. With the help! I have big problems!
Barney: I imagine that something as explosive must be registered with the authorities.
Barney: Why, am I under arrest?
Barney: No, my wife will give birth! I have a sausage with your name!
Barney: You must come to Brazzaville, in New Jersey to take me out.
Barney: Come on. You have no idea what kind of criminals with whom they put me.
Barney: Save me, Ted!
Barney: By the way, how's the girl you see? This superb French with huge tits?
Barney: The highest good of all those with whom you're never out! Ever!
Barney: She was found two days later, in the directory. I've never put my name in my underwear.
Barney: You're back!
Barney: It's good to see you, Lily.
Barney: I'm in a world of amnesia with lots of pictures of my son and an alliance. I will find the best woman / woman and we will...
Barney: Well, I love commitment. I wish i could marry commitment.
Barney: I met a girl last night.
Barney: So perky and full of life and not at all fake.
Barney: C! And that wasn't spanish, that was cup size! What up!
Barney: Mmmm...
Barney: All right, Ted. Imagine the heads of two Irish babies. Let's call them...(bbllluuuuu) and (bllluuu)
Barney: I see. Between you and me, i'm also interested in this apartment. So is there any way i could come back later and check it out while you'rte showing them other places?
Barney: Ted, do you think i have no morals whatsoever? I simply want to fool a girl into thinking this is my apartment so i can nail her once and never have to see her again. I'm not a monster!
Barney: Welcome to my humble abode.
Barney: Ah, make yourself at home. Please get comfortable. If you see something you like, just take it.
Barney: Uh... That's my parents.
Barney: Yeah! They're a chinese couple that wanted a white baby, it works both ways. Cookie?
Barney: You got me. My sisters taught me how to bake and how to listen.
Barney: I'm glad. Sometimes, i don't. A place like this really needs a lady of the house. I know it's early to be thinking of you as... Oh, God, i'm freaking you out, aren't I? It's just you make me feel so safe. I didn't..."
Barney: Yeah, we spent the night.
Barney: Hey, look at you.
Barney: The only thing missing from that bathrobe are your initials.
Barney: Only if she sleeps in the bed and i sleep on the couch.
Barney: I love you. There, i said it and i'm not taking it back.
Barney: How about you get in the shower, and i will make us some waffles.
Barney: Works at every time.
Barney: Yup!
Barney: Yeah. That little guy saw some stuff i'm not proud of.
Barney: If you wwant to get to the bottom of this, you're gonna need a stronger stomach than that, doll face.
Barney: What do you think, make obsess?
Barney: I'll just, uh, take this down to the lab. (He wants to take the wonderbra. Robin grab it from him).
Barney: Ah!
Barney: Robin, just...
Barney: Robin, just...
Barney: They can't... get divorced.
Barney: The world needs Marshall and Lily... together... I'm not crying, there's something in my eye.
Barney: Oh, thank God. Cause, i mean, if you did then who'd be the lame married couple i get to make fun of? Like 'Hey Marshall, you're married mrs right, you just didn't know her first name was Always.' That stuff is cold.
Barney: Oh, no, what'd you fight about? (He puts his headphones on).
Barney: Yeah, you did.
Barney: Oh, dude, if they're selling condos, you got to get me in. And don't give me the shaft.
Barney: Had to.
Barney: Oh, God! This gonna be another one of your weird all-guy parties?
Barney: Well, love to join you at that one. But I got tickets to Foxy Boxing.
Barney: Dude, lots of chicks think architects are hot. Think about it, you create something out of nothing. You're like God. There's nobody hotter than God.
Barney: I'm telling you, you should use the architect angle with the ladies.
Barney: That's 'cause you're always like... (Dully) "Ted Mosby, architect". If it were me, I'd be like... (Confidently) "Ted Mosby, architect". Anything sounds impressive when it's said with the right attitude.
Barney: Wait up, I'll leave with you guys. "Ted Mosby, architect". Trust me.
Barney: Ted? He's at work.
Barney: Awesome story. As per usual.
Barney: Yeah, stay (mouthing "go")
Barney: Yeah, you did.
Barney: Ted Mosby... Architect.
Barney: But none of that acclaim means anything compared to the joy of seeing the sun rise over your first building.
Barney: Galloping.
Barney: It is tonight.
Barney: And that led to a couple of hours that I cannot, as a gentleman, divulge to you. We did it right here, and here and here.
Barney: I've had some recent bad press on the World Wide Web. So I'm taking a T.O. on the whole "using my real name" thing.
Barney: And thus ended this chapter of, "Let's pour our hearts out in the bedroom of Barney's one-night stand." Come on, let's go before she gets out of the shower.
Barney: I'll have you know I composed a lovely form letter for use in just such an occasion. Just fill out her name and then... Something with a "A." A... A... I'll just put "resident." Go, go, go, go.
Barney: I want to press it!
Barney: I want to press it!
Barney: You know what might... make you feel better, buddy?
Barney: I want to press the button!
Barney: Yeah. Getting to stand next to me while I press the button. That is going to be legend... wait for it...dary adjacent. Legendary adjacent!
Barney: Are these people Irish, Polish, blondes... what are we dealing with here?
Barney: Not possible. Your building is new. And I have one rule: New is always better.
Barney: Ah, but "new is always better" is my oldest rule, which makes it the best.
Barney: Oh, hey, buddy.
Barney: I wonder what end it's coming out of Lily right now.
Barney: I bet it's both. Hey, speaking of explosions... enough already, Ted! That button's mine!
Barney: I got you this job, so I... Say what?
Barney: You...
Barney: Who's that from?
Barney: Why would Ted get back together with Zoey? He's doing great.
Barney: No, I refuse to believe that Ted is getting back with Zoey because of lightbulbs.
Barney: Ted, I only have one rule.
Barney: We've got to stop Ted. Where are they meeting?
Barney: Well, that's good. All we have to do is think back to the time Ted told us about his first date with Zoey.
Barney: You weren't listening either?
Barney: That's the intersection.
Barney: Way ahead of ya.
Barney: I know. They're a total train wreck.
Barney: Yeah, almost as bad as us.
Barney: What about me? I got so fat, at the end of a date, you'd unhook my bra.
Barney: Thank God we're not sentimental saps who panic and get back together. Seriously, why would people do that?
Barney: What do you mean?
Barney: Yeah... he did. And... she loved him, too. Didn't she?
Barney: Maybe this isn't the intersection.
Barney: She's alone! There's still time! But where the hell is Ted?
Barney: Brilliant. But wait, he had a huge head start on us. There's no way he's still in there unless he spent a half an hour picking out the perfect orchid.
Barney: But... it's a mistake.
Barney: He is.
Barney: Yeah. You earned it.
Barney: Always.
Barney: It's just a button. Can we talk about something else, please? (Barney sees Norah, Robin says something to him that we can"t hear, then Barney walks up to Norah) Norah.
Barney: How you been?
Barney: Look, I don't know why you would possibly say yes to this, but would you want to grab a cup of coffee with me sometime? 20 minutes. I was such a jerk to you. You can spend the entire time calling me every dirty name in the book.
Barney: I'll call you. You look beautiful, by the way. And here I thought it was too late for sundresses.
Barney: Challenge accepted.
Barney: What do you think of this tie?
Barney: What are you doing?
Barney: It's time to talk?
Barney: What do you think of Robin?
Barney: Awesome. Say that is a tailor and you have found a nice suit. A nice suit Canada. Superb chest. You try it, but it does not suit you perfectly. So you return it. Then I try it. I'm not too keen... a suit that you have caught the eye, but at the same time, I love this costume.
Barney: But Ted, remember your answer, because... The costume is Robin. I know! Okay?
Barney: Now. For I have explained.
Barney: Forget it. It really is not class. At best, it sucks.
Barney: Owl. How do we go? We will do what? Jump?
Barney: Actually, it's not bad.
Barney: Look, Robin... I must tell you something.
Barney: What is it?
Barney: It's been an incredible thing. I was talking to Robin, I would tell him my feelings, but just before, you will believe what ever she said.
Barney: In your opinion? What we can say to that?
Barney: Robin, you're great listening. You're really great, but we're friends. This is not a good idea.
Barney: You too, sweetie.
Barney: Once she told me that, more than feelings. I'm more in love.
Barney: It's not great?
Barney: Tracey, tell Lily what you just said.
Barney: No, how you've arrived there.
Barney: Come off the bus from Iowa! How lucky that apprentice... dancer off the bus from Iowa... meeting... the producer of the Rockettes?
Barney: You can make us one of those rum and beer, that your father loves so much?
Barney: What?
Barney: What song? There was a piece?
Barney: The costume is Robin. I know! Okay?
Barney: Now. As I explained...
Barney: So... when she said love me, she meant... otherwise.
Barney: Yes. It's true. And it's great. It's great. (Tracey returns) So Robin does not like me.
Barney: Why?
Barney: So... You're in love with me?
Barney: You can stop. Lily told me everything.
Barney: I can not believe it.
Barney: Maybe I will not avoid it. I am perhaps. I have not wanted for a long time. But with you, it does not look so...difficult. I know not. I thought... you felt the same.
Barney: It's going pretty fast, do not you think?
Barney: We're good friends. Why risk everything? Friends?
Barney: My God. You just do it again. You've mosbysé!
Barney: But if, little flirtatious.
Barney: Why are you scared to try?
Barney: Bad idea.
Barney: No.
Barney: Friends.
Barney: I love you.
Barney: No, you're smothering me.
Barney: You know what? We'll see later.
Barney: Yeah, right.
Barney: But you two have to get married--
Barney: I don't need to go to a heart doctor. I drink every day, I sleep three hours every night, and I have multiple s*x partners. I'm doing everything right.
Barney: Whoa, whoa, whoa, whoa, whoa, whoa, whoa, whoa, Big Fudge. "With"? I am not "with" Nora. Wrong preposition. Later tonight I'm hoping to be on Nora, right? Or under Nora, right? Or, we're all adults, I'll just say it... behind Nora.
Barney: Yeah. pen1s feelings. Because she's hot. Guys, as you know, I only have one rule...
Barney: If you're gonna get it on in a Port-O-Potty, do it early in the day [...] Never screw over a girl whose last name ends in a vowel. 'Cause she's got brothers [...] Never date a girl with a hook for a hand [...]
Barney: Never go out with the same girl more than once.
Barney: There is an exception.
Barney:...unless she's hot [...]...unless she's hot [...]...unless she's hot.
Barney: And she is indeed hot. Which is why nothing, not even God himself... yeah, I said it, Beardy... is going to stand in the way of tonight being legend... Wait for it. (He sneezes)
Barney: Hey, Nora, sorry I'm late. I'm just, uh, just getting over a cold.
Barney: About 20 minutes. Can't seem to shake it.
Barney: Handsome? Rich? Well-endowed?
Barney: The bed... that's where all the...happens.
Barney: Ah. Thank you.
Barney: Good night, Mommy.
Barney: No. I didn't even see her boobs. She just took care of me.
Barney: Oh, oh, I should go. Lily, can I talk to you for a second? So, um, I made an appointment with that cardiologist.
Barney: No.
Barney: Yes!
Barney: Okay, I promise I won't lie to her. I may, however, lie on her. I said, bang-bang, bangity-bang.* Bang-bang-bang, bangity-bang *
Barney: * Bang, bang, bangity bang... *
Barney: * A bang-bang, bangity-bang. *
Barney: See, Lily? She was worried.
Barney: Twen... Flag on the play, Doc. I have a date tonight.
Barney: Well, now it doesn't.
Barney: Go on, Doctor.
Barney: Well, let's see... uh, Wheel of Fortune, naked push-ups, naked chin-ups... I was at dinner.
Barney: This? No, no. It's a heart monitor. It's a medical thing.
Barney: What's that like?
Barney: My friend's dad passed away from a sudden heart attack. So I'm just getting myself checked out, too.
Barney: Thanks.
Barney: Well, for what it's worth, I'm not easily shocked. Unless you dump water on me, 'cause I'll just... No. What is it?
Barney: That's exactly what I want, too.
Barney: Hey, guys, this is Nora.
Barney: I mean, I like being single, but secretly, I want to have kids.
Barney: Three... one of each. You?
Barney: Yeah, with ivy growing on it.
Barney: And we must have a pool.
Barney: I really am.
Barney: I assure you, that's not a nickname that I...
Barney: I'm not lying! Guys, Nora's really special. In fact... I think I'm... falling in love with her. Guys! I'm serious.
Barney: Guys, this is real. And if you don't make me look good in front of Nora, just remember: I've got dirt on each of you, and I am not afraid to spill it.
Barney: Really, Lily? Even if I were to mention, oh, I don't know... your kindergarten class's pet guinea pig?
Barney: Marshall?
Barney: The calzone?
Barney: Robin.
Barney: The Mr. T dream...
Barney: Ted?
Barney: The ballet class.
Barney: The 'N Sync concert.
Barney: Okay, Ted. The thermos.
Barney: I do! So be cool!
Barney: Thermos.
Barney: I only have one rule. Never, ever, ever meet a girl's parents.
Barney: Not even if her mom's hot.
Barney: I'd love to meet your parents.
Barney: No, Scooby, you, uh... stay!
Barney: Yeah, me, too.
Barney: I'd love to. (He kisses her) There's just one little thing, and it probably doesn't matter, but... I don't want to get married. I've been saying that all night just to get in your pants.
Barney: Can you believe...
Barney: Wait... Nora, wait. Wait. I'm sorry I misled you.
Barney: I was on the spot. This is your fault.
Barney: Yeah, with the whole "I want to get married" thing. You can't just tell someone exactly what you want out of a relationship. This... isn't England.
Barney: Uh, yeah. Isn't that him taking a leak on that fire hydrant?
Barney: Okay. Lily, I'm sorry that I lied about wanting to settle down.
Barney: Okay. Maybe, eventually, I could settle down. 50 years from now, if I have like a Hefner thing going on with some really hot twins. But those twins won't even be born for another... 32 years. I mean... Nora's great. She's wonderful. But...
Barney: Last night? 8:30.
Barney: I lied.
Barney: When I said I lied, that was a lie, and I'm sorry.
Barney: So am I. This, all of this, this is totally new to me, but I know it's what I want. I want to be confused. With you.
Barney: Hi. I'm Barney. Great to meet you. Hey, you want to see a magic trick?
Barney: Okay, burial of bachelorhood. Tonight, I have three exotic dancers most flexible physically and mentally that you've ever seen...
Barney: I'll tell you.
Barney: What?
Barney: No, I recognize a lost cause, when I see it. That's why I'm not recycle. In addition, Ted getting married, it is my interest. You know...
Barney: I worked on an issue of utmost importance. I admit I was baffled. Until I decided to take the bull by the horns.(Barney written on a board: how to lie down again with Robin) Then, finally, I décryptais code. "GIVE THE MARRIAGE OF TED. "
Barney: Let's hope. This weekend is my best chance to start with it.
Barney: Lily, kidding. I want to look cutesy and romantic, but this weekend, Robin will be the only girl that I will draw.
Barney: "The Collective Namaste Yoga and Meditation."
Barney: You have anything like Scotch?
Barney: I need alcohol. I'm not gonna do that stuff with Robin.Look at that. Berry cocktail, conditioner meninges. I dream, these drinks could make a girl smarter. What hell Ted brought us?
Barney: What? No. Robin must come.
Barney: Dude, Robin has to be there.
Barney: What are you parl...
Barney: Co-witness, I'll handle this.
Barney: Robin, where are you?
Barney: OK, in a few hours. Have a good flight. Bad news. I can not have it. Robin is gone.
Barney: Yes.
Barney: I'm here with someone.
Barney: Dear wife, thank you for the interest you have for Barney Stinson...
Barney: I regret to inform you that at this time...
Barney: There are currently no positions available.
Barney: I will not do, huh?
Barney: Let's go to your room. Far from it. And can be the whistle.
Barney: No problem. I just need to tidy up a little. Of clothes on the floor and...
Barney: The towels in the bathroom, a real mess. So, give me 10 minutes... to restore order...
Barney: The girl on reception.
Barney: Goliath National Bank. The world leader in credit and banking. God, I love Goliath National Bank!
Barney: Our company just bought them out in a ruthless takeover. Took two months. Cost 2,000 jobs. It was brutal. Who wants a T-shirt? (He throws one to Ted.) Hey, Marshall, they're hiring in the legal department. I could get you a job.
Barney: Italian.
Barney: I don't like Chinese.
Barney: I just said I don't like Chinese.
Barney: Weird meats, funny music, side of rice. Why are we splitting hairs?
Barney: I just said I don't like Chinese.
Barney: I love this burger so much, I want to sew my ass shut.
Barney: Name two places where things get stuffed.
Barney: You know what's not a drag? Getting a home equity loan at Goliath National Bank. I'm just saying.
Barney: Get this. You know who works out at my gym? Regis Philbin.
Barney: No. No, we don't know where it is.
Barney: I don't know where it is, Regis, I swear!
Barney: OK, Regis, we will, we will.
Barney: All right.
Barney: You know what else is a mouthful? All that double-talk other banks give you. At Goliath, customer satisfaction is our most important investment.
Barney: How lame is free automatic bill pay? How lame is 3.3% APY online savings? Yeah, that's right. Hate to make you look stupid in front of your friends, but you left me no choice. He laughs.
Barney: Reg... (He takes his phone.) That guy scares me. I think I'll leave him a text.
Barney: All right.
Barney: I want... to take this burger out to dinner, then maybe a movie, then take it back to my place, put on a little Terence Trent D'arby, and then I would just... fool around a little bit. Nothing serious, just take it slow, you know?
Barney: You know, Lil, when times are tough, I like to remember the uplifting words of my favourite song. He starts singing. "We'll be on your side when you need a friend. Through thick and thin you can always depend. On the world leaders in credit and banking. Goliath National Bank." Member FDIC.
Barney: Barney Stinson.
Barney: I'm sorry, this is...?
Barney: Of course. I'm sorry, I forgot to call you. That's not the place. The real place is on 106th and Manhattan Avenue. We're headed there right now.
Barney: Onions?
Barney: Okay, no onions.
Barney: One of 9,000 convenient locations.
Barney: What the...
Barney: It's not my... Stop, okay. She hits his knee. Stop that, Lily.
Barney: Marshall, Geez.
Barney: Will you just tell her already?
Barney: Well, technically not together. You won't have access to my floor.
Barney: If only there were an easy, convenient way to get some cash right now.
Barney: Member FDIC.
Barney: This feels so good. I'm worried I'm gonna get this burger pregnant.
Barney: That's outrageous.
Barney: oh, that's not a tattoo. That, dear boy, is a tramp stamp!
Barney: what?
Barney: what's matter with you?
Barney: Dude... don't poop where you eat.
Barney: You've heard of the golden rule, right? "love their neighbor?"
Barney: Damn it Ted, i've worked out this whole thing where the golden rule is "love thy neighbor", ok?... Now the golden rule is "love thy neigbor". But, there's one rule above it: the platinum rule: "never ever, ever, ever, love thy neighbor."
Barney: Need i remind you about me and Wendy the waitress?
Barney: good, then we've got a solid half hour. And in that time, we will convince you not to set foot out that door. It's a story older than time, my friend, and it always plays out in the same eight steps. Step 1: Attraction.
Barney: It's true.
Barney: 12 of them.
Barney: Thanks.
Barney: But you know better. You've seen your friends make the same mistakes before. You've laughed smugly at them.(laughs) Idiots! But still, you think, "this is different. The platinum rule doesn't apply to me." And that step 2! Bargaining.
Barney: That's the couples version of dating.
Barney: Need i remind you what happened with me and Wendy the waitress?
Barney: I've decided to seduce Wendy the waitress.
Barney: Request denied! What rule is there that say's i can't seduce the waitress at my favorite bar?
Barney: Well, i don't. I don't have one and i never will be because it's a great idea. Come on, guys! She's gullible. I'm bored. We're perfect for each other.
Barney: yeah, well... I think it'll be okay.
Barney: Ted, trust me. You don't want to do this.
Barney: That's what everyone thinks and then along comes step 3: Submission.
Barney: Good night!
Barney: Not at all.
Barney: Club soda can get anything off.
Barney: hey, can i get a gin and tonic?
Barney: oh, i paid for it.
Barney: Oh, Ted, of course there's an upside. At first, that's step 4: Perks.
Barney: What the opposite of name-dropping?
Barney: That's what i thought.
Barney: you don't have... (Wendy the waitress comes and serves food to Barney)
Barney: Come on, guys, free nachos. What?
Barney: I'm not killing the bar. Wendy the waitress has seen how i operate in this place. It is perfectly clear to everyone involved that this is nothing more than a temporary fling. (Wendy starves him, lovely) It's fiiine.
Barney: Which brings us to step 5: THE TIPPING POINT.
Barney: hey, Wendy, uh, do me a favor and send a glass of champagne to that pretty young girl over there.
Barney: over there... YOU... you're the pretty young thing...is what i meant. Champagne? Would you? on me.
Barney: okay. All right.
Barney: which brings to step 6.
Barney: Don't do this Ted.
Barney: Which brings us to step 6. You finally realize you've made a huge mistake and now you have to live with it. Step 6 is called purg... wait for it. Keep waiting. Keep waiting for the eternity only to dicover there's no escap-atory.
Barney: Yeah!
Barney: I remember that.
Barney: How could you guys let me date Wendy the waitress?
Barney: tss (He looks at a girl but Wendy is right behind, she smiles, he looks desperate)
Barney: Now look at me. Declawed. Neutered. What was once my jungle is now my zoo and i am forced to mate with the same old lioness again, and again, and again while families pay to watch.
Barney: Put a bell around my neck and scratch my belly kids, for i am just a docile housecat now. Miaou!
Barney: And so, inevitably, you have to do the thing you've been dreading all along. Now, a relationship-ectomy is a delicate surgery as it is, but in the case of the platinum rule, it takes a very, very steady hand, and that's step 7: CONFRONTATION.
Barney: I don't like you.
Barney: I mean, i don't like you that way. I used to like you that way but now that i've seen everything there is to see, i don't know, i kind of want to see those same parts just on other girls.
Barney: other girls and you, if you're into that but the other girls have to be there, too. That's the important part.
Barney: or that. Let's say it's that. So can i get a gin and tonic?
Barney: And in any other relationship, that would be it. End of story. But because you have to see this person again, there's a step 8: FALLOUT.
Barney: Thanks Wendy. Of course we can.
Barney: She's gonna try to kill me. This is poisoned.
Barney: Yours is poisoned too. She's trying to kill me and everyone close to me.
Barney: Ted! Look at the facts. I dump her and she says "no hard feelings". She's a psycho! What other explanation is there?
Barney: Where did Marshall get that hamburger?
Barney: You're welcome.
Barney: Yet.
Barney: What?
Barney: Ted, have you not been listening? Attraction, bargaining, submission, perks, tipping point, purgatory, confrontation, fallout! These things will all happen to you as surely as they happened to all of us! It's a rule of nature.
Barney: Exactly, the platinum rule. Stella reads my blog.
Barney: Thanks. (She leaves and he throws the drink) Crazy!
Barney: Thank you.
Barney: I know. Isn't it?
Barney: Exactly. Science. There is an 83% correlation between the times men wear boutonnieres and the times they get laid. Think about it. Proms, weddings. Grandmas' funerals. Thanks for the redhead, Nana. The "everyday boutonniere" by Stinson.
Barney: Robin, did you know that boutonniere is French for "bootie is near?" True story. Une histoire vraie.
Barney: Woman, you best check yourself.
Barney: Madam... that is an insult that cannot be borne! I demand satisfaction!
Barney: No. I'm going to show everyone this embarrassing video of you. It's Robin Sparkles III, y'all!
Barney: I cannot wait to see what's on this DVD!
Barney: No, of course not. I wanted my first time to be with someone I cared about.
Barney: Space Teens?! Is this a porno?
Barney: Yeah, yeah, yeah, it's a big old bowl of pornflakes. Whoa! And who is this exquisite keytarist I assum you're about to make sweet love to?
Barney: Ah, BFFs. Did you guys have sleepovers? Get mad at each other and wrestle, but then end up kissing in a tender embrace? Here, show us on Lily.
Barney: I'm sorry. We got to ration this. It's like we're on a desert island, and this video is a really hot, naked chick, and she's got, like, seaweed on her and a seashell bra. You all feel me?
Barney: The last thing she would want to do is hang out with some little brat.
Barney: Two dudes on the couch together watching p0rn? That's kind of weird.
Barney: We...
Barney: It's a noble creature.
Barney: No arguments here.
Barney: Seriously, dude, he has got to go. You need to be like, "You are the weakest link. Goodbye." Punchy, the tribe has spoken. Please pack up your knives and go. Your work of art didn't work for us. Your time's up. I have to ask you to leave the mansion. You must leave the chateau. Your tour ends here. You've been chopped.
Barney: You've been evicted from the Big Brother house. Your dessert just didn't measure up. Sashay away. Give me your jacket and leave Hell's Kitchen. I'm sorry, you did not get a rose. You have been eliminated from the race. You are no longer in the running to be America's Next Top Model. You're fired. Auf Wiedersehen.
Barney: Where do I know this song from?
Barney: Wow. This is so dirty.
Barney: So, this chick and I are going at it behind the Central Park Zoo. The Bonobo chimps start giving us a standing O, and just when I'm about to give her the same thing... What up?... I... I can't. I just... I can't. Guys, I know you count the minutes until you can escape from your humdrum lives by hearing how awesome mine is, and I love doing that for you, but I just can't tonight.
Barney: I don't want to talk about it.
Barney: All right, I'll tell you! My mother is selling the house I grew up in. All of my childhood memories gone, just like that!
Barney: Anyway, I need you guys to come out to Staten Island on Saturday and help box everything up.
Barney: Of course not. It's a two-day job.
Barney: You guys are adorable. You seriously believe that I, Barney Stinson, can't talk you into this? I got the Queen to give me a fist bump.
Barney: Whoa, Ted, that thing you're packing is way too big to fit in that box.
Barney: How dare you!
Barney: Bro!
Barney: Mom. Stop.
Barney: Tuesday at work. Some of the senior partners are really getting up there.
Barney: I loved Pee Wee basketball. Well, until they kicked me off the team... I was so awesome, the coach asked me to quit because it wasn't fair to the other kids.
Barney: I was so awesome, the coach asked me to quit because it wasn't fair to the other kids.
Barney: Hey. It's true. Tell him, James.
Barney: Oh, my God! Look at this. My letter from the Postmaster General. I still can't believe he took the time to write this...
Barney: "Dear Barney... I sincerely apologize about losing all the invitations you sent out to your eighth birthday party. That's why none of your classmates showed up. Not because you threw up when they turned the lights off at the Planetarium. No one even noticed that. Also, Janey Masterson's mother is a whore, and with gin on her breath at 10:00 in the morning, she's got some nerve kicking us out of the carpool. Love, Postmaster General.
Barney: Thank you.
Barney: Mom? Who's my dad? All the other kids at school know who their dad is. Who's mine?
Barney: Careful! Michael Jackson sent me this glove for my tenth...
Barney: Ah... Valentines. The second base of third grade. I always got a Valentine from every single girl in my class.
Barney: Yeah, school girls... The more they ignore you, pretend to hate your guts, lock you in the coatroom over winter break, the more they secretly like you. This isn't... Who's Sam Gibbs?
Barney: Mom addressed this and never sent it.
Barney: Hey. (laughs) It's a picture of you and me when we were little kids. On the back, Mom wrote... "Your son."
Barney: I know. Forgetting to send the photo. That poor sculptor had to work from memory. Those statues probably look nothing like us. Damn it, Mom!
Barney: Well, he's not my dad. My dad's Bob Barker.
Barney: So we're doing this? We're really going to go disturb the peaceful Long Island retirement of the former mayor of Yourson, North Dakota on a Sunday afternoon? Real classy, James. Real classy.
Barney: "Really rich"?
Barney: For what? I don't know who lives here, but it's not my dad. Wait. Wait. Please, stop. Just... just give me a second, okay?
Barney: Come on. I know Bob Barker's not really... you know. I'm not crazy. I just... I needed that. I know it may sound stupid, but I didn't always feel so great about myself growing up, and so having a celebrity dad made me feel special. But you're right, James. It's time to let go of the fantasies. It's time to grow up.
Barney: Papa! Look at us!nIt's like three of the same guy. Oh, my God, this explains why I was always so awesome at basketball. Guys, I'm black! Sorry. African-American. No. I'm allowed to say either. I got to go get my camera!
Barney: Here, Ted. Capture the moment!
Barney: Man... I thought I was a light-skinned Caucasian, but in truth, I'm a really light-skinned African-American. Man, try to hail a cab in Manhattan. Am I right? Nope, no one's stopping for this. These guys don't understand what I'm talking about.
Barney: Dad, look how fast I can run!
Barney: Dad, you're not looking!
Barney: Me first. Mom, there's something that I need to ask you, and I... I want you to be honest with me. Why do white people like Carrot Top?
Barney: Are you sure?
Barney: What'd Coach say, Ma?
Barney: Why didn't anyone come?
Barney: It's okay, Mom. I don't need it.
Barney: I already have a father. And his name... is Loretta.
Barney: Wait. Dad! James! Where are you going? That's the best part. Can we go camping?
Barney: Yeah, I ship out tomorrow for two years. You know, some people say the Peace Corps is the most noble thing a person can do. To those people, I say, "Is it?" And usually they say, "yes it is."
Barney: Oh, Tanya, I'm so glad you said that.
Barney: Ted, Ted, Ted, look, I got a bridesmaid, Ted, look, look, Ted, the second hottest bridesmaid, Ted, look. See ya Ted.
Barney: This better be good, I'm about to enter nirvana. By the way, I should give you Nirvana's phone number, she gives a great massage. Say what?
Barney: Ow. I know the house rules. Es un chiste.
Barney: You know I did.
Barney: You know I won't.
Barney: Because we just hooked up last night. I can't call the girl the next day. I have to wait at least, like, forever. Oh snap. Never gonna call her. Besides, she thinks I'm on my way to India.
Barney: Ted going all castrati over another girl is exactly not a good cause. Sorry, buddy, I wish I could help you, my hands are tied. Oh no, wait, that was last night.
Barney: Really? Ted: Yeah.
Barney: But you always said that Foxy Boxing girls were neither foxy nor good at boxing.
Barney: Tonight? Ted: Tonight. Dial.
Barney: (on phone) Yeah, Tanya, turns out I don't leave for the Peace Corps until tomorrow. Yeah, I know, sucks. Just one fewer day I get to help people. Anyway, this girl, any idea who she was? Hold on.
Barney: (to Ted) What kind of shoes...
Barney: (on phone) Tanya, he's a dude. He's not gonna know what kind of shoes she was wearing.
Barney: Oh come on.
Barney: (on phone) Apparently she was wearing brown shoes with little snowflakes on them.
Barney: Sorry, Ted, I won't be able to make foxy boxing tonight.
Barney: And here's the most amazing part. Because I told her I converted all my money to India dollars, she gave me fifty bucks to take a cab to the airport. That's right, I just got paid for s*x.
Barney: I really should give this money to the Peace Corps. They've done so much for me lately.
Barney: Ted, oh my gosh, I love this moment. You know why? Because I'm gonna say it and this time you're actually gonna say yes. You ready? You ready to say yes? Ted, suit up!
Barney: Oh come on!
Barney: Ted, you still with us?
Barney: The meter's running, dude. Crap or get off the pot.
Barney: I explained. I said, Madeline, every international conflict essentially boils down to sexual tension.
Barney: All, man.
Barney: Gaza Strippers. Next.
Barney: "Apartouze". You have what?
Barney: "Mrs. Gorbachev, removed her underwear."
Barney: You... have slept together. What are épouv...stouflant. Epouvstouflant. Well done, Ted. Bravo.
Barney: So, I am responsible for... Excellent. Excellent.Excellent. The next tour is for me!
Barney: Yes. Why you ask?
Barney: From joy. I am so happy for them.
Barney: I'm going quite well. Excuse me just a minute. (He goes out into the alley behind the bar, takes a television in a trash can and throws it down. Then back to talk to Lily) I'm going quite well.
Barney: Wait. If I pay a woman $ 200 an hour to feel better, it will not discuss. And there will be both on the couch. The woman in my scenario, she is a prostitute. Dirty, vulgar, all redone, from Eastern Europe...
Barney: Wonderful, we still speak of that!
Barney: Dude, I read a magazine at work every day. I will not say how many meetings where I was late because I 'was reading a magazine. " But I'm not ashamed of that. This is my moment. Sure, "magazine is read" is not sexy, but you know, this is something I have to do. Why be ashamed? Wait, "read a magazine" that's wank, right?
Barney: Super.
Barney: If great.
Barney: It's... just... if... Excuse me one second.
Barney: So, plasmas are better in low light, but the LCD is best to play?
Barney: So if I want a very good contrast ratio...
Barney: I take the CRT.
Barney: I'm fine, thank you.
Barney: Look, maybe your kids resent their friends sleep together, but not me. I have never been better.
Barney: Yes, I love it. That's what... It's you, man.
Barney: Clearly. This is the end.
Barney: A single solution. You must stop sleeping together, please.
Barney: Thank you.
Barney: Because of your bickering roommates are always a source of conflict between you two, I wanted to help. In fact, I went to the post. I took you stamps. In about 10 000. That should be enough.
Barney: I took it in passing. It's nothing.
Barney: It has always been there. You've been here how long?
Barney: Exactly. I worry about you.
Barney: Not at all. It's crazy. What?
Barney: What? You say anything. A friend can not clean the apartment of another friend like friends do?
Barney: I give you two: Clean and gentlemen Solcarlus.
Barney: No. This is not true, no. This is not true, no. No. Robin is all yours, man. Exploding yourself with it. Now if you'll excuse me, I'll go sleep with other girls.
Barney: Yes!
Barney: Absolutely. (Barney out of the apartment)
Barney: And I went with a bang. Why did I do that? It comes perhaps my father issues, but... basically, I allowed my best friend to sleep with the girl of my dreams. I completely sabotaged. And now, I smoke. I smoke.
Barney: But it's time and emotions I Emotive, bears sharing.Whoever Emotive, Bear's shares, can sit on the chair of the division.
Barney: Great, it's Lily who sent you? I have not the bear, OK?I will make it! Why are you smiling?
Barney: What?
Barney: Congratulations.
Barney: Marshall, I gotta go. In fact, there are toilets here, if you want to use.
Barney: Ted, I must tell you the truth. I love... (Robin out the trash) tacos. What are you doing?
Barney: Really? That's Wife... vantable.
Barney: Yes, it is épousvantable. What has happened?
Barney: Oh?
Barney: It is?
Barney: I love you.
Barney: A Taco?
Barney: Just.
Barney: Guess who just got four tickets to the "Origins of Chewbacca" Star Wars exhibit?
Barney: No, I said, "Guess who?"
Barney: Peter Mayhew, in the fur. Who's with me?
Barney: We're not going to the "Origins of Chewbacca" exhibit,Marshall. It's inHouston this year. Everyone knows that. I just wanted to get rid of the girls.
Barney: My guy in the DA's office scored us front row seats to a lethal injection. But we're still stopping for chili dogs first.
Barney: Marshall, now that Robin and I are together, I've learned a lot about relationships by watching you and Lily.
Barney: You're a terrible couple. Lily has taken all the man out of you. I used to think that's just every relationship. But what I've got with Robin proves that you can have a girlfriend and fully functioning male genitalia all at the same time.
Barney: Are you kidding? She'd sprint down here with a purse full of singles and a poncho for the 10:30 Jell-O show. BT-Dub, I called ahead it's lime.
Barney: What is wrong with you? You're just looking. It's like fantasizing about other women. It's harmless. Wait. Don't tell me you don't fantasize about other women.
Barney: False! I once fantasized about that silhouette chick you see on a truck's mudflaps. Took me less than a mile.
Barney: That is the saddest thing I've ever heard. Dude, Lily gets you in real life She has no business in your fantasies.
Barney: I accept your invitation. Marshall Eriksen, from this day forward, I will be the wingman of your mind. Now, focus on the next dancer. Put Lily completely out of your mind.
Barney: Ted, we found a stripper who looks exactly like Lily!
Barney: I'm speechless, too. Everything's as perky as we've always imagined!
Barney: Oh, I will. But first, I'm going to makeMarshall watch as I wedge Ulysses S. Grant between his wife's tatas.
Barney: You will not believe who we saw tonight.
Barney: We saw the third doppelganger!
Barney: Hey, hey, hey, hey! (showing a girl who spits on the ground)
Barney: Ladies, meet Stripper Lily. (showing a photo in his cellular)
Barney: Yeah, I couldn't get her face in it. But she looks just like you.
Barney: Busted.
Barney: Marshall made me go.
Barney: See,Marshall? We got to have a bros' night at a strip club and both of our ladies are totally cool with it.
Barney: Because they understand that it's healthy for us to do that from time to time.
Barney: Because it's harmless.
Barney: And, Lil,Marshall shouldn't have to go to so much trouble just to have an innocent fantasy.
Barney: Marshall, tell her. We're all friends here.
Barney: Psst! Ted! (showing a girl with his head)
Barney: (to Robin) You know, I don't come here that much.
Barney: Thank you, kindly stranger.
Barney: You are the best. My girlfriend is at a strip club with me and she couldn't care less.
Barney: Just the best.
Barney: Just the best.
Barney: I'm sorry. I'll let you work. But first, a riddle: What piece of women's attire most stokes a man's desire?
Barney: Correct. What lightweight outfit, pink or white, makes the front of my slacks abnormally tight?
Barney: Of course, of course.
Barney: "Sun dress," by the way. Hey! What are you nervous about? Tell me. Tell me. Tell me. What flowing cotton frock...
Barney: I want to see a pretty girl.
Barney: I'll be cool. Ah, Ted. You got your beer label in a bunch over nothing. Listen to your Uncle Barney. You have no reason to be nervous. None whatsoever. And I'm going to tell you why in one word.
Barney: Dibs!
Barney: You never called dibs.
Barney: Implied dibs?
Barney: Ted, you are spitting on the grave of Sir Walter Dibs, inventor of the dib. It was 1652... The SS Dibs was lost at sea...
Barney: And who's gonna represent you? Dibs on Marshall as my lawyer!
Barney: Where is Marshall anyway?
Barney: Oh, yeah, yeah? Be my guest. Fall in love with her. Get married. Just know this: When I step up to make my toast as your best man...
Barney: As your best man...
Barney: Ladies and Gentlemen... I... had dibs.
Barney: What?
Barney: Shhh, shh. You're the victim here. We both are. Let's get out of here.
Barney: We could just do it right here.
Barney: Yeah. At a bar. That book might as well be called, "Are You There, Barney? It's Me, Horny." That is not what "shields up" looks like. (He points to Robin who is entering the bar, with greasy hair and dirty clothes) That is what "shields up" looks like.
Barney: Oh, good God, woman. You're a disgrace.
Barney: Robin, seriously, I love you, but it's like you have squiggly cartoon odor lines coming off of you right now.
Barney: With hygiene?
Barney: Oh, you're exquisite. You must let me paint you.
Barney: This? What you're doing right now? I'm getting a "de-rection."
Barney: Excuse me?
Barney: Two... hundred... and fifty thousand dollars.
Barney: But I... Can I go smell her first?
Barney: Fine. (He takes the money)
Barney: What the hell are you doing?
Barney: Oh, that sucks! And dibs.
Barney: Oh, look at you, Robin. You're jealous.
Barney: Yeah, jealous, because she's got it, and you've lost it.
Barney: You lost it.
Barney: Robin, girls are like cartons of milk. Each one has a hotness expiration date, and you've hit yours. I'm not saying the occasional guy won't still open the fridge, pick you up, give a sniff, shrug and take a sip anyway But it's all downhill from here.
Barney: Yeah, she definitely saw you.
Barney: Okay, will do. And dibs.
Barney: Oh, you don't want my opinion on that.
Barney: If I had my dad's number, I would never not be on the phone with him.
Barney: Whoa, a hottie with a body! Boing...!
Barney: No. Lily, look. (looking at Robin standing at the bar) You saucy little minx. You sundressed up.
Barney: Robin, you do look super hot.
Barney: Yeah, you do.
Barney: Dude, you are so in. That is so awesome. A high five doesn't even cut it. High six!
Barney: No. Good. That was pretty lame.
Barney: It was a team effort.
Barney: Wait. What?
Barney: The slaps are not transferable.
Barney: Absolutely not!
Barney: Tell me which of you is going to slap me!
Barney: I die, I, here. Ted takes a chip, I jump! Robin arranges her hair, I jump! I jump all the time. It's bad for my skin. It gives me wrinkles. Wrinkles!
Barney: This is torture. Put me in the chair...
Barney: And finish it!
Barney: This is interesting.
Barney: It's a good point. Rebuttal?
Barney: philosophical riddle. Idea against execution. Itemize your arguments.
Barney: Repeat-a. The first seven!
Barney: You're gonna...
Barney: I guess this is the best choice, Robin. Finally... the men are stronger than women.
Barney: And that's what you always wanted, is not it? A strong man to take care of you? Of course, teenager, you were a feisty, playing hockey with the boys, you skinned your knees on the ice. But what you could say to your teammates... or even to yourself... that is all you really wanted was this pretty white dress in this beautiful white chapel. And at the end of the aisle strewn with pretty white flowers, a man to take care of all your slaps.
Barney: Commissioner of the bet-Baffe, tie me to the chair is a violation...
Barney: This is the worst.
Barney: It's downright hell.
Barney: It hurts!
Barney: thank you God.
Barney: No way!
Barney: Gently!
Barney: thank you God.
Barney: You're kidding me.
Barney: No. No, no, no, no. It is the Commissioner of the bet-Baffe. It must remain impartial!
Barney: It's not good. Please... Let me...
Barney: I'm running in a meadow.
Barney: Stop your bullshit.
Barney: This is the best Thanksgiving...
Barney: Question?
Barney: But you enjoyed the e-vite, right? Thas an actual picture of my pants.
Barney: People often ask me "Barney, how is it that you're so psyched so much of the time?"
Barney: And the answer is right here... my own, personal "get psyched" mix. Now, people often think a good mix should rise and fall, but people are wrong. It should be all rise, baby. Now prepare yourselves for an audio journey into the white-hot center of adrenaline. Bam.
Barney: Let's do this!
Barney: Ranjit! Dude, you're driving a limo now. That's awesome.
Barney: Hey, what are we waiting for? We got five parties to hit, and three hours to do it.
Barney: Party number one!
Barney: Natalya.
Barney: She... Who knows? The former Soviet Republic of Drunk-Off-Her-Ass-Istan?
Barney: Isn't she awesome?
Barney: It's true. I can hear them. What's that, little boys? What's that? You wanna go for a... rock?
Barney: Oh, wait, wait, wait. We have to turn around. We left Natalya.
Barney: What?!
Barney: Oh, very nice, Lily. You know, she is a guest in this country. So while you may chose to turn your back on her, I choose to turn my front on her. What up?
Barney: What? She needs to get psyched. Fine.
Barney: My finger slipped.
Barney: We couldn't go back for Natalya, a human being, but we do have time for hot dogs?
Barney: No. No. We are already behind schedule. Ted, come on. We have an hour and a half before midnight I don't want to be kissing Ranjit.
Barney: Oh, my God. He's coming over. Everybody be cool. Everybody be cool.
Barney: Big fan. Barney Stinson. So, uh... what about this party?
Barney: Yes. Moby... Yeah, it should start high, get higher. This mix is my pride and joy. I never leave home without it.
Barney: Jan... Aah!
Barney: But when we said, "Hey, Moby," you said, "Yeah."
Barney: No, uh, we're good. We're good. Happy New Year, Not Moby.
Barney: Why did we think that guy was Moby?
Barney: That's Marshall's phone. Hello.
Barney: Hey, sexy.
Barney: He left his phone in the limo. He's out looking for you.
Barney: Party number three.
Barney: Moby?! She's upstairs.
Barney: Well, we know it's not Moby and it's not Tony.
Barney: Well, after that rather unpsyching experience, you know what it's time for? It's time to... what? That's right, re-psych. Re-psy... Where's the...? Oh, my God! Not Moby took my "Get Psyched" mix!
Barney: Yeah, you know why all the circuits are jammed because everyone's calling their loved ones, everyone around the world. Everyone except Barney. Oh, sure, laugh. Laugh for Barney Stinson. Laugh for the sad clown trapped on his whirling carousel of suits and cigars and bimbos and booze. Round and round it goes. And where's it all heading? Nowhere.
Barney: I'm sorry. Am I not allowed to have a pensive side?
Barney: The first time I rode in a limo I was five. I was on the way to my grandfather's funeral. I suppose, in a way, I still am.
Barney: Give it a rest, Ted.
Barney: Trying to turn this night into anything more than what it is, which is New Year's Eve which is the single biggest letdown of a night every single year.
Barney: Stop trying to chase down some magical, perfect New Years, Ted. It doesn't exist.
Barney: Come on! Oh! Oh!
Barney: Yeah, it turns out she was asleep in the front seat the whole time. Ranjit, why didn't you tell me?
Barney: Cheers. Well said.
Barney: Here, you need a mint.
Barney: The Thankstini. A fun and delicious new novelty drink I invented. Cranberry juice, potato vodka and a bouillon cube. Tastes just like a turkey dinner.
Barney: Thanksgiving in a strip club, who's in? The Lusty Leopard has a surprisingly good Thanksgiving buffet. Plus, they do this thing. Heather dresses up as a pilgrim and Misty dresses up as an Indian, and they share a meal.
Barney: I'm sorry, Native American.
Barney: Canceling out Barney.
Barney: Excuse me, guys. Coming through.
Barney: Well, hi guys.
Barney: Oh, just the Lord's work.
Barney: Guys, OK, look, I don't advertise it, but I volunteer here. I think it's important to help the less fortunate. I'm the Angelina Jolie of incredibly hot guys.
Barney: I'm on it.
Barney: That's because I was trained by the best, Kendall.
Barney: Kendall, they're cool.
Barney: OK, well, I better get out there. There's a lot of food to give out. And a lot of smiles.
Barney: Man, it's amazing out there. I've done so much good today, I've got like a soul boner.
Barney: (laughs) You wanna scoop stuffing your first day out? Hello, NFL, can I be quarterback this Sunday? Dude.
Barney: So, wait, not only have you not done any good for anyone today, you're actually helping someone steal from the homeless. You know, Ted, it's called Thanksgiving, not Thankstaking. Damn.
Barney: Yeah, Right. Thanks.
Barney: Yeah, what's up?
Barney: Yeah, so.
Barney: That's my private personal business!
Barney: That's my private personal business.
Barney: I was unfairly punished because the wall belonged to the judge's church.
Barney: I peed in an alley which happened to have a church which I did not see because I was drunk.
Barney: OK, fine, so a judge is making me do this but I'm still doing it, and kicking ass at it, BTW.
Barney: When's the last time either of you did any good? Huh?
Barney: I can't believe that I told Kendall you guys were cool. I had 40 hours left on my community service and now I've got to spend it spearing trash on a freaking median strip.
Barney: Volunteer of the year!
Barney: Ted, I'm glad you asked.
Barney: Right? I told you so.
Barney: OK, Ted, I found a way for you to help someone, to do some good. This is Walter, and Walter is homeless. And Walter would like a lap dance.
Barney: I never joke about the sublime art of burlesque entertainment.
Barney: Ted, Walter's been to three shelter dinners. You know where he hasn't been? To heaven with Samantha. Look, it's the one chance you've had all day to help someone in need. Now buy this man a lap dance.
Barney: I've never seen that woman before in my life! Sorry. Force of habit. Congratulations!
Barney: Hey, guys. A yuletide riddle. What is my second favorite word that begins with b-o-n?
Barney: Yeah. What is my third favorite word that begins with b-o-n? (Imitates buzzer) Bonus. As in, my end-of-the-year bonus check.
Barney: And you earned it, buddy. Check out what I'm gonna buy for myself. The dibiase. See those pinstripes? Diamonds. It is the uppest a person could ever suit.
Barney: Charity? You're seriously talking to me about charity? Dude, I am Mr. Charity. I frequently sleep with sixes, chubsters, over-thirties... I am the bill and Melinda gates of the sympathy bang.
Barney: What?! I've never seen that woman before in my life! Sorry, force of habit. Congratulations!
Barney: Huh. Marshall and Lily are doing something meaningful. And it's making me less happy about this bonus. And I'm still single. At least I got that going for me. So why do I still feel outside of awesome looking in? What am I doing with my life?
Barney: Oh, Marshall, you only think you're happy. Just wait, because tonight, (imitating Oprah) is Barney's Favorite Things!
Barney: Barney's Favorite Things! I'm gonna give you all a bunch of free stuff... like Oprah. Just get excited, okay?
Barney: Velour track suits!
Barney: Remote control helicopters! Condoms! And last but not least... There is a fleet of limos outside waiting to take us to... A strip club! (Applause, cheering) You get a lap dance! You get a lap dance! You're gonna give me a lap dance! Everybody gets a lap dance! That was amazing! It was like a diamond suit for my soul. I gotta keep going. I gotta do more.
Barney: I'm not going back either. I'm taking the rest of my bonus to God's strip club.
Barney: Sam. Uh, father. I-I don't mean father father. Unless...
Barney: I'm thinking about giving some money to charity.
Barney: No, I don't mean that charity. That charity is doing peachy. You'll see pics of the two of them in next week's e-mail.
Barney: I-I recently started giving, and it felt surprisingly good. I want to do more.
Barney: Well, I would love to help by writing a check for... one, zero, zero, zero...
Barney:...Zero... (Cell phone chimes) Woops. Hold on a second. Wait. They're not doing something meaningful with their lives. Well, this changes everything. Oh, no, I've already written four zeroes. Thank you, decimal point. One hundred dollars.
Barney: Diamond suited up. Hey, Ted, can you spot me for the movie? I don't like to carry a lot of cash on me.
Barney: Yeah, that was back when Lily was pregnant. Now she's not. Ergo, a suit is born. (Chuckles) Dude, what's up with the gingerbread house? You look ridiculous!
Barney: Ah, I know that move. You cut a hole in the floor, she reaches into the living room, finds the tree... Nice.
Barney: What?! I've never seen that woman before in my life! Sorry, force of habit. Congratulations!
Barney: What am I doing with my life?
Barney: Get a puppy!
Barney: Oh. Our movie snack.
Barney: I can't give this suit back. Ted, I glow in the dark. I finally glow in the dark!
Barney: Nope.
Barney: And there's more. Do you still do that thing where you give people in need clothes for job interviews?
Barney: Bring 'em in, boys! Merry Christmas.
Barney: Son?!
Barney: Hi, there. We've had a lot of fun tonight, but on a more serious note, this is the time of year when we remember the importance of giving. And there's no greater gift than the gift of booty. So, this holiday season, why not bang someone in need? I'm Barney Stinson, and that's... One to grow on.
Barney: Hi, there. You know, we've had a lot of fun tonight...
Barney: The... mmm. Social experiment. (Chanting) U.S.A, U.S.A, U.S.A, U.S.A...
Barney: What do you mean?
Barney: Hmm.
Barney: Perfect. Problem solved. Welcome aboard.
Barney: I know, and it's provided us with a lot of laughs. But, Robin, if you want to live here, work here and throw chairs at people here, you have to do this.
Barney: A cit...
Barney: No, no, you have to do it. I'll help you study. We're gonna stay up all night long. I'm gonna drill you, and then we're gonna study. No, seriously. We're gonna do some cramming and then we're gonna study. No, seriously. We're gonna bone up on...
Barney: Sorry. It's a rich area.
Barney: But you know, it's not going to be easy, this test. It's not like the Canadian citizenship test.
Barney: It's Canada. Question one: Do you want to be Canadian? Question two: really?
Barney: I don't know if you caught that, but he did the "we" thing.
Barney: Okay.
Barney: "How many stars are on the flag?"
Barney: "What are the first ten amendments to the Constitution called?"
Barney: Ready for the test maybe, but ready to be an American? Not on your sweet life. For you to be an American, we got to get the Canadian out of you. That's why I've created these questions. Question one: "Who is this?"
Barney: No, the answer is Elton John. Question two: "What the hell is this?"
Barney: Wrong. The answer we were looking for was "I don't care, it's dumb". Let's go buy something that's bad for us and then sue the people who made it. That's America, Robin.
Barney: Correct.
Barney: Archie Bunker's neighbor was George Jefferson.
Barney: All right, hold your horses. Now to prove that you are as American as apple pie and the childhood obesity it leads to- who is this?
Barney: Jeff Foxworthy? No, it's Jim Varney. You're kidding me. You don't know that?
Barney: Not only are you wrong, but you are belligerently sticking to your guns and insulting me in the process. Robin Scherbatsky- you are an American.
Barney: Good morning.
Barney: You went Canadian.
Barney: This Canadian. (He opens the curtains) Oh. That was supposed to be a dramatic view of the Toronto sky- you're in Toronto.
Barney: You called me, said you were never coming back. So, I jumped on a plane, flew across the Atlantic...
Barney: You're talking nonsense. Now, listen... You slipped up. It's fine. The test is in a few hours.
Barney: God, you're still drunk.
Barney: Now, that's ridiculous. We're gonna get some coffee, in you, we'll sober you up, and get you back to New York for that test. But, before any of that, we're gonna do it on this bed 'cause... hotel room. Okay, let's get some coffee.
Barney: It's like an entire country without a tailor.
Barney: What's wrong? Other than the fact that this five dollar bill they gave you is blue.
Barney: And there's kids playing hockey on the back. It's like you want us to make fun of you.
Barney: Look at this money! This one has a moose, this one has a beaver, and they all have Elton John on the back.
Barney: Okay, that's it. (He climbs on a chair) Attention, Canada! I am Barney from America. And I'm here to fix your backward-ass country. Number one: get real money. Don't know what board game this came from, but it's a "jhoke". Number two- and this is the biggie- Quit letting awesome chicks like Robin Scherbatsky get away because, guess what? You don't want her? I'm planting my flag in her- if you know what I mean, which you probably don't- and getting her the hell out of here. You may now return to being pointless. (He sits down and three men arrive behind him) Ah, this coffee is excellent. Oh. Hey, fellas. It's called a "tie".
Barney: Man, those Canadian doctors banded me up, reset my jaw, put my shoulder back in its socket, and they didn't even bill me. Idiots. All right, I guess they're no idiots. The coffee was extraordinary. Huh. I guess Canada's not so bad. They play their cards right, maybe they can even become a state someday.
Barney: Hmm.
Barney: Wait, you can do that?
Barney: I see.
Barney: No, I can see out of my left eye again.
Barney: What do you mean?
Barney: This is "ridikilus."
Barney: (on the phone) hey, so you know how I've always had a thing for half-Asian girls? Well, now I've got a new favorite: Lebanese girls! Lebanese girls are the new half-Asians.
Barney: Okay, meet me at the bar in fifteen minutes, and Suit up!
Barney: Where's your suit!? Just once when I say suit up, I wish you'd put on a suit.
Barney: It was a blazer!
Barney: I see what this is about. Have you forgotten what I said to you the night we met?
Barney: Ted, I'm going to teach you how to live. (Ted's shocked) Barney, we met at the urinal.
Barney: Lesson one, lose the goatee. It doesn't look good with your suit.
Barney: Lesson two, get a suit. Suits are cool. (Points to self with bear bottle in hand) Exhibit A. (Flirts to a woman unseen) Lesson three, don't even think about getting married till you're... thirty.
Barney: I thought I was your best friend. Ted, say I'm your best friend.
Barney: Good! And as your best friend, I suggest we play a little game called... "Have you met Ted?"
Barney: (Taps a woman names Yasmine) Hi, have you met Ted? (Leaves and watches from a distance).
Barney: (ignoring) how does Carl land a Lebanese girl?
Barney: Exactly-the guy doesn't even own a suit!
Barney: (to Robin) Hey, have you met Ted?
Barney: (comes back laughing) De-wait for it-nied! Denied!
Barney: I thought we were playing laser tag tomorrow night?
Barney: (Phone) Hey loser, how's not playing laser tag? Because playing laser tag is awesome! Oh, I killed you Connor; don't make me get your mom!
Barney: Okay, meet me at the bar in fifteen minutes-AND SUIT UP!
Barney: I can't believe you're still not wearing a SUIT!
Barney: What is she goanna-is she goanna bat her eyes at you in Morse code (bats eyes)?? Ted (bats eyes) Kiss me-No, you just kiss her!
Barney: Ee-(Kisses Marshal) Did Marshall give me the signal?
Barney: But see-at least, tonight, I get to sleep knowing, Marshall and Me... never going to happen. You should've kissed her.
Barney: A week? That's like-a year in hot girl time. She'll forget all about you. Mark my words: you will never see that one again.
Barney: Actually, that is a perfect metaphor. By the way, did I congratulate you two? (Raises glass to Lily and Marshall)
Barney: Alright, but under one condition.
Barney: (happy) look at you, you beautiful b*st*rd, you suited up! This is totally going in my blog!
Barney: Ted's goanna get it on with a TV reporter (nods. Laughs.) This just in. Okay (holds hand up for high-fives)
Barney: Why does he get to be the best man? (Shouts out) I'M YOUR BEST FRIEND!
Barney: You're wearing a suit!
Barney: So, (looks to the cabdriver) Ranjit... you must've done it with a Lebanese girl.
Barney: The women hot there?
Barney: (Whispers to Marshall) Simple no would have sufficed. (To Ranjit) She's lovely.
Barney: So, Marshall. This "Olive Theory" based on you and Lily?
Barney: You hate olives? Lily loves them, you can't stand them.
Barney: Two weeks ago, Spanish bar on 79th Street, dish of olives-you had some. What up?
Barney: I swear.
Barney: But you like olives!
Barney: Marshall, I'm going to get you an early wedding present. Don't get married.
Barney: Come on man, you said your stomach's been hurting, right? You know what that is! Hunger. You're hungry for experience. Hungry for something new. Hungry for olives. But you're too scared to do anything about it.
Barney: Why are we still sitting here? Let's go! We can still make last call. What do you say Lil? (Pirate Accent) Yo, ho ho and a bottle o' rum? (Silence) 'Cuz you're a pirate...
Barney: You think they're doing it in front of the dogs?
Barney: I had this girl in college; she had a golden retriever-
Barney: Hit it Ranjit. (They drive off)
Barney: There's no such thing as the signal. But yeah-that was the signal.
Barney: Yeah Ted, we're not on you anymore.
Barney: Everything he said was nice, but I am profoundly scared.
Barney: Captain, what do you think of rainy days?
Barney: And I'll be home trying to get over the fact that no one invited meto the big hair washing party.
Barney: Don't use the husband's condoms. That's just rude.
Barney: Lubricant is public property. (Robin groans)
Barney: Lily, I guess that leaves just you and me. Want to hang?
Barney: Save it, Lily. I am still mad at you for... something, and for that other thing.
Barney: Oh! Wow. Thanks, Lily. You saved me. You saved us. Look, I know you didn't mean whatever it was you said that made me so mad.
Barney: So, who's the eye broccoli?
Barney: Mark my words, Marshall. Someday you will find Iris so excruciatingly attractive, you won't be able to look her directly in the boobs.
Barney: Marshall, do you know how the myth of mermaids came to be?
Barney: It was 300 years ago. Sailors stuck at sea would get desperate for female companionship. It got so bad that, eventually, the manatees out in the water started to look like... beautiful women. Mermaids. Let's go get some tail! Oh. You see, every woman, no matter how initially repugnant, has a mermaid clock... the time it takes for you to realize you want to bone her. Sure, today you see Iris as a manatee. But she ain't gonna stay that way. Marshall, your secretary's mermaid clock starts right now.
Barney: D'oh! Told you. The Mermaid Theory. It's a thing. You owe me 500 bucks.
Barney: Let's say yes.
Barney: What's that supposed to mean? Are you calling me fat? If there is one thing you never do, it is call a woman fat right to her face!
Barney: Nah. Watch out!
Barney: Oh, Lily, I'm sorry. Hey, you want to see a magic trick?
Barney: Once mermaid-ified, there's only one way a woman can go back to being unattractive again, but it's pretty gruesome.
Barney: Worse. Pregnancy. If a baby's on board that train, it is headed straight back to Manatee City... where the grass ain't green and the girls ain't pretty.
Barney: Well, Lily, I guess it's just you and me. You wanna hang?
Barney: High heels chafe my shoulders. But you don't have to worry about that anymore. Ever since you got pregnant, you're just a big fat manatee.
Barney: I'm sorry, Lily. Hey, you want to see a magic trick?
Barney: Hey. Hey, wait. Come on. I was kid... Wait, wait, wait! There's another addendum to The Mermaid Theory. A pregnant woman who's become a manatee can become a mermaid again through one simple act.
Barney: Breast-feeding. Hot.
Barney: Really. When those things swell up to three times their normal size... so do I.
Barney: I hate to be the one to tell you. Marshall and Lily get divorced.
Barney: Look what I saw yesterday.
Barney: I gotta go.
Barney: She makes her dishes right away, Ted. I give them two or three weeks maximum.
Barney: They have a big problem.
Barney: If, when you're great like me. Listen to this. Robin taking into account the number of beds in which we did. One is 83 and a half.
Barney: An Ottoman 19th in an antique shop.
Barney: Big Tiger. You holding up? Want a hug? You mean yesterday? You're safe here.
Barney: I'll tell you what's the problem. You know how I was always the best single? Now I'm the best in relationship. Even better than you and Lily.
Barney: Let me ask you a question.
Barney: Do you mind you, if the sink is full of dirty dishes?
Barney: So what is the problem of Lily, not yours.
Barney: You argue. Robin, we do not fight.
Barney: No. And here's the secret, every time we say we're going to argue...
Barney: It works in 100% of cases. No fighting if you're not there.This is what Gandhi said.
Barney: Do not worry. It also has a good way to avoid arguments.
Barney: There's so much to do with the mouth. Why spoil it by talking? But if you insist, here's what I would say on the dishes if I was married to Lily.
Barney: Okay.
Barney: Thank you, doll.
Barney: I'm glad you mention it. No. And that's why. I know you do not like dirty sinks. But do it for me to clean it? If one day I looked up the ceiling of the room and think, "Hey, I want a replica of the Sistine Chapel" is what you will paint the?
Barney: Exactly! Similarly, if you do not like having lots of dirty dishes, it's your washing.
Barney: It's because you're a woman.
Barney: Of course not.
Barney: Once I have his attention, it's time to get out the heavy artillery.
Barney: Look, I love you. But, baby, with little energy I have left after work, I want to cover you with love, not washing dishes.
Barney: Now, turn around.
Barney: The piercing was cool.
Barney: You're welcome.
Barney: I told you.
Barney: Super. Here are your tasks for the weekend. Ted, you're gonna go see the neighbors. Marshall, you go see Lily. Robin and I need you for a crouched position on an animal skin in our chalet. Ready? Break!
Barney: Okay.
Barney: It's not great to finally see blossomed emotionally, spiritually and sexually?
Barney: short, and your weekend?
Barney: What happened to the "I'm tired after my exhausting day and I want to use what little energy I have left to cover you with love"?
Barney: You need to be angry. Dispute yourself stronger.Imagine that Marshall never have to wash dishes in all your life, all the plates are clean. Why, it would relieve any anxiety to any meal. Not having to tie your T-shirt to form a bowl of salted fortune for your pleasures. This world belongs to you, Marshall.Beach house, take it, put yourself in holiday clothes, benefits.
Barney: What do you eat?
Barney: Hey, Ro-Ro.
Barney: As Gandhi said, "A smile costs nothing, baby."
Barney: How will Marshall and Lily?
Barney: You and your big, huge heart.
Barney: What do you mean by that?
Barney: Who the hell is Phil?
Barney: All was going well. Our techniques dodges worked perfectly until the skiing trip last weekend.
Barney: I found at Marshall's arguments Lily were zero then it will never have to wash another dish. Slap me in two.
Barney: You're on the side of Lily? You... (The chairlift stops) No. We will argue and I can not spin.
Barney: Or so I tried the jump?
Barney: This trick of dodging is over?
Barney: You have the? This is the smallest!
Barney: And it does not stop there. We argue non-stop since.
Barney: The tie murdered by Robin.
Barney: As a quarterback to stay on top. Monday morning, he sits on an ice pack and are studying the tape of the match.
Barney: Look, we were fed up everyone to tell us how we are no relations.
Barney: We need advice.
Barney: More important than winning.
Barney: What about now?
Barney: Or, there is a bench in the elevator.
Barney: Grave. It's not a competition.
Barney: Oh, nothing. I must have coffee with Nora. She is still angry, so I need some "sympathy points". She loves musicals, so I'll tell him that I fell off stage during a performance of "Man of La Mancha." What do you think?
Barney: A one-man show... I love it!
Barney: You're right. A cervical neck brace! Thank you, Lil. I should have to talk to you soon. I trained all day with these crutches and one who has left in my hall is likely to need it.
Barney: Hi Nora, thank you for coming.
Barney: My naked...? Oh, that's nothing. I was playing in a One Man Show at Fiddler. There was this scene...
Barney: Wait, Nora, waiting... No, please. I'm sorry.
Barney: Someone who likes you, really. And suspicious, and probably accurately you do it over more later, and therefore he feels the need... I'm sorry, you spoke of this fantastic pair of tits, right? Because I seek, and I do not see them.
Barney: Okay, I did not know. Mea culpa. So, from now, more lies. I never lie to you. I'm serious. Ask me anything.
Barney: Have I ever... If I'm totally honest... Yes.
Barney: More than once... Wow, this is... I guess if we... so, technically, there were a number of times I've lied to a woman to sleep with her.
Barney: Nine or ten for most. There has been a 4 once. It was an easy girl.But, Nora, after that, I had to flee so fast. Honesty is good.
Barney: You want me to tell all the lies I have told to put a woman in my bed?
Barney: You are good.
Barney: I do not have time to explain how I got there. I just need someone to suck the poison. The surgeon gave me a new face, darling. You realize that I am alive? My name is David Beckham. If I castais only the white swan, is the role for you. No, I am a lesbian. What I wear is just very realistic.
Barney: Oh, once I am the soul man. There was this pretty girl who only go out with black.
Barney: And that made all the lies related to space. Let the world of sports. Oh wait, I forgot for a space: "I was bitten by a snake space. You have to suck all the poison around my... "
Barney: So that was cool. I can remember, or...?
Barney: Well, I count three for and one against.
Barney: Because you are sat here all night. You could leave, but you did not. Listen, Nora, these lies, it was the old me. But I swear I try to change.You... make me want to change.
Barney: I will prove it. I'll show you how much I'm serious. I will not leave this restaurant as I have not got a second date with you.
Barney: I do not laugh. It is a restaurant 24h/24. I will stay forever if necessary. And I will. Just water for me please.
Barney: Oh! Hi guys! Oh! My neck! Uh... oh! Hey! Look at this!
Barney: Oh, I told Nora that I would not leave until I have no second appointment, and I intend to do. I am here since 9 o'clock. I still need another minute. Say I'm crazy, but I'll stay here as long as it will not be returned.
Barney: You'll have to buy me a couple of cocktails first.
Barney: She made reservations for two deluxe rooms, massages, and dinner at the Palm, and in return, I made her cookies.
Barney: Good times.
Barney: Leave me alone!
Barney: What's going on?
Barney: Diff'rent Strokes.
Barney: You... Been to Ted?
Barney: What's going on?
Barney: No, I would fight for three things, the closing of a stubborn bra, accusations of sexual harassment... 9 of 9! And wanted to vomit when I see someone wearing brown shoes with a black suit.
Barney: I lost my wisdom tooth. Without surgery. Local anesthesia. Frankly, it's nothing.
Barney: Yeah, it was surely the ruckus in the playroom of Eriksen.
Barney: Me too! (Followed by Barney) Guys... watch what face. The next time you see it, it will be distorted as the sexiest possible. Because that's what I am: a real man. I like to fight and do battle in the dirt. You find me a wooden hanger for that?
Barney: It's been what?
Barney: We fought with him. So we will go and tell everyone the legendary story of how we beat types. And everyone will find it great and everyone goes back to bed with me.
Barney: Oh, it's good...
Barney: What I should have done there is a lease.
Barney: I dunno, I typed the eye! I even know what I say! I have a great right, either. You ready?
Barney: No, for that.
Barney: Are you crying?
Barney: It's going to swell to death. You're going to look like Owen Wilson. Come on, we go.
Barney: You... want to touch?
Barney: Your nails?
Barney: your best to not cry when Big came to Carrie at the end of the film s*x and the City?
Barney: Just?
Barney: Exactly!
Barney: It may seem insignificant, but they got to our table.
Barney: And...
Barney:... no one sits at our table.
Barney: Let's beat them up. Ted, come on. You two. Our table.Go. Now!
Barney: Relax, it was Doug. Doug supports us.
Barney: I offer you what? A drink? Money? These two girls over there?
Barney: They know who you are. All right, guys. It lets you go without kick your ass. This time. Okay?
Barney: That was close.
Barney: What is the penalty for assault? I'll have a fine?Picking up garbage on the highway? Because I already did that.
Barney: The Prison?
Barney: You can not go to jail! They are dying in the hallways!And meals are really heavy.
Barney: I hit Ted and me, so...
Barney: You gotta help us, Marshall. We're the Three Musketeers! If I let Ted I how long?
Barney: What? They dropped?
Barney: Weeks, Wolverine... Some are careful.
Barney: We can tell you...
Barney: It's Ted's fault!
Barney: OK, I'm hot. Let's go.
Barney: OK, I'm hot. Let's go. What has happened?
Barney: What do you think of this tie?
Barney: This one is better?
Barney: I'm not scared. It's just that I think once I'd put this tie, I could never remove it. I should wear it again and again. And of course this tie is fine now, but how I will cope when it becomes big and it annoy me? Do I made a mistake? Is what I would have been happier with the other tie? Ted, I can tell you a big secret?
Barney: I do not really talk about the tie.
Barney: I wonder if this will be a disaster. And if it was the worst of all marriage?
Barney: That of Punchy.
Barney: Yeah, no problem, of course.
Barney: Woow.
Barney: Ted, you can hit you something else to this marriage.Let the big binder. The only thing you have to bring it to Cleveland.
Barney: Here's your speech. "In single file, girls. No big. "
Barney: Yeah, you're right. This is Cleveland. "In single file, girls. "
Barney: I'll call you.
Barney: I did not call.
Barney: I'm not a wimp. Nora wanted a professional. Not me.That's it. And yes, Robin, I want chicken wings.
Barney: Stand ready, Cleveland. The last guy who has conned you so hard and then disappeared was LeBron James.
Barney: What?
Barney: It's not just be someone. This is a market survey. You see, my legendary success rate of 83%...
Barney:... never happens by accident. Each technique used to drag a woman has been thoroughly field tested. By eliminating improper techniques in small markets like Cleveland. I know which will go to New York. For example, tonight marks the inauguration of the escaped prisoner. Do prisoners on the run are sexy?
Barney: We'll never know unless I try tonight.
Barney: Prisoners on the run are not sexy. At the same time it was a faulty concept. Next step, the patient zero.
Barney: Wait, wait, wait, before you leave, please do respond to this survey to help me better to seduce you in the future.What does not work for you in this game of seduction? Does A do not you think that I hold a bailiff of the world? B or fingernails disgusts you? (He shows her nails, very long and the girl goes away) Sea...
Barney: Take that. Shows them how much you're great. Say your ad, not ashamed, say that.
Barney: It does not work for you because A vampires are offside, B or pretend that I invented Facebook was a bit too?
Barney: I know what you gonna say. Show in Cleveland, how it goes.
Barney: Sorry. Oh, my God, this is Nora. She finally ended up reminding me.
Barney: I lied. I called, like, five times. Wait, wait! You guys you know better than anyone how I show this stuff. Will you help me please? I would like just once to see what it feels like when you do not quite fair.
Barney: Hi Nora. Thank you for reminding me. The reason I'm calling...
Barney: To tell you how I feel.
Barney: I know it did not work the first time...
Barney:... and it makes no sense...
Barney:... but I can not help thinking that goes well together.
Barney: Is there a part of you that wants to try again?
Barney: I chose the right tie, huh?
Barney: You're a good best man, Ted. You'll cry during the toast, right?
Barney: Between.
Barney: Dude, this is your chance.
Barney: Let me free, Marshall.
Barney: The Robin.
Barney: (On Phone) MacLaren's is bore, snore. Ted, tonight we're going to go out. We're going to meet some ladies. It's going to be legendary. Phone-five! (High-fives the phone)
Barney: You didn't phone-five did you? I know when you don't phone-five, Ted. Come on, we always go to MacLaren's.
Barney: MacLaren's is this much fun. What I'm offering is the chance to have this much fun.
Barney: This hand gesture thing doesn't really work on the phone, does it?
Barney: Get in the cab. Marshall you too.
Barney: I understand. (To Ted) Get in the cab.
Barney: Uhh... because he's getting laid.
Barney: (Doing "I see you" hand motion) Ted, Ted, Ted. Right here. You keep going to the same bar, you're in a rut and I am a rut buster. I'm going to bust your rut (Smiles).
Barney: Ted, what's the first syllable in rutting (trying to make it sound like "routine". Ted gives in and jumps in the cab) Peace out, suckers. (Cab speeds off.)
Barney: First we got to pick someone up at the airport.
Barney: (To cabdriver) Estaban, doors! (Cab doors lock)
Barney: Just this one little thing and the rest of the night is ours.
Barney: I don't know. Maybe her? Or her.
Barney: (winks) Scenario. Couple of girls fly into town, looking for a fun weekend in NYC when they meet two handsome international business men just back from a lucrative trip to Japan. Sample dialogue, "You have a wheelie bag? Wh... I have a wheelie bag!"
Barney: False. Sidebar, tuck in your shirt. You look sketchy.
Barney: Trust me, it's going to be legendary.
Barney: We're building an igloo in Central Park. It's gonna be legendary. Snow suit up!
Barney: Ted, Ted, Ted. Right here! This is happening. Now you can either put your bags on the carousel now, or you can listen to me give you a really long speech convincing you to put the bags on the carousel. Your move. (Silence) Ted, since the dawn of time mankind has struggled... (Ted puts bags on carousel)
Barney: Okay, carousel four is tapped out. Ready? Because I'm about to drop some knowledge. Cute girls are not from Buffalo. Time-out. Ten o'clock. You ready to rock this, Tedder?
Barney: Ted, you klutzy, great guy, you! (Barney shoves Ted into two lady's cart and Ted trips backwards. To Women) Hey, Barney. (Adjusts tie)
Barney: Philly? That's where we're headed!
Barney: Yes, you will. (Girls leave. To Ted) Follow them, tickets on me.
Barney: Hey, is that Marshall? (Takes Phone) Marshall, stop whatever you're doing, get in that hoopty-ass Vierro of yours and come meet us in Philly. It's going to be legendary.
Barney: Yeah, yeah, yeah... I sent you some pictures on my phone, check it. (Pictures show Barney doing "I see you" hang gesture) Philly! (Hangs up. To Ted) Admit it, you're having fun. This much fun. Thirty-five thousand feet of fun!
Barney: Let's go talk to those girls.
Barney: Ted, you've been living your whole life in a seatbelt. It's time to unclick. (Unclicks)
Barney: (sits back down) Yeah, sorry, sorry.
Barney: (To Ted) No! No! The night is just started. Look, airport bar. Flight attendants! They'll get your tray table at its full upright position. Say what? (Goes for a high five)
Barney: Don't say you're going to kill someone in front of airport security, not cool. (To security) Not cool.
Barney: This is an outrage. We are international businessmen on an international business trip. I demand you release us immediately.
Barney: (To Ted) Those bags were your responsibility.
Barney: (Stopping him) Please. (Silence) We are international businessmen. My colleague accidentally left the bags there now please let us go before we miss our international business meeting.
Barney: Believe it or not, that duff bag thing worked.
Barney: We are international businessmen...
Barney: Dude, seriously, relax.
Barney: Exactly! (To Ted) We have a lawyer?
Barney: Relax, Ted. We didn't do anything wrong. And, B.T.W, we'd be out of here by now if you'd have tucked in your shirt. (Ted turns his head to face away from Barney)
Barney: (To Ted) We're going to Sascha's?
Barney: Sascha. (Points to Security Woman) She's having friends over for drinks at her house. It's goanna be legen... wait for it...and I hope you're not lactose intolerant 'cuz the second half of that word is... dairy.
Barney: Legendary!
Barney: (On Phone) Marshall, we're going to Sascha's!
Barney: (On Phone) Ted, Ted, Ted. (Does I'm watching you hand gesture) Yes, we are.
Barney: So, uh... you're Sascha's friends, huh?
Barney: Philly!
Barney: (Whispers) Philly!
Barney: (Laughs) Did you hear that, Ted? Dana works security at the Liberty Bell.
Barney: Wow it must be really well cornered off over there. You ever go behind the rope and touch it?
Barney: Ever, like, stick your head inside it?
Barney: D'you ever lick it?
Barney: Hmm... I bet nobody in history has ever licked the Liberty Bell! If someone were to pull that off I dare say it would be... what's the word?
Barney: Legendary, Ted, LEGENDARY!
Barney: Could have licked the Liberty Bell.
Barney: Bong, bong...
Barney: Ted, Ted... you're not even looking.
Barney: Look, our forefathers died for the pursuit of happiness, okay. Not for the sit around and wait of happiness. Now if you want, you can go to the same bar, drink the same beer talk to the same people everyday, or you can lick the Liberty Bell! You can grab life by the crack and lick the crap out of it!
Barney: Thanks, Leonard. Ted, you're missing out on a valuable life lesson!
Barney: No, it has to be the two of us.
Barney: Because, you're my best friend, alright? You don't have to tell me I'm yours. But the way I see it, we're a team. Without you, I'm just the dynamic uno. You know what, fine. If you wanna go home... then we'll go home.
Barney: Good, (smiles) 'cuz we're here! (Hops out)
Barney: Patrice, can you grab my computer from the bedroom?
Barney: Really? Then whatever happened to your plan of spending the last two weeks before your wedding sleeping apart?
Barney: Yeah. It's a dirty story, isn't it? You guys went out to dinner, did it in the kitchen and got caught. Scherbatsky reeks of someone who likes to get caught.
Barney: So you and Lily really think you can spend two weeks apart?
Barney: Night-night tape? Did you make a tape of you saying "night-night" to her?
Barney: Oh, that is so sweet. Why don't you kiss? I love it when two chicks make out.
Barney: What's on there?
Barney: Retail price $319.99. What else?
Barney: Ah, $549.99. A little greedy, don't you think?
Barney: No, I'm training.
Barney: I'm glad you asked. Ted, Robin, get in here! You guys know how it's hard to be friends with me 'cause I'm so awesome?
Barney: Well, this isn't going to make it any easier. I am going to be on... The Price Is Right.
Barney: Yes, in a couple days, Rich Fields is going to call out my name, and I will come on down.
Barney: Are you kidding? T.P.I.R. is not just an indescribably entertaining hour of television, it's a microcosm of our entire economic system-- a capitalist utopia, where consumers are rewarded for their persistence, market acumen and intrepid spirit. I gaze upon the glory of The Price Is Right, and I see the face of America. And it is divine. Plus, you know, hot chicks on sports cars.
Barney: So which one, "A" or "B"?
Barney: I have to decide how to run to contestant's row when they say, "Barney Stinson, come on down!"
Barney: Yeah, of course.
Barney: Hey! Very funny. Just for that, when I win all the prizes, the only thing you guys are getting is Rice-A-Roni and Turtle Wax.
Barney: Check it out. Okay, imagine... imagine, if you will, that this is the $1 space on The Price Is Right wheel. Ready? (he turnst he wheel)
Barney: Close? Close?! It's called The Price Is Right, not The Price Is Close! Oh, man, this is bad. If I don't win the spin-off, and I can't get into the Showcase Showdown, everything's ruined! It's all ruined!
Barney: Okay, guys... sit down, I've got to tell you something. The reason I'm going on The Price Is Right is because I've decided that it's time for me to meet my real father.
Barney: That's right. My father... is Bob Barker.
Barney: That's right
Barney: That's Pops.
Barney: Uh, because my mother told me he was, that's why.
Barney: Mom, who's my dad? All the other kids at school know who their dad is. Who's mine?
Barney: So now I'm gonna go to L.A., be on the show, win the Showcase Showdown, make him proud of me, and then tell him who I am.
Barney: Why is this so hard for you people to believe?
Barney: Calcium promotes healthy teeth and bones.
Barney: Nooo. Oh, my God!
Barney: Thanks, Da... Bob.
Barney: Um... Wrong. Wrong. Wrong. Wrong. Retail price is $1,349.99, so, since you round off, I'll say $1,350, Bob.
Barney: Thank you, Bob.
Barney: $1 billion.
Barney: So, I brought some photos that I thought you might like to see. This is me on my first birthday.
Barney: No, no, I want you to see this. This is great.
Barney: $999.
Barney: I have to be honest, Bob. The big wheel is the only weak part of my game.
Barney: Did you just... I'm ready, Bob.
Barney: Thank you, would you, would you say you're proud of me?
Barney: Please, no car and an above-ground spa? Pass.
Barney: Overbid!
Barney: Oh, I love this.
Barney: Please, please. Please. Let me. 1-8-4-2-1.
Barney: $14,628.
Barney: Before, before we wrap up the show, there's just something I want to say to you.... Congratulations on 35 wonderful years hosting The Price Is Right.
Barney: Have your pets spayed or neutered.
Barney: Well, it's just... If you lived your whole life thinking one thing, it would be pretty devastating to find out that wasn't true. I just don't think Bob could have handled it.
Barney: Anyway, on the bright side. Happy wedding again!
Barney: Are you saying you don't wanna be bros anymore?
Barney: I'm sorry, I gotta let you go. It's just too many good wingmen out there. Ted are you crying?
Barney: Sh! Let it out, let it out.
Barney: No offence Randy, but there is a long list of candidats for this slot. This slot is for vice president of awesome. And you are like assistant under secretary of only ok.
Barney: (in the phone) Pitt, Barney Stinson!
Barney: Yeah. Yeah. So, listen you should meet me in McLaren's tonight.
Barney: So what do you think? 9:30 or 10 o'clock? (They both hang up)
Barney: Starry Porten, Barney Stinson.
Barney: I need a new bro, what do you say?
Barney: Oh, I understand. Duck Stan is a good bro. I'm happy for you. Best of luck. (He hangs up)
Barney: Crazy Willie! Barney Stinson.
Barney: Yes finally!
Barney: Hanging up on you once wasn't enough. (And then Barney hangs up)
Barney: Hey, Randy. Could you come here for a minute? (Randy releases a box. And comes in Barney's office by running) Good news. I'm calling you up to the majors. Starting tomorrow night, how would you like to be my new wingman?
Barney: Hey.
Barney: No, uh-uh. Randy, we never use the word "bro" in the name of a failed Democratic vice presidential candidate.
Barney: You know what? I'm excited about this, Randy. You will be my next masterpiece. It's like with Ted. When I first met him, he was an even bigger loser than you.
Barney: But tonight, I'm going to make you the greatest wingman in the history of wingmen.
Barney: Oh, okay, Randy, let's do this. (Barney wants to pick up two young woman)
Barney: You ready?
Barney: What? What's the matter?
Barney: Randy what are you doing?
Barney: (Finally Randy is ready, so Barney goes talking to the girls) Hey, laddies. Have you met... (He points the finger towards Randy and turns around. But Randy hid under a table.)
Barney: 13 years??!!
Barney: Wait a minute. Wait a minute.
Barney: Ted, this is new york city... You're never gonna drive it. This is a really, really stupid purchase, and I'm sorry, but none of us can support it. Shotgun for eternity!
Barney: I just called it.
Barney: I call that I can call things!
Barney: What, that's it? You're upset because a guy talked loudly near you?
Barney: I got screamed at three times today. Once in Korean. This is corporate America, Marshall. Screaming is a motivational tool, like christmas bonuses or sexual harassment. It's just good business.
Barney: Just because you weren't around for this, I called shotgun for all eternity in Ted's car.
Barney: Dude I can't believe you cried in front of your boss.
Barney: Ooh. ooh. ninjas are cool.
Barney: Gary blauman did it. Guy I used to work with, the guy's a legend now. We were at the morning meeting and old Blauman was getting reamed out but good.
Barney: Pretty much routine at the morning meeting, but then, on this particular day, something amazing happened.
Barney: Oh, snap.
Barney: Eventually, he just gave up and left. And then his cousin's website tanked. And then he became a janitor at an old folks' home and moved into a one-room apartment above a bowling alley.
Barney: No, no, of course not... he died.
Barney: Lily, control your woman. The lesson of Blauman is that when your boss screams at you, you never scream back. That's why there's a little thing in corporate America I like to call the chain of screaming.
Barney: Yes. The chain of screaming starts at the top. Arthur's boss's boss screams at Arthur's boss. Arthur's boss screams at Arthur. Arthur screams at you. You go home and scream at Lily. Lily screams at one of the kids in her kindergarten class. Then that kid screams at her dad, Arthur's boss's boss. And the whole thing starts all over again, Thus completing the circle of screaming.
Barney: It's a circle, Ted, I called it a circle.
Barney: Fine! You want it to be a chain of screaming, it's a chain of screaming. I came up with the circle idea halfway through, 'cause I thought it was a more elegant metaphor, but fine, ruin it! You guys always undermine me when I'm trying to make a point, and I'm sick of it! God, I'm surrounded by idiots! Idiots! See, doesn't everyone feel better now?
Barney: Oh, God.
Barney: Hey, marshall.
Barney: If you go in there with Lily's kindergarten nonsense, you're gonna get torn apart. I'm here to save your life. you hungry?
Barney: What do you want?
Barney: A green tea with lemon for me, and for my friend here, the meatloaf, please.
Barney: Marshall, the chain of screaming is a real thing. Arthur screamed at you... now you have to scream at someone else.
Barney: Yes, you do, or else that anger is gonna eat you alive.
Barney: I don't know. How about somebody who's disappointed you? Someone who's let you down. Someone who's gonna bring you meatloaf when you explicitly ordered a sandwich and gravy fries.
Barney: Yes, you are. That waiter is every boss and every bully who ever embarrassed or belittled you. And how dare he deny you the one thing that you want, that would make you happy at this moment. A sandwich and gravy fries.
Barney: Marshall.
Barney: Hey, what are you guys doing out here?
Barney: Oh, Ted, relax, it's Cuban. People pay to have their car smell like this.
Barney: Oh, Marshall, switch seats with me. I called shotgun for all eternity.
Barney: Well, that's funny, cause I did!
Barney: A 20% tip, really, for that waiter?
Barney: I can't believe it! If you're not gonna yell at the waiter, Yell at me.
Barney: Yell at me.
Barney: What, you think you're gonna upset me? Please, give me your best shot.
Barney: Yeah.
Barney: I'm sorry, I couldn't hear you over the sound of a butterfly landing on a leaf about three blocks away.
Barney: Okay, you got some volume, now give me some content. Make it hurt.
Barney: No, something that's true-- come on. The man made you cry. Make me cry.
Barney: Yes.
Barney: Keep going.
Barney: Okay, now, well, that's just not cool.
Barney: No, I'm kidding... keep going.
Barney: Don't blame this on me, Marshall. I told you to yell at someone beneath you. The circle of screaming is... The chain of scr... Pyramid... the pyramid of screaming! The pyramid of screaming.
Barney: Ted, screaming never solves anything.
Barney: Trust that impulse, Ted.
Barney: You lied and said you were broken up with Victoria before you actually were so you could try to nail Robin and you wound up losing both girls in one night?
Barney: Or it's a chance to mess with her head by showing up with someone hotter. Even better, triple threat-- hotter and bigger boobs.
Barney: Count again.
Barney: So get an escort.
Barney: Why not?
Barney: Oh, gross. What, you have some puritanical hang-up about prostitution? Dude, it's the world's oldest profession.
Barney: Oh, yeah. I bet even Cro-Magnons used to give cave hookers, like, an extra fish for putting out.
Barney: Come on, Ted, let's get you a hooker. It'll be fun.
Barney: Yes.
Barney: That's adorable. Ted, you're such a hayseed. The companionship business is the growth industry of the 21st century. You do realize that one out of every eight adult women in America is a prostitute.
Barney: Withdrawn.
Barney: Is that your water? May I?
Barney: Much obliged. 57 days?! Ted, you are in a slump.
Barney: Yeah, you know what else is in that locker room? A naked dudes hanging brain. Ted, you need a lady. And I've got the next best thing-- Mary. She lives in my building. She's smart, she's hot, she's totally cool.
Barney: You want to judge a fellow human being based solely on one external characteristic? That's racism. And I do not drink with racists. Good day.
Barney: I said good day!
Barney: Yeah, it won't be weird.
Barney: Because you're going to bring your own date.
Barney: Hi, Mary. Have you met Ted?
Barney: See you in two shakes, Mare. You two make yourselves comfortable.
Barney: Dude, your narrow-minded views on professional fornicators were harshing my mellow. So I got you a date for the evening.
Barney: Think about it, this is perfect. A: it will make Robin insanely jealous... B: you get to have s*x with her... and C: maybe by getting to know Mary, you'll come to see that courtesans are people, too. And D: "B" all night long.
Barney: The only people who will know are you, me and Marshall. No one will suspect a thing. They'll just see you with this unbelievably smoking hot girl and... Okay, that's a little bit suspicious. Look, I'm just trying to expand your horizons a little bit tonight. But if you're not interested, fine, I'm out 500 bucks. Whatever.
Barney: Ted, you're my cabron. You think I'm gonna stick you with some toothless tranny from the Port Authority? Look at how hot she is. Robin would be so jealous.
Barney: Oh, please. How's it's going to come out? "Uh, pass me a towel. P.S., I have s*x for money."
Barney: Lily, quit your job. Work at a private school. You won't have to deal with the school board, and you'll make a ton more money.
Barney: She's a paralegal.
Barney: Room 1506. My treat. You kids go nuts. Actually, don't use the mini-bar. Do it. Come on, Ted, do it. This is one of those things you have to do before you turn 30.
Barney: No, lose your virginity. What up. Statistic-- men who have had at least one relationship with a prostitute are 75% more likely to have success in future relationships.
Barney: Withdrawn.
Barney: So you and he aren't...?
Barney: Okay, well, I guess now is as good a time as any. In keeping with tonight's award show motif, I'd like to announce this evening's big twist ending! Vampire Lou, would you do the honors?
Barney: That's all, Vampire Lou. Nicely done.
Barney: No. Mary's just a paralegal who lives in my building. Oh-- ha-ha! And here's the best part-- she has no idea that Ted thinks she's a hooker. Oh, come on. If you don't laugh, it just seems mean.
Barney: I know, it was hilarious.
Barney: I did it to prove a point.
Barney: Stay with me. It's going to come to me. No. Ah, okay, here's the point. You thought that Mary was a sure thing, right? So what happened? She took you up to a hotel room on the first date. All you have to do is be that confident with every girl you meet and your slump is over.
Barney: Come on, dude, you should be thanking me.
Barney: Can you blame her? You called her a hooker.
Barney: Your room?
Barney: I left something in the hallway.
Barney: Watch your steps when you get up, kids, 'cause I am about to drop some knowledge. Relationships are like a freeway.
Barney: No, this is new. This trumps that. Freeways have exits. So do relationships. The first exit, my personal favorite, is six hours in. You meet, you talk, you have s*x, you exit when she's in the shower.
Barney: The next exits are four days, three weeks, seven months--that's when you guys are gonna break up, mark your calendars.
Barney: Then a year and a half, 18 years, and the last exit-- death. Which, if you've been with the same woman for your entire life, it's like, "Are we there yet?"
Barney: Discouraging premarital s*x is against my religion.
Barney: s*x is fun.
Barney: I'll pay you $10,000 for that diary.
Barney: Good one, Ted. I was, uh, six... fourt... How old were you again?
Barney: Dude, me, too.
Barney: Yeah, of course. What, you don't believe me? - It was at camp, so I'm...
Barney: This place in the Catskills. Look it up. I was there teaching for the summer.
Barney: Uh, dance.
Barney: Yeah, Ted, dance. Maybe you've heard of it. It was just a simple summer job, but it turned into so much more. Her name was Frances Houseman, but everyone called her Baby.
Barney: Sylvia
Barney: How you call your loverboy?
Barney: And if he doesn't answer
Barney: And if he still doesn't answer?
Barney: Ooh, why, Lily Aldrin, you saucy little harlot. Could it be that before Marshall took a swim, someone else tested the water?
Barney: Who's Scooter?
Barney: No, Marshall, they say, (with a sad voice) "Oh, look at them, they've only had s*x with each other."
Barney: What are you talking about? We were here yesterday.
Barney: They've only had s*x with each other.
Barney: Okay. I was 16, and it was in a baseball dugout...
Barney: I mean, I was in a subway with a high-priced call girl...
Barney: I was accidentally hacking into NORAD'S computer...
Barney: All right! I was 23, and it was with my mom's 45-year-old divorced friend, Rhonda. She called me "Barry" the whole time, and for two weeks, my comforter smelled like menthol cigarettes. You happy?
Barney: Baby and her family spent every summer at Kellerman's. Her dad did not approve of our love.
Barney: Oh, God, no. What can I say, I... had... the time of my life. True story.
Barney:...Dary! Legendary! Dude, I am so excited that you're single again. We're going to conquer New York City. I already have a girl from work lined up for you. Right boob bigger than the left boob, which some choose to look at as bra half empty. I choose to look at as bra half full.
Barney: When will you be ready?
Barney: Ted Mosby, suit up, 'cause here's the plan. There's a Miss Nassau County pageant. We'll pretend to be judges and, yes, our votes are for sale.
Barney: Finish line of a woman 10K. Salty girls on an endorphin high who just want to lie down. Yeah.
Barney: Female acrobats from Montreal. Super flexible. We're going to get "Cirque de So-Laid". What up?
Barney: Of course it's a competition, Lil. How else do you explain... what's his name?
Barney: Kyle?
Barney: That's a great point, Persian nightclub owner.
Barney: How? How would one do that exactly? Seriously, don't giggle. Tell me.
Barney: Not possible. You cannot have s*x on a windsurfing board.
Barney: Glad you asked Lily. I have crafted a list of every vehicle land-based, aquatic and airborne in which/on which it's possible to have s*x. And of those 33 vehicles, I have had s*x in/on 31. Windsurfing board, not on the list, not possible. Oh, P.S., in order to hit 33, all I need is bobsled and the Apollo 11 space capsule.
Barney: This conversation never happened.
Barney: Yes!
Barney: Hum-hum. Not for long. Okay, pep talk. Take a knee. Ted, tonight, we're going to get you someone way hotter than Robin. Okay, Robin's a ten. Fine we'll get you a 12. Or, you know... two sixes. Failing that, four threes. And break glass in case of emergency we'll go the Staten Island, I'll get you 12 ones. Ted, my boy, I'm going to re-teach you... Ah.
Barney: Barney. Ted, we are back. Up here. Up high. Fivin' it up five-style!
Barney: Ted. Ted. Ted. Ted. Ted.
Barney: Let's bail, this place is dead.
Barney: Yes, exactly, plus, we're on a tight schedule. I've got the entire evening perfectly planned out... Spoiler alert: Our last stop is an after hours club so after hours, it's three days from now. What up?
Barney: Yeah. But I didn't get to help.
Barney: Apology accepted. Let's go.
Barney: I'm not gonna remember that. Now, if you'll excuse me, random chick from earlier tonight, as you shall henceforth be known. Ted and I have a schedule to keep.
Barney: Wow. Wow. Great stuff, Tommy Lee. See what you don't understand is, I'm Ted wingman. It's a sacred bond, much stronger that any... They're making out again!
Barney: They know us here! You're gonna get us in trouble.
Barney: You... your v*g1n*... Ted, this chick is crazy. We're leaving.
Barney: Your place? Thanks, but no thanks, 1994 Courtney Love.
Barney: Okay, this place is actually pretty nice.
Barney: Wrong. Ted has a classic clean-cut look that never goes out of style season after season, burn.
Barney: No, he wouldn't.
Barney: No, he wouldn't.
Barney: Nuh-uh.
Barney: Ted. Who are you gonna side with on this tattoos thing?
Barney: Unfair? I wouldn't let you take care of the imaginary kids I make up to score with single moms. That's it Ted, we're going home. Ted? Ted, you okay?
Barney: You're not getting a tattoo. It's not you. Ted, you are heading down a dark path.
Barney: But you need a plan and you need a wingman!
Barney: This is so going in my blog!
Barney: Okay.
Barney: Hey, guys, what's the big emergency? Oh and B the W: I am never speaking to Ted again.
Barney: What?
Barney: Ted?
Barney: I came here this morning because... I want to apologize.
Barney: See. All this time, I thought you need a wingman to fly, but the truth is you... you've got your own wings now.
Barney: Since you and Robin split, you've been gestating. Growing in your cocoon. And last night... you burst out of that cocoon..., like a majestic, uh... gosh, what is it that comes out of a cocoon? I was always bad at science.
Barney: Nothing, buddy.
Barney: Oh, that's not a tattoo. That, dear boy, is a tramp stamp.
Barney: You know, a ho tat. Ass antlers. A Panama City license plate.
Barney: Oh, yeah, that'll get it out.
Barney: Go for Barney.
Barney: What is it?
Barney: What does this mean? Marshall? Ma...?
Barney: No. (screams) No!
Barney: Ted, do you know how long it takes a woman to decide whether or not she's going to sleep with a guy? 8.3 seconds. After that, her decision is made. She will not change her mind.
Barney: Is it? Describe your first 8.3 seconds with Stella.
Barney: Really, Ted? You think so? Well, tell me, how did the rest of that session go?
Barney: You juggled? I thought you were trying to impress her.
Barney: Magic's not lame.
Barney: Is this lame?
Barney: I...
Barney: Yeah, but Ted provoked me.
Barney: But...
Barney: You can't turn a "no" into a "yes," Ted. Can't be done.
Barney: No, you didn't. You were like, "No, we can't, we're friends. It would mess up the dynamic of the group."
Barney: Oh, right.
Barney: I like this. Seduce the receptionist. That's a great plan.
Barney: Who?
Barney: Ted, every little boy wants to grow up to nail the doctor or the lawyer. Somebody's gotta nail the receptionist.
Barney: Okay, I'm gonna stop you right there, Ted. Your little Stella is not so perfect.
Barney: I went down there and checked her out for myself. Yeah. And while I was down there, I discovered that she had a secret, a terrible... terrible secret.
Barney: Hold on, I gotta pee. (He stands up et goes to the toilets) Okay, I'm back. What's going on at work?
Barney: Oh. Oh, right.
Barney: Hi, I'd like to see Dr. Zinman, please.
Barney: Oh, I just want to see her. Want to look at her, see what she looks like.
Barney: I'm sorry, did I accidentally oprima numero dos when I called? Do you speak English? I want to see her!
Barney: What are your credentials?!
Barney: I want to know who am I speaking with!
Barney: At first she seemed great, beautiful, smart, way out of your league. But then, I overheard this conversation.
Barney: Folliculaphilia.
Barney: Ted, your perfect woman can only be attracted to men with moustaches.
Barney: You're right, Ted. I'm just making that up.
Barney: Y-you don't remember?
Barney: I'll bet anyone ten bucks I can get Ted to grow a moustache.
Barney: I know. I would've done it for free. But, no. You owe me ten bucks.
Barney: Wow. This Ted guy sounds like a real jerk. You know your problem? You're too sweet.
Barney: Oh, yeah. Turns out it's just a Raisinet. Hey, how would you like me to take you out to a fancy restaurant and then go on a shopping spree? Treat you the way you should be treated. Would that make you forget about that Ted monster?
Barney: We just have to go by my hotel room first. My bed was broken. I just have to make sure they fixed it.
Barney: I like you.
Barney: The strippers in this weird time between work and waking the children?
Barney: Really, as usual.? Think the funniest thing that ever happened.
Barney: And twice that.
Barney: Something even funnier happened to Marshall today.
Barney: I have used questionable methods to skip a very silly girl.
Barney: You're kidding me!
Barney: So far. Tells the story, tells the story!
Barney: I'm not kidding. I almost do not want you to hear, because really, for the rest of your life, nothing will ever be as fun and you, curse you for agreeing to hear. You gotta hear it.This is too funny.
Barney: Wait. Expect. I want to say.
Barney: He searched his bag to get his stuff, and... No, say it.It's more fun if you say so. Let me say it. No, say it. You say.Say it. At the same time. No, go ahead.
Barney: He forgot his pants!
Barney: He forgot his pants.
Barney: Respect.
Barney: The pants!
Barney: Good question, there are four reasons for a "meal ex '.1: They want to get back together.
Barney: 2: They want to kill you. As my lunch with Wendy.
Barney: But you did not do it, you've continued to insist.
Barney: Gun! She's got a gun!
Barney: 3: They make you really want your business.
Barney: Or four: You taunt with their success.
Barney: And a hug is like a hug in public.
Barney: The pants! The pants!
Barney: Tell us, what was this concern?
Barney: Fun? Rather, very fun.
Barney: How could you?
Barney: Ted, that's for sure, it's fun to look back when you were a farm girl fresh complexion and a virgin. But all that stuff... Ohio, Karen, in college... it was A.S. "Before Stinson." Now your life is great! Okay, you still live with your ex, which is ridiculous. Laser tag your skills are almost nonexistent. And your wardrobe, it's like, what, you're allergic to fabric quality?Seriously, pull yourself together. What are we talking?
Barney: Pant, pant...
Barney: Why she did this?
Barney: Lily, what are you doing here?
Barney: He "give" something. Understood. Nice.
Barney: Of course, yes.
Barney: Wait. I do not know. Yours had better be really good.
Barney: What about you?
Barney: He forgot his pants. Good thing you came because today it has an important meeting, and it would be embarrassing and not at all funny if it were to show no pants. I will make sure he has.
Barney: Theodore Evelyn Mosby. Of course I gave him. I gave him my word. It is concrete. For cons, I made a few alterations.
Barney: Please, can I have more... pants?
Barney: More...
Barney: The pants. Still tells.
Barney: I just let something like that to my apartment.
Barney: The new head of legal department is Hobes Arthur.
Barney: Not great, it does not matter that Arthur Hobes not like Marshall, he loves no one. It is the people he knows that he has to separate. He just fired, "What's his head? ".
Barney: Yeah, after you turn'm doing... then you can kill you. As "What is his head? ". Now I think it is, where is his head?
Barney: Do you remember when you could smoke in bars?
Barney: Hey, this is a chair, but go ahead and drag it.
Barney: You're right. Going for a smoke.
Barney: I'm not a smoker. I do not smoke on certain occasions.After s*x, when I'm with German, sometimes both at the same time. During s*x, for birthdays, to annoy my mother, just before s*x, on a sailboat. The day the mentor MC mailly eliminated each year, and of course... wait, because God knows it's true: fear of pregnancy.
Barney: I'm always on the verge of sleep Ted.
Barney: And my abs muscle nicotine. I... am... muscular.
Barney: My God, I hope that Arthur is well. I reserve her office in case.
Barney: I'm proud of you guys. I heard how it was difficult to stop smoking for as you, then the part of non-smokers, I tell you hat, so give me your cigarettes and I rid, one at a time.
Barney: It's too stressful!
Barney: I do not bite my nails, I try to suck the rest of nicotine on my fingers.
Barney: What do cigarettes now? You believe they think of us?
Barney: I have a hiding on the roof.
Barney: Oh, I woke up and I smoke. Robin, you know how it's dangerous to wake a smoker sleeps.
Barney: Come on, let's do it.
Barney: Ooh! Somebody you went to Degrassi with?
Barney: Tell me more. Tell me more. Like, did he have a car?
Barney: Sounds to me like he gave you your first "O, Canada!" face.
Barney: Did you ride his Zamboni?
Barney: Wha...? I thought you said you were together all summer.
Barney: You're starting out with two big ones right there.
Barney: I'm sorry, Simon. Here we are nattering on about our big celebrity. What do you do for a living?
Barney: Which brings us to the most important piece of information from tonight.
Barney: So, Simon, how did you guys meet?
Barney: I'm sorry. I've seen "Let's Go to the Mall" about a thousand times, and you, sir, are not in it.
Barney: There's another video?!
Barney: Robin, seriously, just make this easier on yourself and give us the tape.
Barney: All right! You leave me no choice. From this moment on, I will spend every waking minute ching down this tape. I will not sleep. I will not eat. My life will be a living hell of search engines and overseas phone calls, chasing down something that possibly can't be found.
Barney: Michelle? She sounds hot.
Barney: No. What about Lily and Michelle?
Barney: What... (stammers) Do they make out?
Barney: Finish him!
Barney: I want her around all the time. I'd even consider not trying to sleep with her if that's what it takes. Guys, I've decided to seduce Michelle.
Barney: All right. I can't find your video. I've wasted three days tr... What's the matter?
Barney: Yeah, Robin, that was, like, ten years ago.
Barney: Ooh. Really? (Robin starts crying)Oh! Oh, come here.
Barney: Robin, that is the stupidest thing I've ever heard come out of your mouth. You want to be 16 again? I have watched your first Robin Sparkles video 1,000 times, and it's not because I'm proud of you as a friend. It's because you were totally, totally lame back then. But now, come on. Pa-cow! You're the most awesome person I have ever known. Well, second most awesome.
Barney: No. No. The first is this guy who lives in a place called the mirror. What up?! I'm saying that you are way more awesome than Simon ever will be.
Barney: Your place?
Barney: Are you sure you want to do this?
Barney: Of course. So, should I just put it in?
Barney: Is that Tiffany? Mm-hmm. You are so rad. It's everything I want it to be and more.
Barney: Is that Alan Thicke?
Barney: You know, if you reedit it, there's a tampon commercial in here somewhere. Do you seem how lame you were back then?
Barney: Totally lame. Ugh. And, of course, the robot makes an appearance in the sad love ballad.
Barney: Hang on a second. "A half million dollar fine "any time Mr. Stinson can't 'rise to the occasion,' cue sad slide whistle sounds"?
Barney: Wait, I'm confused.
Barney: In a few minutes, the young me your time will enter through this door. I know it sounds crazy, but to save the planet, you have to sleep with him tonight.
Barney: Vive la vodka.
Barney: I guess I have time for a drink and 45 minutes to an hour for other activities, but after that, I must return to the top secret research project I'm working on.
Barney: My God! How do you know that?
Barney: It does not stop a fight between girls! Ever!
Barney: This is the man of the evening. It's time to let the monster out of his cage!
Barney: Come on, man. People want to see Bruce Banner.They want Hulk. What?
Barney: You're going to seriously continue to wear this hat?
Barney: What?
Barney: The magic tricks? Guys, interventions are meant to help people, not to address every aspect you do not like.Sorry, but it warms me. It makes me boil! I mean, I am filled with a burning rage! (There is a magic trick, but set fire to the banner) Thanks! Oh, sh1t.
Barney: "I can not remain indifferent... "
Barney: Please. "I can not remain impassive while you make the biggest mistake a man can do... get married. Keep my words, it will all part... "Flames! Oh, sh1t! I sent the flame too soon. I had so many important things to say, and... The fact is, Ted, marriage is stupid. Each year there are a million girls aged 22, sexy, who go to bars and call me, "glass half full", but I think they become beasts.
Barney: I meet this challenge.
Barney: Prove that I will be just as great at 80. I'll go out with a girl of 22 years with my old man makeup.
Barney: 83 years. How old are you?
Barney: I think someone owes me $ 200.
Barney: It's amazing.
Barney: I would much Red Bull.
Barney: You're going to get my boat?
Barney: Ted, look across the bar. Three chicks: one hot, one kind of hot and one who I'm assuming is really funny. We ride! What's wrong?
Barney: Yeah, I'm not going to go through that again.
Barney: Hi. Barney Stinson.
Barney: Thank you for your time.
Barney: Fine. I'll have a three-way with hot and kind of hot while Giggles works the camera. I ride!
Barney: Look, I didn't get shot down. Trust me, I'll get the yes. Barney Stinson always gets the yes. This is all part of the plan. After initial contact, I'm now in the ignoring phase.
Barney: Golden rule: I do not buy dinner to get the yes. Dinner's a very intimate activity. It requires a level of connection and eye contact that s*x just doesn't. Call me old-fashioned, but I need to have s*x with a girl at least three times before I'll even consider having dinner with her.
Barney: No, you pent-up old perv. I brought you a present. Recognize this?
Barney: Do you remember how awesome it was to be co-workers... Nay, bro-workers?
Barney: Ted Mosby, it's back on. We're gonna build your building.
Barney: Of course not.
Barney: I need another drink.
Barney: Please. I'll get the yes. Barney Stinson always gets the yes.
Barney: Chrissy, I love your glasses.
Barney: They totally pull focus up from that whole chin situation you got going on. To Chrissy.
Barney: Ted, I admire your loyalty. You've had that hairstyle forever. You don't care that it's out of fashion or that it's been co-opted by the lesbian community. You stick with it. To Ted.
Barney: Man, every time I take out my business card and women see the GNB logo, they throw themselves at me. I miss the chase. It sucks! (...) Man, the courtside Knicks seats that are available to all upper level GNB employees are too close to the action. I keep getting sweat on my suit. It sucks! (...) Man, GNB's benefits package is so comprehensive it gives me the freedom to see any doctor I want. It sucks!
Barney: So, Ted, would you like to split some jalapeno poppers?
Barney: That is so true.
Barney: Oh, that reminds me. I got you a little airplane. It represents the spirit of adventure. Do you like it, Ted? Do you?
Barney: Yeah, I know. You turned it down. We hired someone else.
Barney: What? Ted, it's too late.
Barney: Wow, half? Ted, on behalf of Goliath National Bank...
Barney: Dude!
Barney: You're the world's worst wingman. You know what? I'm out of here.
Barney: We only lied to you to make you realize that you want this job.
Barney: 236.
Barney: Come on, Ted! This is your dream.
Barney: Yeah, Ted. Why aren't you in class? You son of a bitch. I'll call Marshall. We'll draw up the contract.
Barney: Your girlfriend? This is your girlfriend!? It is small and it's your friend? Do not humanize the enemy. But, delighted.
Barney: Come on. Open it. It's p0rn collection! Just kidding. It would be weird.
Barney: This is my collection of p0rn! I offer you my p0rn. Now that it goes really well with Robin, I need more.
Barney: What does that mean?
Barney: What?! I have no love handles. This is ridiculous.
Barney: We gotta go. Goodbye, my dear friends. You were always there for me. We will miss you.
Barney: If you watch this tape, and I knew it... is that you are in possession of all my p0rn. It can only mean two things, either I'm dead or I'm in a committed relationship. If I died, I want you honor my memory by taking my body in the Hamptons and recreating Weekend at Bernie. I want to dance. I want to make love. And I want to go fishing. If, on the other hand, I'm in a relationship, as best friend, I have one favor to ask. Please, for God's sake, get me out of here!
Barney: I can look happy, but do not believe it. Barney Stinson is suited for celibacy. (Marshall and Lily have joined Ted) Out of pity, if our best friends account... And yes, Marshall, I'm his best friend, how you take it? So, get me out of here. And finally, since you hoping to see some p0rn... (Barney turns the camera towards the bed where a woman waits) Do not worry. The green light means it is off.
Barney: It was Legen... wait... the Autumn. Legends of the Fall!It was fun.
Barney: Sorry, I have my own way tonight.
Barney: Super. Relations are deadly...
Barney: Exchanges and compromise...
Barney: Monogamy is the best.
Barney: Tagline!
Barney: More hungry...
Barney: I can... in a minute.
Barney: Did you notice that the beef ribs were absolutely disgusting, but recently they have become delicious?
Barney: Are you kidding?! How could I not be? It's Robin!
Barney: Can you ask me this question. We argue constantly, but you know what they say about relationships, "Every moment is a battle."
Barney: And you know what happens right after a fight? Gender reconciliation. What is different... when you're in a loving and lasting relationship.
Barney: Stack we make love, we order a pizza face and it stays there to moan.
Barney: What was the pizza again?
Barney: It's face.
Barney: s*x... I'm right? Fortunately, it is becoming rare. I'm still hungry. You're hungry?
Barney: What?
Barney: No, this is not one. They had the wrong table. You can imagine we are married?
Barney: Your business is already in my apartment.
Barney: And for your naturalization.
Barney: My mother would be so happy.
Barney: No reason not to do so.
Barney: We get married!
Barney: No, I do not think. (The woman bends down to pick something she brought down) No, actually, I do not know... This is Meg. I do not compare in my mind there. Can you pick me?
Barney: It's not a doll. It's a stormtrooper.
Barney: No, it's protective armor.
Barney: Come on.
Barney: You know, I'm sick.
Barney: The jokes about magic, the stormtrooper...
Barney: thank you God, the song is over. Who was the old devil who sang?
Barney: She was the wife of Archie in All in the family, or the same voice?
Barney: I never make fun of an old lady paralyzed vocal cord...
Barney: I'm not happy. Finally, I would be. Nothing would make me happier than to be happy, but... I'm not.
Barney: We love scotch. It is awesome.
Barney: Exactly. Two awesome cancel out, and... I'm tired of being canceled.
Barney: I think. sh1t. Following happens. After which you and I can not become friends again.
Barney: It's not a stormtr... We're going from here?
Barney: Friends that are found. I like it.
Barney: And then who knows? Maybe in 40 years, if you have not found anyone...
Barney: It's true. Thin. Maybe in 39 years, if you have not found anyone...
Barney: Dad returned.
Barney: What do you mean "too"?
Barney: Guys, we've got a problem. This is the application for the regional doubles laser tag tournament in Poughkeepsie. Problem is, only one of you can be my partner. So it looks like we've got a bake-off. You may now present your arguments.
Barney: And Marshall's the winner.
Barney: Yeah, and it cuts in and out.
Barney: Oh, God, you found one of the cameras. I swear that's the only one. Wait, which one did you find?
Barney: What are you talking about?
Barney: Not today I wasn't.
Barney: Or... or cost-saving alternative: you could get checked out by someone who looks just like him. I'm gonna go scrub up. I'll meet you in stall three.
Barney: Wow, it is like looking into a poorly dressed mirror.
Barney: How you doing, Lily?! Should I have a boner?!
Barney: Hey, you don't mind if I take pictures, do you?!
Barney: Aw, yeah. Smile for the birdie, Lil! Gyno-mite!
Barney: Problem?! You can't get a girl pregnant. That's the dream. I'd give my firstborn to not be able to have children.
Barney: Exactly! Or when your... I don't know... friend invites you to a laser tag tournament, you don't fight it. You just strap on the vinyl holster and race into that abandoned JCPenney guns a-blazin'. I'm just agreeing with Ted.
Barney: I'll show you. "Dad, there's, uh, there's something I need to tell you, and it's going to come as a bit of a shock to you, but here goes. You are speaking to the 2011 Tri-County Laser Tag Co-Champion".
Barney: "Oh, and my sperm don't work. Yeah, yeah, the laser tag thing is awesome".
Barney: Think about it, Marshall. All entrants get 20% off at the snack bar! Oh, BT-dub, the receptionist. What's her situation?
Barney: Bro, that is awesome. Motility five!
Barney: I want to take this moment.
Barney: The last time you and I are just competing for the title of best friend Ted.
Barney: Exactly. Draw. But it's all about to change. Is it correct that you are an architect?
Barney: You draw what now?
Barney: I think you'll love what's happened at work.
Barney: That was my first question.
Barney: Who's going to draw?
Barney: I know. "We're Swedish. It's so cool with our baguettes and our Eiffel Tower. "
Barney: It's France. No matter, I told Bilson...
Barney: Bislon, saving your...
Barney: No, I get up, and I told Bilson...
Barney: Bislon, saving your...
Barney: Music. Imagine a patriotic music.
Barney: Bilson, with all due respect... it would be terrible if a job that would suit American architects was relevant to a band of French. Where is our patriotism? Love of country? Our love of all that...
Barney: Yes. I know a great American architect who would be perfect. Ted Mosby.
Barney: All you have to do is come and offer your drawing, I take care of the Board, the project is yours.
Barney: It's not the best. We three, we'll work together.
Barney: Yes, totally.
Barney: It works like this: one of us goes into the office the other and said...
Barney: Marshall, the teleconference begins soon.
Barney: And then you go up on the roof... and drink beer.
Barney: Basically, it is of "Mad Men."
Barney: I'll spank a secretary.
Barney: What series?
Barney: And then you throw the bodies of cans at pigeons.
Barney: I will realize your dream.
Barney: Ted, it's incredible. Detail. Shadows. The liveliness of the lines. This is exactly what Princess Leia would look like, topless.
Barney: No, that's fine.
Barney: Lily Aldrin, little secretive. For years, I say that our gang needs a Woo, and thou hast hid me in a whole herd.
Barney: Attention Lily. The world badly needs the Woos. If there were not Woos, there would not Girls Gone Wild, no bachelor party girl, no pool bar in Las Vegas... all the things you hold dear would not exist.
Barney: Industry shooters memories would collapse. Just like the glitter body and that of Hummer limos. The mini cowboy hats would be worn by the little cowboys. And when "Brown Eyed Girl" happen on a jukebox, you do not hear... that silence. And "Brown Eyed Girl." But who would Woo, Lily?Who would woo? Would you? You'd... Woo?
Barney: Well you'll excuse me, I have a date with Bataille and Fontaine.
Barney: You did not have.
Barney: The Board... Sven decided to choose.
Barney: I've done everything to change their minds. But they did not budge. I'm sorry.
Barney: Finish Your Beer. Fill the machine.
Barney: It's okay. All withdrawals at ATMs are free.
Barney: Good grief. I told Heather to put everything back as it was on your desk.
Barney: Okay.
Barney: So?
Barney: It looks like we had our man. I not think there need to see...
Barney: Oh, my God. It's me!
Barney: I've never known so far, but I've always wanted.
Barney: What does this button?
Barney: It's building the coolest of the universe. It could not be more awesome.
Barney: It's not my office. The building was well Ted. That of Sven was better. And I will not let the fact that I am the best friend of Ted influence business.
Barney: It's a lie! I chose it because it... He breathes fire, Marshall.
Barney: I have not even paid attention.
Barney: I never made a career choice by selfishness. I am a professional. Go. Spend a good day, drunk, and throw the bodies of the pigeons.
Barney: Like what?
Barney: That's great, Sven. You are so much cooler than Marshall. He has not even mix. Who wants a foam?
Barney: It's the call. Got it? In America, when we work late, you lie on a conference call, and here we ascend a few beers. It's great.
Barney: It turned Sven.
Barney: Those guys were morons. Of course, they had cool ideas... really cool ideas. In fact, I wonder if it's not too late...The fact is: you have the job.
Barney: The committee realized he had erred. In addition, you are precious to them and they want you to be happy.
Barney: Your plans were the best and you deserve it. You should know one thing that you did not get the job early. You see, Ted...
Barney: You know...
Barney: Why you helped me?
Barney: You are truly the best friend Ted. And me too. Tie.Thank you, Marshall.
Barney: Me too, buddy.
Barney: No, even if you pay me. I have an inner ear problem.
Barney: That's right, girls.
Barney: Aaaaaaah!
Barney: The fortress of barnitude? No way.
Barney: Hmm, normally a prerequisite for the women I bring home, but... pass.
Barney: That's terrible. Well, see ya.
Barney: I'd let you, but I don't have any room.
Barney: Hey I'm at a point in my life where my suits are my family. Look around you Lily. You are in the heart of bachelor country, and as a woman, you are an illegal immigrant here. Now,you can try to apply for a s*x visa, but that only lasts 12 hours. 14 if you qualify for multiple entry.
Barney: Wow, you really are desperate.
Barney: Oh okay, you can stay here for two days. But I only have one rule. You can't change anything.
Barney: See that wall? 300-inch flat-screen. They only sell them in Japan, but I know a guy. Had to ship it over in a tugboat like freakin' King Kong.
Barney: Yeah. That doesn't go away.
Barney: Uhm, smells delicious.
Barney: Lily, what was the first rule again?
Barney: And what was the second rule?
Barney: Exactly! There was only one rule and you broke it.
Barney: Lily, if I wanted a fridge full of groceries or fresh coffee in the morning, I'd be in a relationship. But I don't want to be in a relationship. That's why I make it crystal-clear to every girl that walks through that door that this is not a place to leave a toothbrush. This is not a place to leave a contact lens case. This is a place to leave. Come on, 'll give you a tour. Uh, no flash photography please. Bienvenido to the bedroom. Dig this: King-sized bed, full-sized blanket, one pillow. Everything about this bed says "our work here is done." Next we say bienvenue to the bathroom. What, only one towel? What, no hairdryer? You know where I keep that stuff? Your place. Beat it. And the coup de gr&acirc;ce... Yeah, that's right. Patent-pending. And wilkommen to the hallway. While guys like Ted and Marshall may hide their p0rn...
Barney: Aww, that's sweet. While guys like Ted and Marshall may hide their p0rn, I had mine professionally lit. Girls see this, they can't get out of here fast enough.
Barney: No,that's just awesome. So you see, whenever a girl wakes up here, I never have to tell her to go build her nest somewhere else. My apartment does it for me.
Barney: Hey. Did the cold wake you?
Barney: Oh,did you try and take a shower? I'm sorry, I only have one clean towel.
Barney: Okay. I'd offer you some coffee, but I don't have any, so you're gonna have to...
Barney: I think I left something on the bookshelf. Whoops. Oh, no, oh, look (he shows her his p0rn) Oh, I'm disgusting.
Barney: Whoa, uh, okay. Beep beep. Backing up, um...
Barney: What? No. Yes!
Barney: Yes.
Barney: Come on, baby. please, no. You don't understand. What have I done? This is the worst. How could you...? (The girl is gone. To Lily) You're not going anywhere. Live claritin clear. Wow, that was close. That hippie chick wouldn't leave. She was ready to squat here.
Barney: She was freakishly immune to everything in my apartment... Except you. You're better than p0rn.
Barney: How would you like to extend your stay here? All you'd have to do is pretend to be my wife, and scare off the occasional one-night stand. I know,I know. You've got your ethics. You've got your principles...
Barney: Really?
Barney: I'll take it.
Barney: Can you pass the arts and leisure? (The girl does it. More loudly) Can you pass the arts and leisure?
Barney: Lily, I can explain...
Barney: Brava. That was incredible. And that slap was genius. You did not hold back.
Barney: Fair enough. I have to say, it's kind of nice having food around here for a change.
Barney: What? You're my wife. You can tell me anything.
Barney: What did you have in mind?
Barney: Hey, if my bed's going suit up, it's going to do it right. Want to give it a whirl?
Barney: All right, I'm going to head out, hit the bars. What are you going to do tonight?
Barney: Please. (He settles himself on the bed)
Barney: Eh. After the monologue.
Barney: Aaaaaah!
Barney: I can't believe we just... You and I... What have we done?
Barney: "Just went to sleep"? I don't sleep in the same bed as a woman and not make a move. How could... You! You spooned me against my will.
Barney: We... We redecorated my place. We stayed in on a friday night to watch "Letterman", and then slept together and didn't have s*x? Oh my God! We're in a relationship!
Barney: You were supposed to be the vaccine, but you gave me the disease. You gotta go.
Barney: Uh-uh. You gotta go.
Barney: "A certain standard of living"? You didn't pay a single...
Barney: You heard me.
Barney: With Jenkins, of Jenkins, near Jenkins. You said it, I want to put like a sock.
Barney: But huh?
Barney: It's funny, I also had a drinking game based on Robin, Robin finally. At the bottom of her stomach...
Barney: Sorry, you're right. She did not like anyway. She said it woke her up. Does she said "But um" so often?
Barney: Easy, that's the plan: A, layer with Jenkins. Two, I sleep with Jenkins first. Three, the second rule is the first I'm going to rule 2.
Barney: Marshall, you're in the field!
Barney: Owl. The girls with a name ending in LY are dirty.Holly, Kelly, Carly, Lily.
Barney: And not to mention the girls with names ending in I instead of a Y. These girls are like rides. You make the long tail, but once inside, you hold on, hoping not to lose your keys.
Barney: You can not. You must wait three days before calling.This is the rule.
Barney: Sorry. Can you repeat that? I do not mean the I-fuck-ever.
Barney: Jesus.
Barney: Seriously. Jesus began this thing for three days. He waited three days to return to life. It was perfect. If he had waited one day we would not have known he was dead! They would have said: "Jesus, are you? "And Jesus would probably have said," You okay? I died yesterday! "And they would say:" You have the air alive, man. " And they should explain his resurrection. And the miracle. And then the guy would say, "Okay, whatever you want, dude."
Barney: And he will not come back on a Saturday. Everyone is busy doing chores. Weave, cut the beard. No. It looked exactly the right number of days... Three.
Barney: And it's Sunday, they are all already in the church.They are all there, "No, Jesus died." Then, bam! He burst through the door, crossed the aisle, everyone is excited. And by the way, that's where he invented the "tope there! "3 days.We wait three days to call a woman because it is the time that Jesus wants us to wait. True story.
Barney: What?
Barney: We knew he would try to call three days before, so I took his cell phone and changed his number from mine.
Barney: "Piti texting"?
Barney: Yeah. Or... it pretends to Holly and we are in the bath.
Barney: It should. Or... it is said that red is our favorite color and found the look "cowboy" sexy.
Barney: He put the boots!
Barney: Or... we remove our shirts.
Barney: Maybe that door below, a black bra with lace.
Barney: It is hot.
Barney: Too! Tell him we slowly drag our... What do we do?
Barney: The crazy eyes, "I'm going too fast and I will f*ck up everything."
Barney: We all know what it gave.
Barney: And it's coming. It shows all the telltale signs.
Barney: "You like architecture? We should get married. Ha-ha.MDR. Just kidding. So what? "
Barney: "I like beer. We should go to Germany. MDR. JP.MDR. "
Barney: "My parents divorced two years there. It was really hard. MDR. "
Barney: And then we met Stan.
Barney: A guard who works nights.
Barney: And he had not finished.
Barney: No matter. It's OK.
Barney: Well, if Ted does not say, I will. I love you.
Barney: How is this possible? It's all there waiting!
Barney: All was well until he sends a text message for Lily and ruins everything.
Barney: Yes. (Barney out of the bar) Or...
Barney: That's it, man. This is the "I love you."
Barney: Stan. What?
Barney: "I sometimes have dreams about my gay best friend. "
Barney: Easy. You? He speaks clearly to me.
Barney: Okay, one: It has never been proven. Two: If anyone had any dreams about gays one of us would be on me! Finally, look at me. Now look at you. An octogenarian still in her closet would not be in this state.
Barney: I train every day. One thing we know about Ted is that he likes a nice body. This body would vibrate.
Barney: I know. It's weird.
Barney: Crazy, no? Ted had dreams about me gay.
Barney: You can tell us. This is a secure area.
Barney: No more dreams? Nothing disturbing or erotic?
Barney: Machines force you. They want to watch. That's how they erupt.
Barney: And also, it was really funny.
Barney: You work right?
Barney: What...
Barney: Yeah, it will be fun! Look, I'm kidding! It explodes! Do you like magic?
Barney: She'd give it up for a bad pun. I'm telling you, she's a laugh slut.
Barney: And her art? "I'm Lily, I'm an artist." She doesn't even own a beret.
Barney: Then why don't you say it now?
Barney: Perfectly.
Barney: Ted Vivian Mosby!
Barney: Do you kiss your mother with that mouth?
Barney: I don't kiss your mother with my mouth. Yet. (Barney sneezes)
Barney: Is it sick to find maturity and experience sexy?
Barney: I'm fine. I'm fine. My nose is just overflowing with awesome and I had to get some of it out. Now, if you'll excuse me, the holidays are a time when people are lonely and desperate. It's the most wonderful time of the year.
Barney: I don't see any mistletoe, but... (He sneezes on her)
Barney: Uh... "Bless you" would have been nice.
Barney: I'm not sick.
Barney: You know what? I am sick. Sick of you telling me I'm sick. What up?
Barney: Hey, blame Lily and her oppressive "no cigars in the apartment rule." God, it's like Marshall's marrying the Taliban. (he sneezes on his hand). High five.
Barney: Oh, Robin, my simple friend from the untamed north, let me tell you about a little thing I like to call mind over body. You see, whenever I start feeling sick, I just stop being sick and be awesome instead. True story. Yeah, in two minutes, I'm going to pound a sixer of Red Bull, hop in a cab, play a couple of hours of laser tag, maybe get a spray-on tan. It's gonna be legen... Wait for it... (Barney falls asleep)
Barney:...dary.
Barney: This is a low moment for the Barnacle. I should be off playing laser tag right now, but instead... Don't look at me. I'm hideous.
Barney: Exactly. I'm a Ted. I'm wearing elastic-waist fleece pants.
Barney: Yes.
Barney: Too weak... to hold... bowl.
Barney: Ouchie in my mouth! I don't want it. I want ice cream.
Barney: But my throat hurts.
Barney: I hate you!
Barney: Don't leave me.
Barney: No way! March does not have 31 days.
Barney: I gotta go.
Barney: What?
Barney: I'm sorry. Did you just say Canadian Thanksgiving was and I'm quoting,"the real Thanksgiving"? What do Canadians even have to celebrate about?
Barney: Why are you guys even a country?
Barney: Well, there, you said it again.
Barney: Slapsgiving.
Barney: no.
Barney: No, no. The countdown ends at 3:00 p.m., the day after Thanksgiving. I counted it out.
Barney: Uh, thirty.
Barney: Damn it!
Barney: Wait, you're gonna slap me on Thanksgiving?
Barney: That's not allowed. Lily, you're the slap bet commissioner, is that allowed?
Barney: Well, you know what? If you're trying to freak me out about spending Thanksgiving...
Barney:...at your place, then you failed. Truth is, I'm not scared.
Barney: Right. Cause you blew it. The worst part about getting slapped is not knowing when it's going to happen. But now I know exactly when I'm gonna get slapped. So, you took all the suspense out. You showed your hand.
Barney: Nothing but respect for that man.
Barney: Yeah, I'll be there, absolutely.
Barney: Hey, say no more. I mean, when I pulled you out of that burning wreckage, I wasn't doing it to have a battleship named after me. But if you insist, yes, I'll be there for the christening.
Barney: No, I'm not going to wear the medal of honor. That would just be tacky.
Barney: No, no. Thank you, mr. President. (He hungs up) Sorry.
Barney: Please, you took out all the suspense. In a horror movie, the killer does not grab a bullhorn and announce, "Attention unsupervised teens here at the lake house: at precisely 3:00 a.m., I'm gonna jump out of that closet right there and hack you all up with a machete. P.S. fire is my one weakness."
Barney: Exactly. And you know why? Because you don't want to hurt someone you really care about, especially around the holidays. I mean, what decent human being would want to cause any kind of emotional or physical pain...
Barney: Ooh. terrible.
Barney: She's got you making pies for this guy?
Barney: Relapse five! That's where we high-five, then it's awkward for a little bit... and then we high-five again!
Barney: Um, most Thanksgivings.
Barney: I'm not scared.
Barney: Please don't slap me.
Barney: Oh, God! don't slap me again! I don't want to get slapped again, and the first two times hurt so bad, I don't like it! I don't like it one bit!
Barney: Well, you didn't ruin it; you made it so much worse! I can't eat. I can't sleep. I've lost ten pounds; my suits are wearing me. You know what? I'm outta here.
Barney: Why can't I?! Nowhere in the rules does it say that I have to sit through sort of mental torture! You are allowed to slap my face, Sir, but you are not allowed to slap my mind! Good day!
Barney: Yes! In your face! Not my face... your face!
Barney: Marshall, you're not eating. Did something spoil your slap-petite?
Barney: I thought we were done with that?
Barney: Hey, check it out! We're in the last 20 seconds of Marshall's countdown to nothing.
Barney: How does it feel, Marshall,to sit there, impotently... your large, flaccid hand,just dangling in the wind?
Barney: Ooh, classy touch, dude. Too bad!
Barney: I will in... five...
Barney: What?! Wait, you...
Barney: You can not measure something like that in a while. It is step by step. From his bed at the front door. Bam! You're outside. Next!
Barney: Seriously. No chance it works on Robin. It will come, take a look at this idiot and send tampers.
Barney: "The naked guy" works! It will revolutionize the blows of an evening! It's like the forward pass in American football.Dunk the basketball. This stuff barber where they hold the wick and cut above. It changes everything!
Barney: "The naked guy" is more important than me and Robin. All these years, I broke my ass, with my secret identity, my laps and my gadgets. I mean, I'm Batman. But this guy is Superman. He tears his clothes and go.
Barney: You're welcome. There is also "revenge", "bounce back", "parachuting". When you're traveling, but instead of going to the hotel, you'll live in a bar to find a girl to get a foothold.
Barney: "Curiosity," style, "Me have always wondered how to do this is with a great girl." Big guy not a girl, just great. Like...if a normal girl was 2.10 m, 2.25 m high, and... wearing a mini denim skirt. I wonder how it is.
Barney: "Condoms will expire."
Barney: 46!
Barney: You mean the naked genius. All this time I wore a suit when I should have removed it. That's it. I "The guy naked," tonight. And you too.
Barney: With the girl from the elevator. You're with her tonight?"Dude naked"!
Barney: "Dude naked"!
Barney: "Dude naked"!
Barney: I really like... this girl, but... I had not seen from behind. I really like... this girl. And I am willing to compromise our future for a night of glory. "Dude naked"!
Barney: Thanks for letting me see your aquarium. You save my life.
Barney: I just go to the bathroom and I'm off. Ted, I do. I "The guy naked"!
Barney: You...
Barney: It's great! Why did you change your mind?
Barney: Great! OK, the important question: What will your pose "naked guy"?
Barney: I thought "Superman."
Barney: And "Oops, I did not have you seen?"
Barney: And the Heisman?
Barney: The "Burt Reynolds".
Barney: The Olympic gymnast successful landing.
Barney: "Dude naked"!
Barney: I take my costume. It is expensive. Just tie...
Barney: Call me.
Barney: thank you God.
Barney: I'll make Ted swear not to tell anyone what he knows about you, and he'll cave immediately.
Barney: Nice.
Barney: Then we pretend to break up.
Barney: God, you're smart!
Barney: Oh, hi, Lily. We were just in the neighborhood, thought we'd get some lunch. We didn't even know you'd be here. (Marshall takes a photo of her).
Barney: I didn't catch your name. Did you guys catch her name?
Barney: Really? Laid, you say?
Barney: She hot?
Barney: And she's looking for some action. Sounds to me like she could be a cougar.
Barney: A cougar. An older woman, usually in her 40s or 50s, single and on the prowl for a younger man.
Barney: Marshall, I've thought it over and I accept your challenge.
Barney: Tomorrow, the cougar hunt begins.
Barney: Oh, now you're gonna bash her figure. Real classy, Ted.
Barney: Okay, let's take a look. Oh, yeah, it's a cougar all right. A prime specimen. See, you can identify a cougar by a few key characteristics. Start with the hair. The cougar keeps up with current hairstyles as a form of camouflage. The prey may not realize that he's engaged a cougar until he's already being dragged, helpless, back to her lair. Now, the blouse. The cougar displays maximum cleavage possible to captivate her prey. If you're watching them bounce, she's about to pounce. See the claws? Long and sharp, to ward off rival females... Or open alimony checks. Yeah, this one's a beaut. Okay, let the hunt begin.
Barney: Who do you rather have grading your papers: a savage, man-eating jungle cat, or a purring, satisfied kitty?
Barney: Direct. I like that. The name's Barney. What I want... is you.
Barney: Oh, my god. Incredible.
Barney: C minus? What are you talking about? I just pulled an all-nighter!
Barney: I know, I know.
Barney: Look, I miscalculated. I thought she'd be old and fragile, like most cougars. But kitty's got claws. Don't worry though. Tonight, I'm seeing her again.
Barney: I promise you, after tonight, that cougar will be my pet, and I its master.
Barney: I think I'm falling in love with you.
Barney: What? No.We had s*x yesterday.
Barney: Do you not see the powerbar in my hand? I'm fueling up.
Barney: Oh, yeah. And tonight, just like John Mellencamp, I am going to get rid of the "cougar" once and for all. Get it? 'Cause that's what he did with his name.
Barney: I can't stop thinking about you. Please give me another chance.
Barney: But you don't understand. See, I've been going easy on you, holding back, 'cause I was afraid you'd break a hip or something. But, this time, no mercy.I don't care how long it takes days, weeks, half a year.
Barney: That's not true. It's just temporarily dislocated. Seriously, I'm fine.
Barney: Yeah, she was.
Barney: B-plus?! Marshall, after I've gone through my eight weeks of physical therapy, I am going to get you that "A"!
Barney: It was an amazing safari. I can't wait to show you guys the slides!
Barney: The Ho-be-gone Sleep System
Barney: Ted, wait.
Barney: The daughter of the lottery is there.
Barney: Look. It's funny. I invented a little game
Barney: Your age on arrival in New York after a photographer you have "discovered" to be published in Vogue.
Barney: The number of nude photos that he has done before you realize he had no connection to Vogue.
Barney: The age that you say you have.
Barney: Your real age.
Barney: The number of minutes for me to put in a taxi, get undressed and into my Jacuzzi.
Barney: What happens after that is out of the jacuzzi. Great?
Barney: I listening.
Barney: Mine: "From all of us in Barney's apartment, get out."
Barney: It just fell.
Barney: Bizarre. Look at what is mixed with your fan mail.
Barney: It comes from the Ministry of Immigration.
Barney: I can not believe you that turns the country.
Barney: Unless a bear attacks you in 3 seconds with your legs and you break his neck, it has nothing to do in your demo.
Barney: Folks, sorry to stop you before Marshall falls into tears, but Robin, check it out. What you need is a super video resume. Like mine. I present to you: Barneysvideocv.com.(The video starts with an explosion) Hello. Barney Stinson, you have achieved great successes in business, sport and personal relationships, and have been an inspiration to many people.
Barney: How could that be me? He is an Englishman. What would you recommend to your many admirers who want to reach the peak of their potential?
Barney: The first thing to know about success is that it will not come to you. Most people associate success with money and power, but in fact it is a mindset.
Barney: And when it comes to success, the only limit is that there is no limit.
Barney: Exactly. Because that's what the world wants to work.People who seem to take risks, but never do anything. In fact, you do things will turn. I write a book about this phenomenon.
Barney: No, it would be... You listen? All my life I have dared to go beyond the possible. Until the impossible? In fact, beyond that... where the possible and the impossible meet to become... the possimpossible.
Barney: Inventing your own word shows creativity and vision..."Visia-ness." If I can leave you with one thought, is this one: nothing... and all... is possimpossible. (Several assembly passes with a song) This guy is awesome.
Barney: Absolutely not. It would be stupid. Stinson, Barney Stinson singing this song, it would be really stupid. One of the fans who think this guy is awesome. Perfect and available.Great, Great, Great, Great, Great, Great... Great, great. Barney Stinson, committed. This jewel has earned me 11 jobs.
Barney: Now, we talk about it.
Barney: OK, we should get started. I have much to shoot, I can not use the tapes I have of you.
Barney: Let's start.
Barney: What does it mean to be a reporter for you?
Barney: Cut! You're mired in details. We need you to be vague, at ease with buzzwords like "synergy" and "dynamism". You can invent a word, as... "Relationality."
Barney: All right. Do not do it. There are many exciting stories to cover in Canada. I just read it, the nephew of the mayor of Winnipeg went fishing on the ice and took a pole of 7 Kg Live from the worst place in the world, I'm Robin Scherbatsky.
Barney: I like it.
Barney: Come on!
Barney: relationality, this is mine.
Barney: Showdown. You're not the first to wear it here. But it expresses the power. And that, too. Now, I need you break these 15 bricks with your forehead.
Barney: I am a man. You're a woman. Assume that you can do nothing. You must prove that society is wrong.
Barney: There is more in 1950. Yes, you can.
Barney: Why?
Barney: What's the matter?
Barney: Oh, my God. It's horrible. It'll be along to commute.
Barney: I've finished your video resume myself. I posted it to all channels of the city. A guy called from Channel 8. He adores you. He wants you to pass an audition.
Barney: I said no. Robin Scherbatsky do not audition. He is given the job or anything.
Barney: No. He cursed me and hung up. But after Channel 12, called. They'll love it too. They offer you to host their new talk show in the morning.
Barney: I sent them sh1t.
Barney: They want you even more. So they increased their offer by 10%. Congratulations. Looks like you'll have to stay.
Barney: I am the master of possimpossible.
Barney: This is incredible!
Barney: I have big news!
Barney: Okay. My thing's pretty huge. But fine, you can go first.
Barney: I just find a porno starring Ted Mosby!
Barney: I'm talking about welcome to the s*x plane, and look who plays the navigator, Ted Mosby (He shows a porno dvd)
Barney: All right. Let's meet your new doppelganger. Or should I say doppel banger.
Barney: Probably not the same guy.
Barney: Oh, hey, hey-o. New guy entering the cockpit. Could it be the navigator, Ted Mosby.
Barney: Yeah, and I'm sure complete accuracy in all those details was very important to the directors... "Dirt and skank, the raunch brothers".
Barney: And I found a porno starring Ted Mosby.
Barney: I know, right?
Barney: Congratulation for us all.
Barney: The fact that I found a porno starring a guy named Ted Mosby... Let's do it!
Barney: Ted, Ted, Ted, guy in the hat! Three stripes, ladies and gentlemen, I give you Ted Mosby, p0rn star.
Barney: See, this is way better than Marshall's intership.
Barney: More around the eyes.
Barney: Hmm. You're not wrong. (He looks on his phone) According to the web site, of the far superior Ted Mosby... he's been in the business three months, and he's made 125 movies.
Barney: Oh, he is good. Classic seduction technique.
Barney: Oh, I use it all the time. First I buy her... and by her I mean you... a drink. Now, I'm the guy who gets her what she wants. Then I pretend to care about whatever idiotic thing she cares about. For you, that would be the enviroment. Now, I'm the great guy who shares her interests. And before you know it, you're naked in my apartment, shouting "oh-oh Bar-r-r-ne-e-y"! And by you, I mean her.
Barney: That comes later. At dinner. He did invite you to dinner, didn't he?
Barney: Don't wait up.
Barney: Affirmative. Or to put in another way... God bless America.
Barney: Robin again? Ted, the universe clearly does not want you and Robin to be together. Don't piss off the universe. The universe will slap you.
Barney: That wasn't me. That was the universe.
Barney: I see where this is going. Ted, waiting naked in a girl's bed wearing whipped cream undies does not work... usually. The setting-- Martha's Vineyard, 1999. The characters: Yours truly and a raven-haired au pair by the name...
Barney: Nice try, buddy.
Barney: Ted, she is going on that camping trip. Dude, barring some act of God, Robin's gonna be with Sandy this weekend.
Barney: What are you talking about?
Barney: Ted, do you want me to slap you again? 'Cause I kind of enjoyed it the first time.
Barney: Yeah.
Barney: Sure. I mean, even though we stopped having s*x, we still get together, like, once a month to chat and catch up, and of course I'm not in touch with her!
Barney: Did you just say a "rain dance"?
Barney: A rain dance.
Barney: A dance to make it rain.
Barney: No, we are not!
Barney: Ted, you're forcing me to be the voice of reason, and it's not a good look for me!
Barney: Come on, I know it didn't work out between us, but we did... have a relationship.
Barney: Twice!
Barney: Shh!
Barney: Hey.
Barney: We weren't exclusive!
Barney: Wow, it took five shots of tequila to get you in that position.
Barney: There's so much of your mom in you.
Barney: Ted, this is funny. Still funny. Still fu... And now it's sad.
Barney: Hey, Ted. Whatcha doing?
Barney: Dude, that's not a rain dance, that's a fat kid with a bee in his pants.
Barney: These are your awesome years. You're wasting them on this girl. This isn't gonna work!
Barney: Well, then why are you doing this?
Barney: Oh, come on!
Barney: How about that? He did it.
Barney: What the? Haha, joke's on you, I have a cold.
Barney: Marshall ran away from a cockroach.
Barney: Oh, yeah, sorry, my bad. You're a man.
Barney: Was that chick at the end really a client?
Barney: We're signing up.
Barney: Ted, these chicks are desperate and hot. That's a perfect cocktail. Shake well, then sleep with.
Barney: Come on.
Barney: Ted, hurry, you gotta help me. My boat is sinking.
Barney: My boat is sinking.
Barney: Come on, Ted, this is an incredible opportunity. We'll meet our soulmates, nail 'em and never call them again. (chuckles)
Barney: Gosh, thanks, Ellen. I sure hope this works. I'm so done with the single life, all the games, the meaningless s*x.
Barney: That is so true, Ellen. I really think I'm ready to stop being a me and start being a we.
Barney: It's kinda hard to talk about with Ted here, but I just want someone who's not afraid to hold me at night when the tears come. Ellen, can you help me find her?
Barney: What?
Barney: Oh my God, people do that.
Barney: What's the hard way? Security roughs me up and tosses me out?
Barney: OK, Ted, let's go.
Barney: Hey, seriously, you have to stop doing that.
Barney: So did you get a good look at it?
Barney: Hit the horizontal ten-legged interspecies cha-cha?
Barney: Oh, yeah, we do that behind your back. Ted-out: to overthink. Also see Ted-up. Ted-up: to overthink something with disastrous results. Sample sentence: Billy Tedded up when
Barney: Wow, Ted, sounds like you're her perfect woman.
Barney: You wanna be her boyfriend. She already has a boyfriend. It's uncanny.
Barney: Come on, Lily, don't hate the player, hate the game.
Barney: The doctor will see you now.
Barney: (chuckles) Happy ending.
Barney: All right, see you later. Happy hunting.
Barney: Yeah, we're gonna make some crop circles.
Barney: I didn't get your message until I woke up. Bro, I am so sorry.
Barney: I know it must be tough. But are you ready to hear something that will not only make you feel better but will actively excite you?
Barney: For the first time ever, the three of us are single at the same time. I've dreamed about this day boys and it's going to be legendary! Together, we will own this city. Any time, a girl wants to get back at her ex-boyfriend, we'll be there. Any time a girl wants to solve her father issues through promiscuity and binge-drinking, we will be there. Any time a bachelorette party drives through the city in a limo sticking their heads out, shouting "What's up New York?" we will be what is up New York! Gentlemen, we are about to embark on... (While he's speaking, Barney looks at Ted and then at Robin). Oh man, you guys did it, didn't you?!
Barney: So he stays home all the time not getting laid? No, see, that's what you do when you have a fiancée. He should be down here celebrating. He's free. He got that red-head-tumor removed.
Barney: You know what Marshall needs to do? He needs to stop being sad. When I get sad, I stop being sad and be awesome instead. True story.
Barney: Have you tried breast-feeding? Nailed it!
Barney: Mmm. Sunshine.
Barney: Do you know why you're not over Lily yet? It's 'cause you can still picture her naked. You can't get over a woman until you can no longer picture her boobs. It's a scientific fact. The average male brain can only store a finite number of boob images, or BPEGs and your hard drive's filled to capacity with Lily's.
Barney: They won't go away until you overwrite them with images of other women's boobs. Now, this journey may take as many as a million boobs so we begin here tonight my friend. Two at the time. Those count as four.
Barney: So what's your prescription, Dr Oestrogen? Eat H&auml;agen-Dazs and Watch Love actually until your periods sync up? (Ted and Barney laugh)
Barney: Those charges are from a month ago.
Barney: For new charges, you have to go to her online account. You can see credit card activity from like two hours ago. But... You know... Don't... (Marshall leaves the bar, running).
Barney: He needs her password. Its not like he has her password. Ooh, he has her password. This is... He has her password.
Barney: You want me to baby-sit him? 20 bucks. An hour. And money for pizza.
Barney: OK, I'll do it! Stop being a couple.
Barney: No!
Barney: Bold. Bold to go for the car.
Barney: Barney.
Barney: We're at a fundraiser helping young women raise money for college.
Barney: Yeah, he's here and he's great. Hang on. Marshall, tell Ted... Uh-oh.
Barney: He's gone.
Barney: Crap, you're right. OK, here is the plan. Here is the plan. You go down to the hotel and find him. I'll stay here and get a lap dance. Bye Ted!
Barney: Exactly. I say, Marshall, my good man, how's my bow tie?
Barney: Ah, bully!
Barney: Wow, that's pretty cool. When I was a kid, I knocked down the blue whale.
Barney: I was six. My uncle Jerry brought me here for the day. He said, "Don't touch anything". To a kid. That's like someone telling us "Don't look at that girl's perky and impossibly symmetrical knockers."
Barney: So, naturally, I snapped the rib off a triceratops, blahbity-blahbity-blue, I knocked down the whale. I'm surprised security didn't stop me on the way in.
Barney: It happened. And these people don't forget. This is not the Natural Stuff That Happened No More Than Five Minutes Ago Museum. Huh?
Barney: The Captain?
Barney: Ahoy.
Barney: Challenge accepted.
Barney: Ah, that's the stuff.
Barney: Impressive. Try this on for size.
Barney: I live for the dance.
Barney: Sorry, sorry.
Barney: This is ridiculous. We are two grown adults standing among the greatest collection of natural artifacts in the Western hemisphere, and look at what we're doing.
Barney: Want to go touch a bunch of stuff?
Barney: Niled it.
Barney: Thank God you're here. She's been messing with the exhibits.
Barney: Oh, yeah, that story is legend... (phone ringing) Hold on....dary. And, um, would you happen to know what that young man's name was?
Barney: Thank you.
Barney: Who's the master, Leroy?
Barney: Uh, no, uncle. Jerome Whittaker is my uncle.
Barney: Jerry's my uncle.
Barney: It was that day... July 23, 1981. My mom got pretty mad that he let me destroy a New York City landmark.
Barney: He never came around anymore after that. Think he moved away.
Barney: But you do know, you do know. That's the thing. You know. He's my dad.
Barney: I don't want to do anything. Don't tell anyone about this, okay?
Barney: And Liddy would be all...
Barney: New plan: Meet me at the entrance in five minutes.
Barney: I suggest we play a little game I like to call, "Have you Met Ted?"
Barney: (Taps Robin's shoulder) Hi! Have you met Ted? (Leaves)
Barney: (hits him) No! As your sponsor I will not let you relapse. You blew it; it's over-move on.
Barney: Yeah, cuz nothing says "Casual" like inviting a hundred people over just to "Mac" on one girl. Oh, and Lily-that's my leg.
Barney: What's so special about the roof?
Barney: Solid plan, my little friend.
Barney: But may I suggest one little modification.
Barney: That foxy young thing you were chatting up, take her up to the roof and have s*x with her! Crazy monkey-style.
Barney: Should be the plan, I mean look at her. Ted, look at her. She's smokin'!
Barney: Exactly! Ted, let's wrap. Statistic, at every New York party there's always a girl who has no idea whose party she's at. She knows no one you know, and you will never see her again. Do you see-where I'm going-hu-with this?
Barney: Aargh! (Pulls down imaginary scope) Scoping, beep, scoping, beep!
Barney: beep, beep, beep, beep. Target acquired! And now it's time we play a little game I like to call "Have You Met Ted?"
Barney: (taps woman) Hi! Have you met Ted?
Barney: Do you know Marshall? Lily?
Barney: Hmm, do you know anyone at this party?
Barney: Excuse me, (to group) Anyone know a Carlos?
Barney: On a silver platter! Bon appetite!
Barney: Your loss, her gain. (To Tatiana) Excuse me, can I show you the roof? It's magical up there!
Barney: Dude, Robin's not coming.
Barney: Oh, you were so right about the roof. The roof. The roof is on fire, Ted! Girl from last night, took her back to my place then this morning took her outside, spun her around a couple of times sent her walking-she will never find her way back and there she is. How did she get here? Did you invite her?
Barney: She said she works with Carlos, who's Carlos?
Barney: Grr. (Turns around) Hi, you. You're back.
Barney: "sweetie"? Really? (They walk into the kitchen Barney mouths) Sweetie?
Barney: So, it's over between me-and-works with Carlos girl.
Barney: Yeah, I was trying to think what's the quickest way to get rid of a girl you just met?
Barney: I think I'm in love with you.
Barney: Thanks, bro (walks away)
Barney: Oh, this is lame.
Barney: lame.
Barney: Of course.
Barney: Who? Who invited you? No one even know who you are!
Barney: Who is Carlos!?
Barney: Yeah well, "the one" is heading up to "the roof". (Robin leaves to the roof with Carlos)
Barney: Unbelievable. That is just a recipe for disaster, they work together (Carlos and Tatiana are making out)
Barney: Oh, please, what does Carlos have that I don't?
Barney: I'm not sure I like her.
Barney: It all started a week ago.
Barney: I spent time at a local bar. Entered... a lady.
Barney: Aside from a woman who appreciates a nice tie.
Barney: It was not my best tie.
Barney: So, right after that, I took her home.
Barney: Fortunately, the cleaning lady comes tomorrow.
Barney: What? Wait, what? I thought your body would become a machine fueled by desire, greed and a hunger only to satisfy my every carnal desires.
Barney: I could be more unfortunate. All night, she goes back on me. I brought her back home and she runs away? When I loose a daughter, I am polite to sleep with her before. It is good manners.
Barney: Continuous. Continues.
Barney: Kashmir? This is the virgin merino hand-woven. The fibers of this costume are spaced less than 12 microns.
Barney: Well, you're lucky, because mine are the tightest. And touched, they are more gentle.
Barney: She did it too!
Barney: You try this sh1t of course you're alone, look at you, poor trail.
Barney: Did you just say you got a kid!
Barney: Completely.
Barney: Of course. Well...
Barney: Just tell me how!
Barney: Excuse me, someone is using this stool?
Barney: I will not give up, but yes. For, thanks to the book of Ted...
Barney: I can have two shots ahead. There is a flaw in there and I will get it.
Barney: I can not believe. Friends... This is it! She wrote the book! It must be named Anita. My plan was to sleep with her but it changes everything. New plan: I'll sleep with her.
Barney: This Pilates teacher broke all scores. Imagine Robin, but younger. And bigger breasts. Not bigger, but more shapely.And larger. (Robin phone) I put on the StairMaster and...
Barney: Spoilers. Regardless, we did.
Barney: sh1t. I read this entire book and I find no fault. What will I do?
Barney: Tell me.
Barney: A great date? It's not very catchy. And if I say a mega date?
Barney: Okay.
Barney: You're going to plan everything? This is cutesy and romantic?
Barney: What are you doing?
Barney: They look at us.
Barney: Really? You really gonna do that?
Barney: It looks to me like cutesy and romantic. Box strip?
Barney: Why did you do that?
Barney: Why are you angry against me?
Barney: The period of mourning? She has not had a period of mourning.
Barney: What, she is upset?
Barney: You should have seen.
Barney: We go back home...
Barney: I can not believe that Robin is upset.
Barney: I did worse after the premiere of "The Phantom Menace."It's been like that since we broke up?
Barney: I know where.
Barney: I know you're upset.
Barney: You sure you're not upset?
Barney: You're not another number for me.
Barney: I knew I was a bad boyfriend, but I had no idea that I was worse in the former boyfriend. I'm sorry. How can I be forgiven?
Barney: Stop saying that, I'm serious. Ask me what you want.
Barney: I promise.
Barney: It will not go super hot date. It is you who will go.
Barney: I wanted to call you.
Barney: I'm sorry, I... I made a promise to a friend. I must say no.
Barney: No.
Barney: No.
Barney: No.
Barney: No.
Barney: No.
Barney: I'm sorry. The answer is no.
Barney: Here is my story.
Barney: I hope so too.
Barney: You think about it? You hardly know him. In addition, the guy is a draw with a job that is worthless.
Barney: And we could not be more proud of you, my angel.
Barney: All right. As a former... before you embark on anything, I'm meeting this guy. I think it's pretty weird not having yet met.
Barney: I promise.
Barney: I'm doing this contortionist Portuguese, and I swear... it is so flexible, at a time, it was about me and beneath me. A top and a bottom! One and two! Which is empty?
Barney: I appreciate you, Don. Both, we love a good scotch, one likes my stories compelling. And we went out with Robin.
Barney: In short, the arms of the Erasmus student have dropped and there fell of my swing. Seriously, I have not found a girl who can do that from Robin.
Barney: Well, there you should also apologize. We said some pretty hurtful.
Barney: That was after you to be part.
Barney: I can not wait, buddy.
Barney: I have to get Robin.
Barney: I do not know what it is, but I want to get Robin.
Barney: I had perhaps not done playing with. I just left to play with something else for a while.
Barney: Ready for what?
Barney: Hanging out with Robin was a huge mistake.
Barney: What?
Barney: My pleasure. Dear Barney... the future... This ink is too cool.
Barney: You... and Robin...
Barney:... a couple were atrocious. It did not work. You always love Robin, but remember the other women... And above all, the other breast, and all the cool stuff you do with breasts... Y to the head, juggle... squeaker squeaker... I'm a hopeless romantic.And there are drawings of breasts.
Barney: I understand. I really want it back.
Barney: It's too easy.
Barney: My chair!
Barney: Me too, man. More than you, certainly. Instance. Super spicy. I feel bad.
Barney: This pepper is an ice cube in my mouth.
Barney: Don Tokyo... You ever do that... in Japan? Wasabi!
Barney: I stay on my position. It was bold and romantic.
Barney: Come on. Did you do stupid stuff to impress Robin.
Barney: You have not turned the page. You want it as much as me, but you not admit it.
Barney: For my biographer?
Barney:... I want to sleep with her, at least one last time. She is mine!
Barney: Okay. We must get rid of him. You know, metaphorically.
Barney: Or... literally. That's how it starts! I'm afraid, Teddy!
Barney: Robin Stinson!
Barney: Robin Stinson!
Barney: Okay, wait. What do you say to that? It is being shared?I take up to 40 years and after you can have it.
Barney: You're right. I go to you... I go to the bathroom. And then I'll break...
Barney: It's BarnExclussif.
Barney: Ted calls you? Indeed, he has a problem.
Barney: It's true. I'm going to leave before something regrettable.
Barney: Robin, I love you!
Barney: I brought the blue French horn! Ted has just given me.Sorry, I was there before you.
Barney: All right! Here we go! You, Me and Ted!
Barney: We won the fingers in the nose...
Barney: Good night, Dad.
Barney: Dad?
Barney: Damn, Ted was torn. Embarrassing...
Barney: So what's going on with Robin?
Barney: I agree. In fact... I even wrote another letter. Dear Barney the future, you think you want to get Robin, thou wilt not true. Let her. Sincerely, Barney's past.
Barney: Give me that.
Barney: In my defense, the breasts, is not it great?
Barney: Well, I must go to Stella. Tonight is the big night. I tried before, I always failed. This time I will succeed. Tonight... I am a lesbian. Robin, your lipstick.
Barney: Hi, Ted.
Barney: T-Diddy! You've missed that!
Barney: First, I no longer have my gold medallions. I sold them when they are out of date, 400 years ago.
Barney: Yeah, and I want another drink for this girl, Doris. I know I can ask this aircraft lesbian.
Barney: You can be at 22h.
Barney: No thank you. I play not with aquariums unless they are my two favorite animals: the pilot fish and torturlute. Did you see!
Barney: Marshall.
Barney: Lily.
Barney: Stella.
Barney: I fall not rest until we not make me respect for another person's knuckles brushing against mine so sweet, but manly.Small, small... Small, small... Small... Who's the baby? Know that as long as it does not have what he wants. No, deserves.This fist will not waver. It... bow... not.
Barney: Guys, I'm sure the dog had to soaring after swallowing the tablet X. Too good! Go!
Barney: Air Hockey. Well done my fat.
Barney: Seriously, I thought it was the only one. Too much!(Robin arrives in the basement) You're glowing. Tape the Barnacle.
Barney: How so?
Barney: Naughty.
Barney: You can not.
Barney: If you call now, you'll regret it. I slept with me full of women who were then sent to graze and then decamped. And sometimes they take the phone and they call me and do it again. And when we finished, I see that look on their faces, that look that says they hate themselves and they would never have known. But if you could see this look... In fact, you can see that look, there is a video, http://www...
Barney: This is the look.
Barney: I'll give you $ 100 for hitting my fist. $ 200.
Barney: $ 10 000.
Barney: They are magnificent... manly tears of pain. They are not emotional. They are a little emotional.
Barney: Robin, hangs up. Do not do that.
Barney: Do not do it. It's scary to bet on itself, if you do not, nobody will. I'm not saying that to pat my fist. Even if a punch would be great. I mean it.
Barney: Oh, yes. Tape for safety.
Barney: You can not beat A.C. Pity! Nobody needs to know.
Barney: Chronicles of the Oscar-winning on urban neurotic.Tape!
Barney: Small town, big men, then tope.
Barney: Silence embarrassed. Tope then.
Barney: Look, it did.
Barney: You think you're there for something?
Barney: Oh, my God! Thank you! Oh, I killed my arm. My arm has never been so sore since I was 13 the day I knew how to close the bathroom. Cool!
Barney: If I could see her naked. If I could see her naked. If I could see her naked. And fours.
Barney: Ted has a little sister who is so playful every day. And if I meet with her breasts, I will play! Little sister, Little Sister!What? I can also celebrate Hanukkah.
Barney: Hi. What are you doing tonight?
Barney: Why, hello. I was expecting you.
Barney: I needed one that rotates.
Barney: Can I talk to one second in the kitchen? Not touch the chair. I praise him. I can not believe that thou hast hid thy sister all these years.
Barney: First, I'm flattered. Then it's just jokes. A friend can joke on a friend's sister. Does not mean I'm going to act.
Barney: You do not trust me?
Barney: Okay. All right. I'll just... take my chair and leave.
Barney: I have already called to add a person.
Barney: No, nothing really...
Barney: I'll take the vichyssoise with a hint of cream. Dairy ballonnent me.
Barney: It, it means he will not.
Barney: You do not have any illusions.
Barney: There he just says the obvious.
Barney: Exactly. Do you need relationships. If only Ted knew someone who works at, say... Goliath National Bank, then...expect. What? I work for Goliath National Bank. Incredible!
Barney: Before you say or do something, give me a favor.
Barney: Move away. It's a Prada.
Barney: I think your prospects are good for GNB. U you have shown me that you can take any position.
Barney: I hope you get the job. Nothing makes me happier than to fill an opening.
Barney: You've sneaked?
Barney: Oh yeah?
Barney: You see, Ted, you have so little faith in me and Heather...
Barney: And as we can count on Lily to sneak.
Barney: Ted, you know, I'm not a saint. And yes, it is true that the times I drove your mother at the airport, say that there has been a... sexually confused and confusing time in the parking lot, but I said I draguerai not your sister, and I thought. You should have me believe.
Barney: Your mother and I, we kissed.
Barney: Oh, hi, Lily. We were just in the neighborhood, thought we'd get some lunch. We didn't even know you'd be here. (Marshall takes a photo of her).
Barney: I didn't catch your name. Did you guys catch her name?
Barney: Really? Laid, you say?
Barney: She hot?
Barney: And she's looking for some action. Sounds to me like she could be a cougar.
Barney: A cougar. An older woman, usually in her 40s or 50s, single and on the prowl for a younger man.
Barney: Marshall, I've thought it over and I accept your challenge.
Barney: Tomorrow, the cougar hunt begins.
Barney: Oh, now you're gonna bash her figure. Real classy, Ted.
Barney: Okay, let's take a look. Oh, yeah, it's a cougar all right. A prime specimen. See, you can identify a cougar by a few key characteristics. Start with the hair. The cougar keeps up with current hairstyles as a form of camouflage. The prey may not realize that he's engaged a cougar until he's already being dragged, helpless, back to her lair. Now, the blouse. The cougar displays maximum cleavage possible to captivate her prey. If you're watching them bounce, she's about to pounce. See the claws? Long and sharp, to ward off rival females... Or open alimony checks. Yeah, this one's a beaut. Okay, let the hunt begin.
Barney: Who do you rather have grading your papers: a savage, man-eating jungle cat, or a purring, satisfied kitty?
Barney: Direct. I like that. The name's Barney. What I want... is you.
Barney: Oh, my god. Incredible.
Barney: C minus? What are you talking about? I just pulled an all-nighter!
Barney: I know, I know.
Barney: Look, I miscalculated. I thought she'd be old and fragile, like most cougars. But kitty's got claws. Don't worry though. Tonight, I'm seeing her again.
Barney: I promise you, after tonight, that cougar will be my pet, and I its master.
Barney: I think I'm falling in love with you.
Barney: What? No.We had s*x yesterday.
Barney: Do you not see the powerbar in my hand? I'm fueling up.
Barney: Oh, yeah. And tonight, just like John Mellencamp, I am going to get rid of the "cougar" once and for all. Get it? 'Cause that's what he did with his name.
Barney: I can't stop thinking about you. Please give me another chance.
Barney: But you don't understand. See, I've been going easy on you, holding back, 'cause I was afraid you'd break a hip or something. But, this time, no mercy.I don't care how long it takes days, weeks, half a year.
Barney: That's not true. It's just temporarily dislocated. Seriously, I'm fine.
Barney: Yeah, she was.
Barney: B-plus?! Marshall, after I've gone through my eight weeks of physical therapy, I am going to get you that "A"!
Barney: It was an amazing safari. I can't wait to show you guys the slides!
Barney: Barney here.
Barney: Yes, I'm in the office. This is the sound of my stapler.This is the sound of my trouilloteuse. And that, the sound of me, ranking the company's directive on sexual harassment. What's new? I gotta run, great leader.
Barney: You kiss? Go on, I'm not even there. But just like that, have a baby: big mistake. Now, show me.
Barney: Yes, I understand. My colleagues are oddly on the fact that I work. I know, I know.
Barney: To make them believe that I break my ass, when in truth I break some ass, I made a special message. What's new? I gotta run, Grand Chief.
Barney: Come, Grand Chief.
Barney: Oh, that. You know how I dream of making love to a woman from each country?
Barney: I thought the fastest way to circumnavigate the world in 180 days. Take a taxi and wait before the United Nations.
Barney: It was the perfect plan. There's a detail I had not expected.
Barney: The girls not want to enter a taxi driver. I worked hard on it.
Barney: What's the problem?
Barney: Children!? No! Rule: no children under 45! You never read my blog!? He has improved a lot.
Barney: Sorry, pal. It'll be $ 37.50.
Barney: They told me, so I've prepared a few. I organize a "marriage". Tell me, Billy Idol, it's going to do? More on Billy Idol.If someone wants the real Slim Shady, it's there. This one was good. Robin, why do not you help me?
Barney: Time out! This is a group decision! You can not go to Chicago before we are all agreed.
Barney: Stay out of it, Brigitte Nielsen and Dolph Lundgren in Rocky IV! We need Marshall and Lily.
Barney: You kiss?
Barney: Wait a second. Candles... flowers... I guess that Marshall has "forgotten" to tell you. The fifth lookalike... it was me.
Barney: Friends! We forget what is really important here. Ted is blond.
Barney: That's why we're all here. For Robin to deter...
Barney: Not so great that.
Barney: Excuse me a moment. Estonia Baltic countries would complete!
Barney: Calm down. Your husband is here. Trying to hide it, at least.
Barney: This guy looks like me...
Barney: It's like looking in a mirror.
Barney: Look at Scarlett Johansson at the Oscars. If I could get a celebrity, it would be Scarlett Johansson. Canon, talented and you do not turn as Woody Allen's father without issue.
Barney: How do you know that?
Barney: But before you poursuives, I'm flattered, but technically I'm not a celebrity. Also, one last time, the mask, it was a joke.
Barney: Tell us at least the weird thing he wanted to do.
Barney: You have the Sled Dog, the Lobster Trap, the Mounted Police.
Barney: Canadiansexact.org, this is a favorite.
Barney: Yeah. It's nonprofit. They just want to disseminate information.
Barney: It is said? It should.
Barney: There's been no light.
Barney: No, it's you.
Barney: White or Asian? You see, I hardly know him.
Barney: You should leave the project.
Barney: It's decided. A new beginning! May the winds be with you...
Barney: It's funny you mention the project. Because...
Barney: What was that?
Barney: You suggest a complicated lie in the long term that implies a lot of discipline. A guy like you will not succeed.
Barney: Lie to me, there.
Barney: What kind of fuel?
Barney: But no! Defend yourself! If someone asks, diverts it from the original lie with other lies. I show you. I have a pony.Question me.
Barney: When I was Dandelion, her complexion was of a deep hazel, unfortunately, his barn is located near a chemical plant, which contaminated water. Over time, it became a dull gray and the vet can not do anything to help.
Barney: You've been slow.
Barney: Wayne Gretzky, former Hot Wheels, an Eskimo kneeling.
Barney: Of course, you could not see you point and Bilson.
Barney: All right!
Barney: There is no softball team. We just rented a field, a bunch of guys together so they make you a hero.
Barney: Really? And this open mic night at the Comedy Club?
Barney: Fatal... Thursday evening for everyone.
Barney: Nice shirt.
Barney: This is the P.T.E. 18th floor. Basically, Bilson wants a piece like that, two floors above us.
Barney: Room for Transitional Employees.
Barney: It's a place where a manager and an employee initiate a transfer of knowledge about an impending career change.
Barney: It's serious there.
Barney: Really?
Barney: Read it.
Barney: One of them is supposed to be famous?
Barney: You again. You even found a way to spoil it. Why?Why let yourself do we as a country?
Barney: They've turned, eh?
Barney: With this economy?
Barney: What was it with Bilson?
Barney: You've hit with a chair?
Barney: Well done.
Barney: Okay. All-night rave, abandoned tire factory in Newark. We're on the list. Who's in?
Barney: Private jet. Teeterboro Airport, skinny-skydiving. Who's in?
Barney: One beer. Bar, downstairs, 15 second walk. Who's in?
Barney:  Hi. Have you met me?
Barney: Yes. And do you know why? Hang on to your bedsores, grandparents from Willy Wonka, because guess who's on his way up to this apartment right now? My... wait for it... brother, James. React.
Barney: - Yeah. He's the awesome-est, most best looking-est, greatest guy ever.
Barney: That's what I just said.
Barney: Is "gimme five" back?
Barney: Guys, "gimme five" is back!
Barney: I'll tell you what James is gonna do. He's gonna do the job you've been neglecting. And, as always, he'll do it a lot better than you ever did. Ted... James is my wingman now.
Barney: It was everything we ever dreamed of when watching Donnie and Marie. She was a little bit country.
Barney: Help, I don't think he's breathing. Does anyone know mouth-to-mouth?
Barney:  Okay, great. How 'bout you instead?
Barney: Oh, man, I am so excited that you're here! It has been forever since I have been around anyone even remotely fun. Uh, yes offense.
Barney: Daddy's home! Yeah. All right, bro. What do you like? Guy in super tight black T? Super tight black guy? Guy who looks like Mr. T?
Barney: I'm feeling lazy. How 'bout girl with the chocolatini?
Barney: - Let's ride.
Barney: - Hey! Hey! Her body art is not an invitation to grope her, it's an expression of her inner self. I'm sure, in many ways, she is the dolphin encircled by flowers.
Barney: - What? What?
Barney: Let me know if he bothers you again.
Barney: Sure. If it'll make you feel safer. I'm Barney.
Barney: - Boiling hot.
Barney: Oh, hello. Have a drink.
Barney: What's gonna kill me? What's going on?
Barney: No. I mean, he's glowing from his peel, if that's what you mean.
Barney: That's ridiculous! Just because he's a little sleepy, and he hasn't had s*x with anyone in a bathroom stall... He hasn't had s*x with anyone in a bathroom stall.
Barney: No, he... No! That... is impossible. Excuse... Excuse... Ex...
Barney: Don't change the subject. Let me see your phone.
Barney: I just want to see your phone. Let me see your phone.
Barney: I got... Who is this? And the answer better be: "I don't remember his name."
Barney: I don't support this.
Barney: Not gay marriage-- marriage! How can you do this?We were raised in the same house, with the same values!
Barney: Oh, God. Is that what you two do together? You sit around the house and talk about love? I think... I'm gonna be sick.
Barney: What? No way.
Barney: Oh, it's a freaking epidemic.
Barney: Clam Bake. Staten Island. Who's in? Okay, I didn't have high hopes for that one. Okay, here's my thing. If gay guys start getting married, then suddenly the whole world's gonna be doing it. That's how it works. They start something, then six months later, everyone follows. Like now everyone gets manicures.
Barney: Okay, then like how... Like getting your chest waxed.
Barney: You know what I mean! Gay marriage is going to cause single life, as we know it, to die out. Think of how the American family will be strengthened.
Barney: No. It's always been me and him together, being awesome, while the rest of you walked two-by-two onto your ark of sexless boredom.
Barney: Yeah. Like things haven't changed with you people.
Barney: You're right, Ted. This is a cause for celebration. We need to take him out and celebrate the commitment he and Tom are about to make.
Barney: What? Yeah! See, that cage represents your commitment.
Barney: Sounds like you really rocked that arts and crafts fair.
Barney: And I cannot wait for you to meet my good friend... this guy. Excuse me, do you know anyone who would like to buy my incredibly muscular, fun, large-handed brother a drink?
Barney: Okay, I'm in. Which one am I?
Barney: He's very shy, loves tennis and Brazil, and drops his pants after three dirty martinis. Now go, man, go!
Barney: James, James, since you like arts and crafts, look at what Charles here made with cherry stems. He did it with his tongue. Yeah.
Barney: So, Charles, why don't you put your number in my brother's phone, and once he's in a funner mood...
Barney: Oh, so now it's my way of life? I thought it was our way of life. You've completely turned your back on it. Look at you, not even suited up. Do you remember why we suit up, James?
Barney: To show people that we are different from the millions of T-shirt and jeans lemmings out there. The suit shows that we are a force to be reckoned with, a two-person army that plays by its own rules. But you've taken off the uniform, you've crossed enemy lines, and you've abandoned me. Well, I'm not gonna let you do that. It's not too late to back out of this stupid marriage thing! You don't have to do this, bro!
Barney: - Why?!
Barney: What? There's gonna be a baby?
Barney: Oh, my God. I'm gonna be an uncle?
Barney: To James and Tom. May you have a long and happy life together. And may I always have the skin and libido of a much younger man.- Cheers.
Barney: Thanks. I decided to leave out the hetero college phase. No one wants to
Barney: Ugh, it's a freaking epidemic.
Barney: - May I?
Barney: Hey, buddy. Your parents are married. Now, listen, you. Just because you're being raised by married people doesn't mean you have to choose that lifestyle. High-five. Luckily, you got me. In 20 and a half years, you'll be 21, and I will be... Well, I haven't decided how old I'll be yet. But we are gonna bro out, uncle and nephew style. Stick with me, kid. I am gonna teach you how to live. Great suit, by the way. Who is the cutest?
Barney: Rosa, why always be attracted to the unavailable ones? Why not accept the fact that you're a beautiful woman who is worthy of love? Are you brave enough to hear that? You...
Barney: I heard a joke at work.
Barney: It's sexist! When it's funny, it's funny. Lily's cool. She'll love it.
Barney: Ready? What is the difference between jam and Nutella? (Marshall laughs) It's funny.
Barney: Come on. It's funny. This is...
Barney: She'll be back.
Barney: You know for layoffs?
Barney: Are you kidding? I know one thing about this company. I will never be fired. It is likely that one day I was stranded on a beach with no footprints or teeth, but I will not fire.
Barney: You just gotta find a way to make you absolutely critical.
Barney: Keep your job has nothing to do with being a hard worker. You need something.
Barney: You know, something that makes you funny and loved, as Marcus Denisco.
Barney: It's always food.
Barney: You see? You need it. You need that thing that makes you a man.
Barney: Not this stuff. You know, something. Toy-like man.
Barney: Claw tape!
Barney: You see? You need something. Youtube-like man.
Barney: But choose wisely. You want to become the horrible man Massage.
Barney: You filled it. Grub-man has a panna cotta in his office.
Barney: If Ted says that PJ is necessary to society, then PJ will go nowhere.
Barney: PJ is a guy? PJ, this is not a hottie you f*ck?
Barney: A Guide. I guided a young, once. I made him my co-pilot. Then one day, he hired an assistant to work 3 meters from her room, which... Check it out... is not a hottie, proving he has never listened. You know how to call this type?
Barney: Maybe. I remember more. Because for me he is dead!(He rises) PJ will receive a mail with a disruptive place, it should in any circumstances be three days and then send it to me.
Barney: Fired. What else you got?
Barney: Fired.
Barney: Did you know? Whether you're fired?
Barney: upside down Viré.
Barney: We are the knights who say... You're fired.
Barney: Not bad. You got maybe something.
Barney: Actually, you'll Sports-man. We have already Simulates-man.
Barney: Hi, Frank.
Barney: Sports-man. I heard people talking about your club.
Barney: Last week you were a waste that nobody was looking.Now you're Sports-man.
Barney: Last week!
Barney: I've told you, commits a pretty assistant with whom you can sleep instead of hiring an assistant with whom Robin sleeps. Of course he'll sleep with her. It is the coolest on the planet. I am off topic! You're an idiot! This is my message!You're an idiot! An angry person, that's not enough! Marshall with me!
Barney: Because it hurts!
Barney: It hurts because I love... when Ted... layer with women. I am a very devoted friend! Lily is the only one I can talk. Tell him to talk to me.
Barney: It's funny anyway, right?
Barney: You see, Sports-man. People adore you.
Barney: You're kidding!
Barney: As Lily not speaking to me, I must tell you something.And it's not easy to say, OK? I... wait... 'm... wait... love...wait... of... wait... a... wait... some... wait...
Barney: What?
Barney: She told you? Great. I guess you marrez my back all this time.
Barney: Really?
Barney: Really? This is so cute. But let's be clear. I do not like it, OK? It's just that... I miss when she is not there. I think about her all the time, I guess one day we will run towards each other in slow motion and I wear a suede jacket.
Barney: No. Perhaps. Ever. I know not. Listen... I just need to get rid of that idiot PJ. If Lily was there, she would know how to get rid of him.
Barney: You're not Lily. Lily is a diabolical puppet master, the subtle situations to achieve its ends. This is evil incarnate. You have the right. Cling to it.
Barney: Hire the kid as his assistant. He does all the work and you're still Sports-man. Evil incarnate, Eriksen. Evil incarnate.
Barney: Hey, Toy-man!
Barney: He is not here. I think we should leave.
Barney: It's happened before.
Barney: And there it was.
Barney: I love traveling.
Barney: Hawaii is fun. A buddy of mine lives in Seattle. It's really not bad. But the best place? I must say, the moon.
Barney: Ted, a blonde, it's easy.
Barney: Our ship is passed through a hole spatiotemporal or gamma rays or something. I started to rejuvenate, blah, blah, blah. So you bump into one store yoghurt. It must be insane.
Barney: So, after 20 minutes, the eagle has landed. We fuse into space. Houston, we have a complainer. Other double entender related to space.
Barney: I do not lie! We made love, I have pictures!
Barney: I'm not saying he loves pizza, but the last time he went, the doctor said, "stop eating pizza. "Marshall:" Why? "Doc:" To you examine. " But seriously, we laugh because we love you.
Barney: Who? He wore a black hat and beard of the day? He said "Hands up! "?
Barney: It was downright terrifying.
Barney: I repeat. I will say that it happened to me to lie on compassion.
Barney: I just want to forget what happened and continue to live my life. It's great. But I think I'll add a tear.
Barney: It's gold! But I'd rather say 'put me behind you. "
Barney: So it was indeed a black bonnet. J'l'avais said!
Barney: I do not ask where he kept his weapon.
Barney: You're telling us...
Barney: You've been mugged by a monkey?
Barney: Why did not you asked the guard to recover your wallet?
Barney: New information has been discovered on the attack on Marshall.
Barney: No, I said. This is my story. You see, the young Marshall was at the zoo, eating a banana...
Barney: You're right. The banana was on the floor.
Barney: Marshall, I'm sorry, really. Here's what happened.
Barney: I've just been mugged.
Barney: That's what I said to the girl at the bar just now...
Barney: It was downright terrifying. I would just like to forget what happened and continue to live my life.
Barney: Well, my name is not Neil. This is Bar...
Barney: Well, I can do. You see, I was on the road to the launch pad when I got mugged. And the aggressor... took my keys from the shuttle. Successful. Who wants to do something to 3?
Barney: And it was the best thing in my life 3.
Barney: The story is better with my end... It's... Okay? So we were there, zero gravity. They wore helmets that astronauts...
Barney: So what you're saying is that you got the monkey trapped so you give him your wallet?
Barney: You sure it was not a monkey on the shoulders of another monkey, wearing a trench coat?
Barney: I can not believe.
Barney: You heard me. You got attacked by a monkey. You want to go to the issuance of Robin because you're afraid of being ridiculous.
Barney: If serious, this is too funny.
Barney: I, yes, but still.
Barney: You know a long time. He told the truth?
Barney: I still say that it happened.
Barney: Journalists lie constantly. Sorry, but I believe that Jack Palance is dead when I see the body.
Barney: False! They like to discover that they lied. "Because a lie is just a great story that has mixed with the truth." Barney Stinson. Example, that Sarah gave me this!
Barney: No, I mean what she did. In truth, I fear that history has not gone exactly as I said.
Barney: Passed. Who wants to do something to 3? (The two women throw their glasses to him the figure) Lisa, wait.
Barney: It's you Lisa? Sarah, wait. Listen. I'm Neil Armstrong.Sorry I lied.
Barney: 31 years! I was happy, very happy, thinking that because I put a 28 year old daughter who has taken too much sun. People want to lie. Marshall, they need the lie, that's why, in my case, you've been mugged by a monkey. As far as I'm done with this plan 3. I am the best in the world!
Barney: You know it.
Barney: Yeah! I knew it.
Barney: Come on, Ted. Why he would invent something like that?
Barney: Dude, what do you do?
Barney: Now I want a weapon.
Barney: You know if it was attacked?
Barney: It was not very satisfactory. When I tell that he was attacked by a monkey. And I keep the stuff of banana. It was good.
Barney: Really? Well, believe me, Mosby. One day you shall tell this story and you'll see things my way.
Barney: Of course, Ted.
Barney: Ted. This is your seduction lounge. s*x swing there, vibrating Jell-O pit right there, rotating Vietnamese Shame Wheel right here. Don't ask; you're not ready. And that basketball hoop? Outdoor stripper pole. We'll just tell the ladies to be careful in the winter. You think a tongue stuck to a frozen pole is bad...
Barney: Oh, thank God. I'll go first. Ted, this hous you bought for your hypothetical family is super weird. We talk about it all the time behind your back.
Barney: Sure thing. Luis. Barney Stinson, 12 H. I got a hundred bucks if you can be here in five. Thanks.
Barney: Yeah... here's the thing about me and tools... the only one I know how to use is attached to me, and I am not going to try putting it in the TV. Again.
Barney: Well, here's our screwdriver now. (Barney opens the door, then whispers loudly:) Guys, I'm pretty sure that's not Luis, but I can't be certain. Someone introduce yourself.
Barney: Dad?
Barney: Where do I begin?
Barney: Yeah. I think I need a drink.
Barney: Look, it's been 30 years. And now you just show up out of nowhere? This is... this is going to take me a minute.
Barney: I love you, Daddy. I'm so glad we're best friends now.
Barney: Make a muscle.
Barney: Ah!
Barney: Guys, my dad's awesome. He's the mother of all fathers. Check this out.
Barney: Hey, back when I was a kid, you used to be a roadie. Do you still do that?
Barney: So, all these years, there's this one question I've been dying to ask him.
Barney: Do you... get laid a lot?
Barney: Oh, my God, that took you five seconds.
Barney: You're a master. You are legen... wait for it...
Barney:...daddy! Legendaddy! The man is a god. And he's still out there, living the dream.
Barney: Oh, that's cool.
Barney: This is going to be the second-most fun I've ever had on an Asian leg. (both laughing)
Barney: What do you mean?
Barney: First of all, Robin, my dad could beat up your dad. Second, you don't have to worry. He's cool. Now if you'll excuse me... I have to go renew my passport, and get a travel-sized rotating Vietnamese Shame Wheel. Don't ask; you're not ready.
Barney: I'm not sure how to start this.
Barney: I think I need a drink.
Barney: Glen McKenna, neat.
Barney: Milk? Oh, you're taking it easy. Crazy night?
Barney: Wow.
Barney: Hey, um.. When I was a kid, you used to be a roadie. You still do that?
Barney: Yeah, no, I get it. Um, but when I was a kid, you... you were this total badass.
Barney: Yeah, okay, now we're getting to the good stuff.
Barney: Yes, yes, yes.
Barney: *Out of control.*
Barney: You ever bang Stevie Nicks?
Barney: Big-time.
Barney: Oh, my God, you're a natural. Think of the pickup plays we can run as a father-son duo. There's the "Father Knows Breast," there's the "Bush Dynasty," the "Lick Father, Lick Son."
Barney: Why?
Barney: You're all wearing matching sweaters. That's cute. Look, I got to get going, Jerry. But, uh, this was great. Glad we did this.
Barney: What?
Barney: No, I most certainly am not. Look, I met him. He's not my kind of bro and that's that.
Barney: Guys, get it through your heads. I am never gonna talk to my dad again.
Barney: Fine, I'll go.
Barney: Oh, thank you very much. And I love your...coat. I love your coat.
Barney: Well, I do love it. It's doing a nice job covering up that chair.
Barney: It ages well, that's the thing.
Barney: I do remember that. I climbed up on that dude's lap and told him what I wanted for Christmas.
Barney: J.J., I'm talking to Dad right now. God.
Barney: Yeah, I do. I make a ton of money. How much do you make, J.J.?
Barney: Oh, well, huh, now we all know you make excuses. I was talking about money.
Barney: Good time to get into print media. Am I right, Dad?
Barney: Uh, you don't strike me as the athletic type, Jayj. Dad, check it. Triceps. What gym do you go to?
Barney: Sounds like you're having your fourth period. Am I right, Dad?!
Barney: Why? J.J. started it. What does J.J. even stand for anyway? J... Jerky... Jerkface?
Barney: Jerome Jr...? Oh. He's... he's named after you. Excuse me.
Barney: This is mine.
Barney: J.J. gets a childhood, a dad, a real family and a basketball hoop? No, no. I at least get the hoop. I'm taking it with me.
Barney: Why? Why should I? You're lame, okay? You're just some lame suburban dad.
Barney: Because if you were gonna be some lame suburban dad, why couldn't you have been that for me?!
Barney: Oh, "screwed up" doesn't even begin to describe...
Barney: Can you help me with this?
Barney: Bye.
Barney: I'm fine. Hey, Ted.
Barney: You, uh, still want a basketball hoop out there?
Barney: No, you were right. A kid needs a hoop.
Barney: Hey, guys.
Barney: Uh, if there were any shame in a dude getting a pedicure I don't think there would have been a feature about it in Details magazine.
Barney: Oh, congratulations, Lily. Marshall, you're getting married? What the hell?
Barney: Hell, yeah, I'm in! Just... I'm almost done.
Barney: Ah, A.C., always in decline, never hitting bottom. It's good to be back, old friend.
Barney: Oh, uh, once or twice.
Barney: Ah, good to see you, too. Three times, maybe.
Barney: No, you guys go ahead. I'm going to find the veil. (He leaves)
Barney: Okay, I got the veil. She wasn't ready to be married. All right, let's talk bachelor party. Are we thinking full-on strip club, or should we rent a room and have a private toy show?
Barney: Marshall, I'm your best man.
Barney: And as your best man, I have to throw you a bachelor party. That's part of being a best friend.
Barney: Of course.
Barney: Unbelievable!
Barney: Bright side: the bachelor party continues!
Barney: Hi.
Barney: See you.
Barney: A... Chinese guy?
Barney: Vultures.
Barney: Guys, let's bail. This is never gonna happen.
Barney: You throwing a big, free party with lots of booze and food and all your single, desperate girlfriends from college? Yeah, glad we dodged that bullet.
Barney: They broke up over the summer. Lily totally ran off to San Francisco and these two just had s*x in the closet. What? We're under oath.
Barney: Yeah, we are. He's a judge.
Barney: Uh, yeah. Courthouse. Oath. We're under it.
Barney: I can get us that money.
Barney: Have you noticed that all day today Chinese guys have been coming up and saying hi to me?
Barney: Well, those are my old gambling buddies. Truth is... I used to come here all the time. Play an old Chinese game called "Shing Hasabu Shing". Had a small gambling problem. Actually, it wasn't so small. I kind of lost my entire life's savings. But tonight, I don't know, I'm feeling hot. I think I can win us that money.
Barney: Uh, it's not gambling if you absolutely know you're going to win. I'll get us that money. I swear it, nay... I oath it.
Barney: Marshall, please. Don't you think I know what I'm... My God, you're right.
Barney: Did you guys see me? I was on fire tonight. Man, I can't wait to get back to the shore. God, I love gambling!
Barney: Why can't I do it just a little?
Barney: Did I bet someone that they'd call it off? I did, didn't I? Who'd I bet?
Barney: Well, well, well. How rich. You make me promise to be on my best behavior around your girlfriend, yet, you have been lying to her since day one. Excuse me.Hi. Leg Warehouse? Yeah, my friend Ted needs something to stand on. So, nothing for him to stand on? Okay, and thanks so much. Ted, doesn't Victoria deserve to know that you once had the hots for Robin? I have half a mind to tell the story of the re-return.
Barney: So Victoria, did you ever re-return to this guy?
Barney: Shannon?! Shannon, Shannon... No, don't remember any Shannon.
Barney: Where's the tape?
Barney: Cool, okay. You know, whenever.
Barney: Oh, great, there it is. Thanks, Lily. You're a peach. Oh, wow, look at that. Robin landed on the Chocolate Swamp. That's five chips for me.
Barney: Too bad you'll never find out.
Barney: What?!
Barney: Give it to me, give it, give me...
Barney: Ted! Fine, fine. You cannot play it. Shannon! I love you! I love you so much. What about us changing the world together? Don't tell me you've forgotten. I know I haven't. Will I ever see another rainbow? Will an eagle ever soar through this tempest of woe? Baby, please Don't go There's a thief in the palace, she's stolen all my love There's a thief in the palace and she's...
Barney: Hey, guys, what up?
Barney: I'm sorry. I don't want to talk about it. It was the most embarrassing, and humiliating thing that ever happened to me.
Barney: Oh, really? Then why don't you tell us your most humiliating moment, Marshall? Show me how good it is.
Barney: Okay. I'll tell you my story. Believe it or not, I was not always as awesome as I am today.
Barney: It was 1998. I was just out of college, and I was working at a coffeehouse with my girlfriend. My girlfriend... *Shannon. Yeah, you were meant for me And I was meant for you. Ooh, ooh, ooh-ooh-ooh.* Thank you. All right.
Barney: And I love you, Shannon.
Barney: I know. Only five short weeks till we're down in Nicaragua.
Barney: Mellow order, bro, mellow order.
Barney: Sorry, I only give high twos.
Barney: Listen to you. That? You know, women aren't objects. They're human beings. And FYI, Shannon and I have decided to wait till we're married. You can read about it in my zine.
Barney: I feel sorry for you, man.
Barney: Suits. Five weeks later, we were all set to leave for the Peace Corps. Only problem was... she never showed up.
Barney: You know what? This was a mistake.
Barney: Not the slipping-in-horse-poop story!
Barney: Victoria, I deem your offering... worthy. My saga... continues.
Barney: I went back to the coffeehouse to find Shannon.
Barney: Sugar Bear, where were you?
Barney: But the Nicaraguans need us!
Barney: Shannon, there is no...
Barney: As I walked away, I realized Shannon was an adult. Her father couldn't control her life. I had to go back and confront him. She was in the middle of a heated argument with her dad.
Barney: I don't know, guys.
Barney: Right. So where was I? Oh, yeah. Shannon was sucking face with her dad.
Barney: How can... With your dad? I mean, I know judge not lest ye be judged, but gross!
Barney: We're breaking up? But what about the Peace Corps?
Barney: But I love you.
Barney: I didn't go. That night, I recorded my video and mailed it to Shannon. I didn't see her until a week later. There's sugar in the basket. Shannon! Shannon, you came back!
Barney: Oh. Did you... did you get my tape?
Barney: You? It was you?
Barney: The story's not over. I did see Shannon one more time.
Barney: I don't know, I think I might need one last story to get me through it.
Barney: Oh, come on, Ted! You know what story I want to hear. Everyone else here has manned up tonight and told the truth. Why can't you?
Barney: Yes! Do it!
Barney: Wow, Ted, you were right. You shouldn't have told that story. But you did earn yourself the right to the end of mine. We fast-forward eight years into the future.
Barney: Marshall, not only is it this year, it's tonight.
Barney: Hi.
Barney: Hi, Shannon.
Barney: Just listen. When you left me for that guy Greg, it changed me. Now I'm this. I-I know this is crazy. It's just, you were once such a big part of my life. And it just seemed insane that you didn't know who I am now. So here I am. And then she told me about her life.
Barney: She and Greg dated for a while and then split up. But here's the real kicker: Shannon's a mom. She has a little kid named Max. That's crazy. That could have been my kid. But instead, what do I have? My whole life's some money in the bank, some suits in my closet and a string of one-night stands.
Barney: My life rocks! Money, suits and s*x. These are tears of joy! I could be cooped up in some tiny apartment changing some brat's poopy diapers. But instead, I'm out in the world being awesome 24-7, 365! You let me dodge a bullet, Big Guy. Plus, here's the mini-cherry on top of the regular cherry on top of the sundae of awesomeness that is my life. After Shannon and I talked, I nailed her.
Barney: Yeah.
Barney: Yeah.
Barney: Video's pretty good on this phone, huh?
Barney: Oh, no. It just takes a while to power down.
Barney: Ladies, gentlemen... Ted. This has been a wonderful evening. I got great dirt on all you guys. I got Ted to tell the re-return. I finally nailed Shannon! Told her I'd call her tomorrow. Yeah, right. And I rediscovered just how awesomely awesome my life is. Peace out, hombres!
Barney:  You're doing this all wrong! Ted, there are couples in my kindergarten class who have moved faster than you two. Granted, their home lives are not great.
Barney:  Total booty-call.
Barney:  Wow, you sound really lonely.
Barney:  Shh. Daddy's talking now. Loneliness. The looming specter of Valentine's Day fast approaching. The two key ingredients to my favorite day of the year, February 13: Desperation Day.
Barney:  It's a thing. Much like Valentine's Day itself, Desperation Day dates back thousands of years. Weddings were forbidden under ancient Roman law, so Saint Valentine performed them in secret, under threat of death.
Barney:  Wait, there's more.
Barney:  And right by Saint Valentine's side was his best bro, Saint Desperatius, there to pick off insecure bridesmaids.
Barney:  Every woman wants a date on Valentine's Day. That neediness reaches its climax... what up... on February 13. A magical night when a ten has the self-esteem of a four and the depraved enthusiasm of a two. Now, there's only one thing you can't do.
Barney:  Wherever you are, or whoever you're under, you must get home alone by 11:59 p.m. Otherwise, you're on a date on Valentine's Day.
Barney:  Trolls.
Barney:  Lying trolls.
Barney: You losing your mind, being alone in your apartment?
Barney:  We said you were going to have s*x. We didn't say, "Bring a carry-on."
Barney:  God, these girls are so hungry for male attention. It is like being a hunter and having the deer walk up, tie itself to the hood of your car and beg to get mounted.
Barney:  Enchanté. That's French for "What's with the purple?"
Barney:  Please! You might as well be dog-earing a tear-stained bridal magazine while wolfing down the box of chocolates you had delivered to yourself at work from your "fiancé" who no one's ever met.
Barney:  Okay, when your "fiancé" Gerard comes back from fixing cleft palates in Peru, maybe snatch a photo of the two of you together, and then I'll totally believe you.
Barney:  My elbow slipped!
Barney:  So, you were an Olympic gymnast?
Barney:  Ooh, sorry. Gold's the only thing that really counts.
Barney:  And she sticks the landing. Why don't you start stretching, and I'll... be right back. Hey, hey, sorry.
Barney:  Quick question.
Barney:  Why aren't you wearing purple like your friends?
Barney:  Sure.
Barney:  Oh, my gosh! Me, too! Um, is it getting crowded in here, 'cause I think there are two peas in this pod?
Barney:  Guilty. This is embarrassing but every year, I buy flowers and a box of chocolates, even if I'm not with someone. Just in case, you know?
Barney:  The worst.
Barney:  What's that?
Barney:  All right, okay. I was playing you before. But I was really doing you a public service. It's February 13... a day many are now calling Desperation Day. It's kind of a thing. And you walking around, saying you're a gooey romantic? It comes across a bit desperate.
Barney:  Um, or you could be in the 47th Semi-Annual Laser Tag Tournament in Poughkeepsie.
Barney:  Here's the first thing you need to know about laser tag.
Barney: ...became the 2010 Tri-County Champions.
Barney:  Oh, it is. Plus, if you win, you get free pizza. This is my teammate for tomorrow.
Barney:  I'm telling you. The power of Valentine's Day. I'm Huey Lewis, and you just heard the news.
Barney:  What? No, don't go! You want to see a magic trick?!
Barney:  What are you talking about?
Barney:  No, I don't. She's gross.
Barney:  Whatever you say.
Barney:  Nora...
Barney:  The ground was shaking like. Robin, where are you? Those Boy Scouts have grown a foot since last year. They're terrifying!
Barney:  Hap...?
Barney:  Oh!
Barney: In my experience, the way this normally goes is, we lie here for a while, make a little awkward chitchat.
Barney: Then I make up some cabinet meeting, heart surgery, rocket test flight I've got to be at, slip out of the apartment and never call you again.
Barney: Actually, you usually say that out loud. So...I just slept with my best friend's ex-girlfriend
Barney: Best friend.
Barney: Okay. Wait. Right click, save as... Into the.bpeg folder, and okay. This never happened. It's a good plan.
Barney: Okay. Right. So, Robin?
Barney: Guess who nailed the chick from metro news one last night?
Barney: Okay. This never happened. Never happened. Never... happened.
Barney: What?
Barney: I... I... I'm... I'm...
Barney: What are you talking about?!
Barney: Ha-ha right. A great friend, by the way. The best. Is it my imagination, or are these drinks getting smaller? If this were a doctor's office, they'd say, "try again." How you doing there, Robin?
Barney: Ted, she has a name! And just what are you accusing me of?
Barney: I'll come with you.
Barney: God, this is awkward.
Barney: Being around Ted.
Barney: Because of our thing.
Barney: You're really gonna pretend this never happened?
Barney: Stella! You have a serious girlfriend now! You're over this one. Robin who, right? Stella makes this one look like a filthy bag of gbabage, am I right? Happy birthday, bro.
Barney: Hey, Marshall, I need your help.
Barney: I know. I want to hire you.
Barney: I need a lawyer. I'll pay you.
Barney: A little.
Barney: Forget that. That's a Tuesday for me. New shredder. This baby'll chew up a bicycle in 17 seconds. From sky mall. It's all from sky mall. Whenever I get upset, I shop at sky mall. Want a hot dog?
Barney: Marshall, I'm about to tell you a secret that you can't tell anyone-- not Ted, not Robin, not Lily.
Barney: You are hearing this secret, Marshall. I... I slept... (Marshall covers his ears with his hands and starts singing) Stop..stop doing that. (Barney throws a bowling ball at him, Marshall catches it) I slept... I slept with Robin.
Barney: Are you mad at me?
Barney: How's the hot dog?
Barney: You can't. you can't tell anyone. Attorney-client privilege.
Barney: Because I need you, Marshall, as my lawyer, to prove that I didn't do anying wrong.
Barney: I didn't break any state or federal laws, but I think I broke a much, much higher law. The Bro Code.
Barney: Bro Code article one:"Bros before hoes."
Barney: Bro Code article 89: "The mom of a bro is always off limits, but the stepmom of a bro is fair game if she initiates it, and/or is wearing at least one a article of leopard print clothing."
Barney: Bro Code article 34: "Bros cannot make eye contact during a devil's three-way." Two dudes.
Barney: You think I wrote that? Oh, Marshall, don't you know the glorious history of the Bro Code?
Barney: The year was 1776. The place: Philadelphia. Benjamin Franklin and George Washington were hangng a drink.
Barney: I shall write this set of rules. And I shall inscribe it on theacack of the Constitution. To save paper.
Barney: And I shall l include a provision that stateth "No eye contact in a devil's three-way."
Barney: I've just been losing my mind lately, and do you know why I feel so bad?
Barney: No, that was awesome. I feel bad because the Bro Code clearly states "No s*x with your bro's ex." But if you, my lawyer,can find a loophole somewhere, then that bad feeling will go bye-bye.
Barney: No, I'll just be the one shredding your paperwork. Technically, you'll be paid by a toy factory in Pyongyang.
Barney: Hey, if I wanted a psychological evaluation, I'd hire the guy we pay to hint notize us before depositions. Now, get cracking!
Barney: Fantastic, you're here. Give me the good news.
Barney: No! Bad lawyer! I need a loophole! I want to feel better, Marshall! I can't keep buying things! I have six self-cleaning litterboxes and I don't even have a kid. Wait. How about this? Ted's probably broken this thing himself, right? And if he's broken the Bro Code, then I'm off the hook.
Barney: What?!
Barney: Hey.
Barney: Good.
Barney: Yeah. I wish we had some wine, too.
Barney: Damn it, Marshall. I'm not paying you to tell me what a saint Ted is! You're my lawyer! The answer is in there! Find it!
Barney: What if he never wants to talk to me again?
Barney:I'm in the limo, right outside of Ted's office.
Barney: Goat in a party hat?
Barney:Uh, gotta go. Here he comes.
Barney: Vegas.
Barney: Surprise! Just a decoy, my friend.
Barney: Oh, no. There is. We're just not going. This is how good a friend I am. They want you to spent your 30th standing around drinking flat beer ten feet above your living room. But not me, bro. I pulled out all the stops. Private jet, Valderrama suite at the Bellagio. Steaks at BOA, scotch at Ghostbar, then two ringside seats to watch Floyd Mayatather go ten rounds with, wait for it... a grizzly bear!
Barney: No! We have to go to Vegas. Look, Ted, I didn't want to say this, but... there's something that I have to tell you, and I wanted you to be in the best possible frame of mind before you heard it.
Barney: When did you find out?
Barney: So you're not mad?
Barney: I'm so relieved to hear you say that.
Barney: You think I'm proud of this?! I'm horrified that this happened.
Barney: You mean... what position? (They starts fighting) Stop it! Stop it!
Barney: Ted! Stop!
Barney: Stop!
Barney: Okay. Okay. You're pissed. You deserve to be. Fine. You know what? One free shot. On me. Anywhere but the face. (Ted hits him where it hurts the most...) Who punches someone in the groin? Okay.Okay. I deserved that. I deserved that. But what's important now is... we're passed this whole Robin thing now, right?
Barney: Yeah. And I broke it. I'm sorry. But, Ted...seriously, this suite at the Bellagio...
Barney: What does that mean?
Barney: Are you saying you don't want to be bros anymore?
Barney: Okay, I'm going to stop you right there, because it seems like you're about to say something that's going to pretty much ruin Vegas.
Barney: Thanks, Robin.
Barney: Booger.
Barney: Not some stupid word, "Booger".
Barney: What? Journalist? You do the little fluff pieces at the end of the news. Old people, babies, monkeys... that's not journalism, that's just things in a diaper.
Barney: Of course not, because now you're saying "Nipple" and it's a hundred! (Whispers) Step into my web.
Barney: Hold up, there are only two reasons to date a girl you've already dated. Breast, Implants.
Barney: You dumped a p0rn star? Friendship over (gets up) FRIENDSHIP OVER!
Barney: There she is. Hey is it cold in here, because I can kind of see Robin's nickels? Now for your next challenge...
Barney: Oh, search your soul, Robin. You and I both know this wasn't about the money. Sure, Metro News One pays you jack and hey, a little green salad on the side's good for you, me and Mr. McGee.
Barney: Well baby really likes, is the thrill of pulling one over on those bean counters, who under appreciate you and still haven't promoted you. And for two more hundy-sticks, baby's going to look in the camera and say this (Whispers in her ear)
Barney: Did you sleep with her sister?
Barney: Sleep with her mom?
Barney: I'm losing interest in your story.
Barney: Know, that was a big mistake, Ted. You should've done it in person.
Barney: Desperate "Please-don't-leave-me" s*x is amazing.
Barney: You know what else? My younger sister just got married and I'm about to turn thirty-sex. Fantastic.
Barney: You know, that Natalie... she's good times.
Barney: She's probably on the subway by now. You could call her Voice Mail. Beep, dumped. Click. Done!
Barney: Mm... Mm! Six words! You... look... fat... in... those... jeans..., you're free to go.
Barney: Seriously, honey, men are working, here.
Barney: And great TV was had by all. Alright Scherbatsky, new challenge. And this one's big. But so, is the cash reward. For one thousand dollars, you heard me, all you have to do is get up there on the news and do one of these... (does odd dance)
Barney: And as you do it, you say this, "Elbert Ickey Woods. The bangles were fools to cut you in '91. Your 1521 rushing yards and your 27 touch downs will not be forgotten. So Coach Dave Shullah, screw you and your crappy steakhouse."
Barney: Ahh! This is it.
Barney: (To everyone in the bar) Everyone, everyone... If I may direct your attention to the television. You're about to see something... amazing.
Barney: Come on, baby... bring it home.
Barney: No, Marshall. That was beyond my wildest dreams (Robin's wailing on TV)
Barney: But isn't it nice to know that people are watching?
Barney: Hey, Ted, you know what always picks me up when I'm down? Other people's misfortune. You missed something so amazing.
Barney: Fine.
Barney: Her ass?
Barney: Once in 30 years.
Barney: Please, tell me you repliest not emotional baggage.
Barney: The emotional baggage is the foundation of American cultural export the most important.
Barney: Actually, the p0rn. Only women with major baggage make p0rn.
Barney: On the great grandmother.
Barney: There is a street where it's normal. One clue: a giant yellow bird lives on.
Barney: Gentile? This is the worst baggage. The best: she hates her father, and she believes to be big, but no. Steamy s*x at first date, and have brekky, she left. Why are you with me?
Barney: That's exactly what happened. It was all good. Even the thing with nunchakus.
Barney: Ted?
Barney: To be clear, you're saying that you do not have boots red cowboy?
Barney: I wanted... People want to know.
Barney: Come on, darling, kiss him.
Barney: This is outrageous. Thou hast embraced evil!
Barney: Kiss it! This film is embraced anyway.
Barney: So I threw the pressure air oxygen into its mouth. I shoot the tank, boo, nomore shark. Mr. Hall and I swam back to shore. Hey,let me serve you a drink.
Barney: So where were we?
Barney: Again? Really? Wait...
Barney: Hey, excuse me. Did I sleep with you and then totally screw you over?
Barney: What are you doing on Friday?
Barney: Stop! Amy?
Barney: Riiiggghhhttt!!!
Barney: Why are you trying to ruin my life?
Barney: And?
Barney: That's it? As far as I'm concerned, if I leave you safe on dry land with adequate transportation home, you've got nothing to complain about.
Barney: Oh, boo-hoo, poor little Ashley.
Barney: Abby. A few weeks ago, Ted dumped me as his wingman. You had a crush on him for a couple weeks? I was Ted's best friend for seven years.
Barney: Seven years!
Barney: Ted. What an idiot. With his stupid "meaningful relationship" with Stella.
Barney: I hate Ted more.
Barney: Probably not quite as much.
Barney: I'm sorry I yelled out "Abby."
Barney: Oh, cool.
Barney: What?
Barney: You know what I hate most about Ted?
Barney: How he's always like, "Oh, I want to fall in love and have a relationship. I care about the people I have s*x with." He's so lame.
Barney: You know what he needs? He needs to see just how horrible he is when he's in a relationship.
Barney: I think so.
Barney: Ted, fancy bumping into you here. Have you guys met my girlfriend Abby?
Barney: Hi, Abby.
Barney: That's right. I am done with this whole being awesome thing. Now I'm all about farmers' markets and day hikes in matching khaki cargo shorts. Isn't that right, sweetie?
Barney: Abby and I are in love. Not hot passionate love. Couple love. You know, movie night with my girlfriend, then waiting for her to go to bed so I can steal one pitiful moment of hollow ecstasy by the cold, blue light of my computer monitor.
Barney: You don't have to say it, though.
Barney: Stop what, Ted? Stop being in love? Next he'll ask us to stop breathing.
Barney: Not before I share with you what being in a relationship leads to, Ted. Abby, Pookie Bear... I am so pathetically desperate for you that... aw, heck, I'll just say it. Would you marry me?
Barney: I would never joke about true love.
Barney: Okay.
Barney: That's you.
Barney: Uh, yes, she does.
Barney: Totally committed to the bit.
Barney: Hey, I think I left my tie here. Have you seen it?
Barney: Yeah, that was a bit. We were doing a bit.
Barney: Abby, I've... I've got some bad news. I can't marry you.
Barney: Ted begged me not to. I think he's in love with you.
Barney: Yes, our plan worked better than we ever dreamed. You have to go to him. Here's his home address. But you know what? He works late, so I wouldn't go before 2:00 or 3:00 in the morning.
Barney: Oh, yeah, I wouldn't worry about that. That's made of candy. Later.
Barney: She's totally hot and really fun.
Barney: (to himself) But she has a dead tooth.
Barney: If memory serves me, she had a huge 'but'. Her huge butt. Nailed it!
Barney: Shotgun.
Barney: Nice.
Barney: (to himself) But she's Canadian.
Barney: I can't think of anything.
Barney: OK, I've got it. Here, put on this eye patch.
Barney: The ultimate ice breaker.
Barney: A bunch of cobras got loose in Central Park. You and I are jogging, training for the Death Valley Iron Man. No big deal, we do it every year. Suddenly we see these snake bastards sneaking towards a little baby. Not on our watch. You grab the kid, I strangle six cobras with my bare hands. Women of New York, one at a time please.
Barney: We got bit.
Barney: They're different eyes. I don't see why this bugs you. Patch up!
Barney: Oh, Theodore...
Barney:...no no no, you can't spell game without me, and me has the best game.
Barney: Oh yeah? I'm the New York state gaming commissioner.
Barney: Wow.
Barney: OK, Marshall.
Barney: Which one of us has more game?
Barney: What? Marshall: If dating is the game, then marriage is winning the game.
Barney: OK. One, we agreed not to ever say 'bra' anymore. It was a good week, we had a lot of fun, but it's over. Two, you've been with Lily for eleven years. You're idea of good game is slapping on a Dr. Seuss hat and flashing two tickets to a Spin Doctors concert.
Barney: Ted, you do not have more game than me. By sheer numbers alone, I win. Come on, dude, you've seen my list.
Barney: Ted, I challenge you to a picking-up-girls Olympiad.
Barney: There will be 26 events spread out over 11 weeks. We will travel to a neutral city where a panel of international judges...
Barney: That's good too.
Barney: How about her?
Barney: Before we start, why don't we jot down a few basic ground rules?
Barney: I win.
Barney: Oh, I slept with her, about a year ago, I just forgot.
Barney: I can't sleep with her again. She hates me.
Barney: By the look of those shoes, here comes your bathroom buddy.
Barney: Whatever, Ted.
Barney: Oh, does she know that one song? Mm-hm chaka, mm-hm chaka. What's that song called? Oh, right, it's called every reggae song.
Barney: Nice.
Barney: Doesn't count.
Barney: OK, Ted, go win the bet. You have my blessing. She's a wonderful girl. I should know.
Barney: We've never shared a woman, have we, Ted? Isn't that funny? You're with her now, I was with her a year ago. You figure for her, that's like 200 showers ago. You gotta ask yourself, Ted, is 200 enough? Ted: You know what, I don't mind. Barney: No, of course you don't mind. Just like the second guy to climb Mt. Everest didn't mind getting all the way to the top only to find Sir Edmund Hilary's flagpole thrust into its supple peak.
Barney: No, I'm sure when you're with her I'll be the furthest thing from your mind. Kissing what I've already kissed. Nuzzling what I've already nuzzled. Going (lowers head slightly and shakes it vigorously) on what I've already gone (lowers head again slightly and shakes it vigorously) on.
Barney: Really? Ted's not afraid of cooties. OK, well then I guess you'd have no problem having a sip of my gin and tonic.
Barney: And I only stirred that with my pinky.
Barney: That's what you think happened.
Barney: Here's the deal. My friend just got dumped so he's a little shy but he'd love to buy you a drink and get to know you. The problem is he thinks a pretty girl like you won't go for a guy like him. So would you slap me across the face so he could see you're not into guys who feed you lines? What do you say? For my friend?
Barney: So now, whatever nice things Ted does for her, in her mind, I'm the guy who's even nicer than him.
Barney: Not even at all.
Barney: It gets better. Remember Ted's phone conversation?
Barney: Well?
Barney: Oh.
Barney: Stacy, right?
Barney: Yeah, wait, don't tell me you go to yoga here too?
Barney: I'm gonna head out to a reggae concert. I'm a huge fan of reggae.
Barney: No way, I wonder why Ted didn't tell me about that. Like I said, I'm a huge reggae fan.
Barney: We are two peas.
Barney: Wow, take care. Namaste.
Barney: So now with Ted out of the picture, I'm gonna swoop in and take the whole thing.
Barney: Translation: 'cause I got game, bitches.
Barney: Hold one, hold on a second. Stacy.
Barney: Hey, stace. What happened? He did not. Stay there, I'll be right over.
Barney: That's what makes you so special, baby.
Barney: Man, I love the office Halloween party. It is so much sluttier than the office Christmas party. Though not as freaky as the office President's Day Rave. Or the office Tu B'Shvat Pajama Jammy-Jam.
Barney: I wouldn't consider any part of that bragging.
Barney: (shudders) Looks like that bee got busy.
Barney: That's a line.
Barney: Does it get any better than this?
Barney: There she is Florence Night-In-Bed-With-A-Stranger.
Barney: Please tell me you are hooking up with one of your co-anchors again. (laughing)
Barney: I care about our precious Earth.
Barney: All you have to do is say "I care about making dreams come true."
Barney: Everyone is in this video. Randy's in the video.
Barney: I'll say this: There is no quit in that guy. You should fire him.
Barney: Marshall popped his cherry! Oh! Come on, Marshall, you have to admit, the guy was a disaster. I mean, it reflected badly on the company. He was an embarrassment. A huge embarrassment.
Barney: See, Marshall, if getting fired is an execution, at least the guy had a last meal. I promise you, tomorrow you'll feel a lot better.
Barney: Uh-oh. I know that smile. Lily, there's no easy way to say this. Marshall's dead. Randy murdered him.
Barney: Anyhoo, while I got you-- big smile. "We care about making dreams come true," in three, two...
Barney: I'm not even here. Randy, the coffee.
Barney: Here, try this, but really go for it. Remember, this guy ruined your life.
Barney: Speaking of pickups, can we try the first one again?
Barney: Yep. That's a wrap.
Barney: Okay, Neruda, this play is extremely complicated.
Barney: It's fine, Ted.
Barney: It's unfortunate!
Barney: I do not know what it is, this shrew. Okay, she has boobs, but... In fact, I see.
Barney: I've never seen.
Barney: I've never seen.
Barney: I've never seen.
Barney: I just said.
Barney: We should not celebrate. Ted has just been dumped.Tell us everything, everything that happened. Seriously, do not forget any details. She said what? You, you said what? How you going? If you had to redo it from start, perhaps you...?
Barney: What a story. What courage to share it with us.
Barney: Of course. You think I'm sleeping in it?
Barney: First, it's a tie night. Second, it's not for comfort. This class is to be at any time.
Barney: Let me tell you a story that happened to me recently.
Barney: But it could happen. If it happened and I was in top form for these oiled bitches, I would regret it.
Barney: Marshall wearing a nightgown! He wears a nightgown! You know when they say, "Remember, he was wearing a nightgown? "It is now! This is a nightgown. Call it, "Held danger of Ninja," if you want. You stay still a transvestite.
Barney: Nice to fly to Neverland with Peter Pan? Me, again! It was nice to get out of bed to accompany Charlie to the chocolate? Oh, me, me! Something about Scrooge! Come on, guys. I do all the work.
Barney: It is pretty!
Barney: You know not to play bridge, eh?
Barney: If the angel Clarence says it's true, it should be.
Barney: Why are you wearing this stuff?
Barney: You can not even give five.
Barney: I have to stand still to avoid offending my pajama suit.But at least I do not wear a dress.
Barney: I feel a little breeze there. It's nice.
Barney: The Little Barney says "Mahalo."
Barney: My God, what has happened?
Barney: The show! Sorry. It happened something?
Barney: It's called a shirt.
Barney: Calm down! Let us be calm! I have a question. This is how when you're in bed?
Barney: You're at home, every night, and Lily layer always with you?
Barney: Tell me about marriage.
Barney: The coffee too?
Barney: I love flowers. And sometimes when you're afraid of making wrong choices and you're not the one you wanted to be, what it does?
Barney: It's beautiful. And it helps you to find other girls to sleep with?
Barney: I'll be right there.
Barney: Invitations for the demolition of The Arcadian. As head of the project, I get to decide how we knock it down. I'm torn between training an actual coyote to use an ACME dynamite plunger, or hooking up a fuse to Eddie Van Halen's guitar that goes off the second he hits the last note to "Hot For Teacher." Barney! Barney! Bar... No, no. I'm going to go coyote.
Barney: Oh, come on. Zoey's not shutting anything down, standing out there with her stupid megaphone, screaming in the wind; butt cheeks trembling with fury; her perky breasts heaving; her self-righteous nipples...
Barney: Point is, we are taking her and The Arcadian down. Am I right, Teddy Westside?
Barney: Glad to know she's also mouthy in a good way. What up? Dude, that's his girlfriend.
Barney: Not only do you quit the job I stuck my neck out to get you, now you sabotage the project I'm in charge of? Is this because I brushed Lily's boob with my elbow, the other day?
Barney: I mean this is really like...
Barney: No. I' was... I was...
Barney: Pfff. Try 283. 250 was months ago. No, no, no. No, I mean, you're totally 250, baby. No, don't. (The girl leaves)
Barney: Are you sure it doesn't taste like anything else?
Barney: Kent! Kent!
Barney: That's what you get, you traitor!
Barney: Yeah. Really.
Barney: I'm a B-plus. My whole life, I was hoping to be an A, and I'm a B-plus. And I'm okay with that.
Barney: Hey there, darlin'. How you doin'? Ah, is this your sister? Mmm... Beautiful. Mmm...
Barney: Show me chicken wings!
Barney: Do you know what I had to do to get you that job?
Barney: What, wear a wrinkled suit and not give a damn about what your hair looked like?
Barney: Oh, my God.
Barney: Ever since my father walked out on my childhood, I've had serious abandonment issues. You walking out on me like that...
Barney: It made me wonder, "What could I have done to make him stay?"
Barney: That's what everyone keeps saying but people just keep leaving me.
Barney: Your place or mi... Your place or mi... Le-Let's go to your place. Mm.
Barney: I love you.
Barney: Uh, no. N-Not right...
Barney: You have some coffee? So I can throw it in this traitor's face?
Barney: I love you. Uh, no. N-not right...
Barney: What kind of dirtbag doesn't stand by his best friends, but instead sides with some self-righteous bitch with a pointless cause and a megaphone?
Barney: Whoa, whoa, you have got to be kidding me. Ted...
Barney: Yeah... someone. So... why did you vomit? You're pregnant?
Barney: The Bro's Life magazine. Page 83. Look.
Barney: Lowest.
Barney: Highest.
Barney: The Girl of the Year in May, according to Bro's Life magazine. A delicate flower in stiletto heel leopard thong and riding a 4x4.
Barney: I have an appointment with.
Barney: It's not in the story. I waited a long time to say that.This girl... is the daughter.
Barney: Marrying? I have something even more special in mind. Petra, if all goes well, will be my... wait, my 200th! Can not wait. Too exciting.
Barney: Who I'll lie. I want the highest "Tope there."
Barney: As if there could be too much of something wonderful."Babe Ruth, gently, my grandfather. Do not hit too many home runs. Steve Guttenberg, you should not do that three Police Academy. America has laughed enough. "
Barney: 199 satisfied customers. Finally, the big night is Thursday. I give a reception before, in McClaren's. Prepares a toast. Tuxedo optional but desired. Gifts are, I would say useless, but follow your heart.
Barney: It's not too much.
Barney: Thank you.
Barney: It's more than 20. B. Does nothing more precise estimate.
Barney: Jealous. Jealous. Hero. Strangely silent during this conversation on his number of sexual partners. Hero. The grand total, it is the only number that matters.
Barney: Matthew Panning, the stud of Port Richmond College.
Barney: You neither.
Barney: You know what, Matthew? One day, I would have done with 200.
Barney: And I'll call.
Barney: I will... the call.
Barney: What? Let me see. Sixty... Once. Oh, my God. Wait...I counted the same girl twice? That means I'm only at 198?
Barney: I win a Czech supermodel in two hours. I can not waste it in the 199th. Petra must be the 200th.
Barney: Astronaut Millionaire. You come home to see shells?
Barney: I come from the grave of my wife. I buried her there was just one year. I miss her. I need comfort.
Barney: You're not as sick of all these games? I just want to settle down and have an army of toddlers at once.
Barney: Marshall? Knowing how important it is for me, you think that Lily... I would do the job...
Barney: Okay.
Barney: It's done. 199 made of, more than one. Have you finished your drink? (He takes the ice in the glass of Ted and puts them under the table) That's better.
Barney: There... a girl in the gym. Pauline. She runs after me for a while.
Barney: It's not really my type.
Barney: Good, Pauline. You're going to have all of Fonte Leveuse Sarasota Classic this fall. I thought... to you and me.And if you're still interested...
Barney: Good grief! Mom!
Barney: Every inch tasted like roast beef and creatine. But I did. I did and I still have 30 minutes before meeting with Petra.Robin, you have the foundation? I want to cover bruises and razor burn.
Barney: What?
Barney: So that means... Pauline is not the 199th, it is the 200th?
Barney: It must have Petra! Petra was to be the 200th!Beautiful, feminine, "unrestrained power in bed", Petra!
Barney: It does. She will be in the next Muscle Sexxy. And like many women in this magazine, Sexxy has two X and one Y.
Barney: What about the graphics.
Barney: It's you, sustained growth.
Barney: I slept with 200 women.
Barney: You've thought of consulting as "I win, you lose"?Suddenly, your 100 girls in fifth, it is so impressive.
Barney: Of course.
Barney: Of course.
Barney: Jealous?
Barney: I'm awesome. 200. Now what?
Barney: You just checked out Robin's ass.
Barney: Dude, that's awesome! You're finally forgetting about that short redhead.
Barney: Yes, Lily, thank you. That was gonna drive me crazy all night. Hey, Ted! Marshall's just checked out your girlfriend's ass.
Barney: This is the moment I've been waiting for. Starting tonight, I'm gonna teach you how to live. Ted, you're out of chance, Marshall's in.
Barney: Marshall, being a single guy in New York city is like... Pfff... What does everybody like?
Barney: Yeah! It's like being in a candy store. You just walk right in and grab yourself some Whoppers. Yeah. Is Whoppers the best ones?
Barney: Milk Duds.
Barney: Um...
Barney: Nice! Marshall, we're doing this. I am not taking no for an answer.
Barney: Hi. Have you met Marshall?
Barney: I-I-I Hate to interrupt but, uh... Do you like magic?
Barney: Dude, you were awesome last night. You were charming, you were funny. You were totally working that girl.
Barney: Yes, I did. But she told me that if it wasn't for me you would've had a shot with her. So in hypothetical terms, you scored last night! All right! Hypothetical high five! Nice! Tonight, we're gonna go to the bar...
Barney: Come on! I'll teach you all my strategies!
Barney: My favorite, number seven. Create a mystery about yourself. That way, they become so intrigued that they have to hang out with you all night.
Barney: Maybe it does and maybe it doesn't.
Barney: Let's review Barney's rules for mating without dating. Lesson two: corollary five.
Barney: Excellent. Have you chosen your entrée?
Barney: Her? Really? No, you're right. Ambition is the enemy of success. OK, hit it.
Barney: Nice recovery. I think it's working.
Barney: Hi. Amy, do you like... magic?
Barney: I am so sorry. It's a sickness. I'm the real victim here.
Barney: I know but tonight...
Barney: I'm taking a leak, dumb-ass.
Barney: Marshall Eriksen, suit up!
Barney: Yeah you're good in that. Let's go.
Barney: Come on...
Barney: There is nothing in my sl...
Barney: Huh? Huh? Let's go.
Barney: Oh there is nothing behind your... Ohh!
Barney: Hi, I'm Barney.
Barney: Do you mind giving my friend your phone number?
Barney: Sorry buddy, I'm taking this one too.
Barney: I'm not giving you...
Barney: Stop it!
Barney: Stop! If we can't settle this like gentlemen, then no one gets the number. (He sends the card across the window).
Barney: No, wait. Come on. Wait. Marshall! 81st and 1st please. (He pulls the card out of his sleeve). Oh, she does have a cute handwriting.
Barney: Hi Marshall.
Barney: OK. I know what I did a couple nights back was is in a moral grey area. But the great news is she loved you. If things had gone your way, you'd gone out a couple time, I think she definitely would've had s*x with you.
Barney: You can't give up now. What if I told you that you could relive that night with the exact same conversations, the exact same jokes, only this time you get her and I don't.
Barney: Oh, but it is. She has... Wait for it. Here it comes. Almost there...an identical twin. Yes!
Barney: Of course, it is. What do you think "identical" means? "Ident-" - same. "-ical" - person. Same person. Hey, we could double date.
Barney: Ah!
Barney: Used-up? They're a human being Marshall.
Barney: How are you doing?
Barney: You are. You definitely are. Listen, you're gonna have to leave now. I just talked with the twins and, get this, I'm going home with both of them! Yeah. That's happening.
Barney: But they're twins.
Barney: Well, it's not like a candy store. It's a lawless, post-apocalyptic wasteland. I may be your best friend...
Barney:...but in this world it's every hombre for himself. That's what being single is. And after nine years of captivity, that is the single greatest lesson I can teach you about surviving in the wild. Now, if you'll excuse me, I have two unique breasts an two duplicates waiting for me. (Barney rejoins the twins, Marshall leaves the bar). Oh bad news. Marshall got food poisoning.
Barney: Yeah. I guess we're just a threesome tonight.
Barney: So then, I was promoted to assistant ménage-er. Manager. Why do I keep doing that? (Lily arrives.) Lily?
Barney: So, where was I? Ah yes. Assistant ménage-er. I did it again. I can't believe it!
Barney: Wait, wait, I know magic. Well played, Eriksen. Well played.
Barney: Okay, okay. A couple of things. Lily, how'd I do?
Barney: Secondly, Ted, I'm sorry I said mean things about Zoey. Are you really going to walk away from this project just because you're mad at me?
Barney: I understand. Zoey has magic lady bits.
Barney: Zoey's lady bits... are magic, and that's how she controls your mind. You see, every few hundred millennia, lady bits leap forward...
Barney: I once knew such a girl.
Barney: It was last call. In this very bar.
Barney: What...?! No... What?!...No... What?!
Barney: Come on. This is so about the girl.
Barney: Oh, you're not sorry now, Ted Mosby. But you will be. You... will... be. (laughing harder and louder) That's how you do an evil laugh. Ciao for now.
Barney: Hi, Arthur. Everything okay?
Barney: Isn't that animal cruelty?
Barney: Oh. That's fine, then. So listen, you know Ted, the architect?
Barney: So, if Ted stood up at that big meeting tomorrow and said that he thought The Arcadian should be a landmark... You wouldn't just fire him, would you? (laughing uncomfortably) Right? You wouldn't just... You wouldn't just... yeah...
Barney: Come again for Big Fudge?
Barney: Can you believe that?! I can't be unemployed, Robin! My job is my identity; It's who I am. It gives me the confidence I need to convince girls I'm a fighter pilot.
Barney: I don't understand. Why would you fire me?
Barney: By being the best architect available?
Barney: By... being Latino?
Barney: Guys, I'm telling you, if Ted Mosby isn't fantastic, fire me.
Barney: Damn it! I was kidding?
Barney: I'm not kidding! Oh, by the way, Arthur, uh, how are things with you and your wife?
Barney: We'll end up out of a job, all thanks to some stupid, only sort of awesome lion head.
Barney: We should totally buy a bar!
Barney: The only court where you show up, then get served.
Barney: Oh, this ought to be good.
Barney: Oh, this is good!
Barney: Hey, Arthur!
Barney: Listen, Arthur, Marshall's wife has an idea for how we can save, not saving The Arcadian.
Barney: Uh... Hey, Arthur?
Barney: I don't know, she may have been right about that lion's head. It gave The Arcadian a regal elegance. Then again, it goes really nice with my duvet. (He takes out a normal size screw driver) I hope I used the right screws.
Barney: There are two students out, and they look easy!
Barney: I already did that. 21 years.
Barney: Excuse me one second. (Barney leads Ted to the bar entrance) What is your problem? We will not see them play.
Barney: If you go see them, it is not better than blondes showing their tits at a concert by Van Halen.
Barney: If you want to sleep with Van Halen, do it on your spare time. We're not guys who-could-come-you-see. It is the other guys, those older, who ever came and whose recognition is required.
Barney: Exactly. (They go see the girls) This is a great meeting, I think that we can come. Another time, girls.
Barney: Excuse us a minute. (Barney leads Ted still at the entrance of the bar) Have you gone crazy? We do not want their numbers.
Barney: Qua na you exchange a number, you give him the opportunity to call to cancel. If you give a number without an appointment, they must come. Checkmate! No number, just my fingers. Truck.
Barney: Why not arrange to meet you here tomorrow night to 22h.
Barney: Whatever happens, we will be there.
Barney: Sorry one last time.
Barney: Well done.
Barney: At tomorrow night.
Barney: 'Definitely. Great! "Dude, these students seem stupid.
Barney: Awesome. Here's the thing: tomorrow night, dress up well, it will move!
Barney: You always imagine the worst. Ted, I promise, everything will be okay. It begins to snow.
Barney: But if it will come. It has to. If I can touch one of those girls, I get a "Bingo party student." Come on, Ted. You're the only one here.
Barney: Every year, Playboy publishes a list of the best student parties in the country. I take the top 25, and I do... a bingo card. All I need now that Arizona Tech, which is crazy. In a contest, it would be given automatically.
Barney: Just me.
Barney: The goal is to make it five in a row.
Barney: I have a bingo.
Barney: And it rocks here, yo!
Barney: selfish b*st*rd! There are two cannons girls who come to us here.
Barney: Serve the guns first?
Barney: Of course, we should have a bar!
Barney: It really should have a bar.
Barney: And dude, dude, dude, dude... The name of our bar will be... Puzzles. People will, "Why Puzzles? "That's the puzzle.
Barney: No nightcap!
Barney: There should be a bar.
Barney: It happens, keep tap. We will buy one.
Barney: Served.
Barney: And prem's.
Barney: Prem's, prem's prem's.
Barney: Is there anything in a gin and tonic? There's what in a gin and tonic?
Barney: No nightcap! (The phone rings) Puzzles, Barney here.
Barney: Last glass.
Barney: Okay, go. You are not obliged to return, but you can not stay. I always wanted to say that. I mean, in a bar. I say all the time with me.
Barney: We should do what? Carl will be there from one moment to another.
Barney: We should start a band.
Barney: The flute section does she see anyone?
Barney: Bingo!
Barney: Lily, do you remember the band you guys almost hired for your wedding?
Barney: No, no.
Barney: That's ridiculous.
Barney: You gonna put out?
Barney: What? There's only one reason he's taking her to this dinner and it's not so little Mutu can get his malaria pills.
Barney: What? You done? Great. Check out table number four. See that little hottie on the end. She's short but has an ample bosom. I love it. She's like half-boob. Let's go.
Barney: Daddy's home.
Barney: Yeah.
Barney: Hm. Yeah, I think it's pretty solid.
Barney: (holding up small yellow piece of paper) Then Daddy wouldn't have gotten this seven-digit Father's Day card from Amy, huh?
Barney: Ted, your problem is all you do is think, think, think. I'm teaching you how to do, do, do.
Barney: Totally.
Barney: Oh yes it can.
Barney: Ted, I believe you and I met for a reason. It's like the universe was saying, hey, Barney, there's this dude, he's pretty cool but it's your job to make him awesome. Your brain screws you up, Ted. It gets in the way. It happened with Robin, it happened with half-boob. And it's gonna keep on happening until you power down that bucket of neuroses inebriation-style.
Barney: Oh no. I want you to do five shots.
Barney: No, don't think. Do.
Barney: I love it, I love it, I love it.
Barney: No....Dammit.
Barney: No, no, that's a great idea. That's the whole point of getting drunk. You do things you would never do in a million years if you were sober.
Barney: Ding, class dismissed. Here you go, kid, you call whoever you want.
Barney: Hello.
Barney: The porcelain keeps the suit from wrinkling.
Barney: Don't worry, I slept through it. (laughs) I totally didn't sleep through it. For a little girl, you've got a big tank.
Barney: Oh, you put Ted to bed all right.
Barney: Hey, hey hey hey, he rallies. And the night begins now.
Barney: All right, game face on. Carl, two more. All right, all right, what do we think of this one?
Barney: Ehhh! Trick question, no thinking. You know what time it is? It's do o'clock. Let's ride.
Barney: Have you met Ted?
Barney: You're calling Robin.
Barney: Ted, as your mentor and spiritual guide, I forbid you from calling her.
Barney: If you complete that call, I will set your coat on fire.
Barney: Real suede wouldn't have gone up so fast. You got robbed, this is a blend.
Barney: Who is she?
Barney: Nice.
Barney: No, after I hosed you down with a beverage gun, I brought you back here.
Barney: Sleep it off, bra.
Barney: Oh come on. You've gotta give me this one. Those five shots got you farther with Robin than your brain ever did. See what happens when you don't think? You do! More importantly, you do Robin. Come on.
Barney: Someone get him a shot, he's thinking again.
Barney: Daddy's home.
Barney: Daddy's home.
Barney: OK, fair enough. I've got to prove a point to a friend, so you just gave me your number and your name is Amy.
Barney: Ladies.
Barney: Robin.
Barney: Top of the morning.
Barney: I'm good.
Barney: What? No! You can't go now. It's the night before Thanksgiving. College chicks are back in town. Their moms just made a snide comment about the weight they gained. They called her a bitch, but deep down, they know she's right. And they're about to walk through that door, where we will be waiting with some light beer and some rock hard approval. Wh-what u-up?
Barney:...To me.
Barney: And then I'm just going to leave her there... buck-naked, covered in candle wax, tied to the bed.
Barney: Wait... Ted doesn't like that girl?
Barney: It was legen-- wait for Ted to leave, 'cause he's now The Blitz-- -- dary. Legendary!
Barney: Well, not anymore, Blitz.
Barney: Hey, Robin, you should dance on the oven.
Barney: Full disclosure. We also used all your butter, greasing up Lily so we could see how far we could slide her down the hall.
Barney: Huh. I should probably disconnect the gas.
Barney: Um... Um... I'm have... I'm having trouble breathing!
Barney: And here's the twist, Babaka. Because Ted left early, he's now The Blitz.
Barney: No. I c... Because... Step on it.
Barney: But he's The Blitz.
Barney: Oh, God, no!
Barney: Sure. But... no one move while I'm gone. (whispering): I'm scared.
Barney: Thanks. You're the only one who's nice to me about this.
Barney: What happened?
Barney: Aw, man! You said I could leave the room!
Barney: No! Y-You... Robin, Robin. I will pay you to be The Blitz. $100! No-- $10,000. No-- 60 bucks. That's a lot of money for someone like you.
Barney: I'm not any Blitz! You're The Blitz! You're all The Blitz! I slept with that cute Indian girl who cuts my hair!
Barney: Nothing! I just forgot to brag about it before!
Barney: Hey, guys, the most amazing thing just happened to me in that other roo... Aw, man.
Barney: Aw, man! Wait. Which half?
Barney: What happened? I saw it!
Barney: Thank you, God!
Barney: You believe not what happened last night laser tag.
Barney: Yeah, almost.
Barney: Go! You want that!
Barney: Come on.
Barney: sh1t.
Barney: I know, I'm not your precious rules, McCracken, but, damn, the results are there!
Barney: You forget what it's there. Your fat ass is stuck here for too long.
Barney: My pleasure. Do not do that. This game is all I have.And I nearly enough tickets for the remote controlled helicopter. Pity.
Barney: You regret it.
Barney: What shall I do? I'll tell you that Ted and I will do. We will introduce and apply the PQ everywhere.
Barney: Ted, laser tag has no age limit. As the striptease in the West Midlle.
Barney: No list of Murtaugh.
Barney: There's nothing on this list for which you're too old. In fact, if you did everything on the Murtaugh list, I would call it a nice weekend.
Barney: Challenge accepted. The next 24 hours, I will do everything on the list. And after that, you go to the PQ laser tag with me.
Barney: I'll spend three hours listening to you talk about architecture.
Barney: Come on guys, you do it!
Barney: "To pierce the ear. "Done. Well, I go to a laundry at my mother. (Barney hand, then returned several hours later) Do you mind if I use your futon?
Barney: Put it there, guys.
Barney: It's on the list. "Landing on the futon with a friend rather than going to the hotel. "
Barney: What, this? Just a quick foul '. Just a kid like me has to worry about. Then, "pushing a medical" on the list. (His phone rings) Hold on. Bar here...
Barney: Done. (Barney is McClaren's) "Drinking shots with strangers. "Done.
Barney: No, it's just the raver's hump. I like it. It brings me closer to my glass. A youth! (He can not drink his glass) You should have a straw?
Barney: Hi, this is Barney.
Barney: We can not answer because...
Barney: Part shopping. Leave a message, you are reminded...
Barney:... we...
Barney: "Making an autoresponder message to two annoying."Done. It will probably cost me a few appointments, but it's okay.
Barney: It's good.
Barney: New bet, then. If you can finish your list before me, we will cover the laser PQ and you pay toilet paper.Biodegradable and not this crap. I want up there forever.
Barney: Bet held.
Barney: I just had a little "screw up my knee and it hurts" incident.
Barney: It... "Helped to move the sixth floor walk against pizza and beer."
Barney: Ted Calls. I want to go.
Barney: It answers?
Barney: Hurry up, Robin.
Barney: Come on, Ted. I was given aspirin and I do not think it was.
Barney: No, he remains a. "The beer funnel. "
Barney: No, no. Okay. You won, I hate it. I hate it. My back is killing me. At the rave, I was mistaken for a cop. I have an earache so I can hear... I hear my own ear. Think about it. My clothes... What... Take that! I have redeemed you your best costume for twice its price. This is... $ 30. And throw the shoes. You won, Ted. I will not make anything of the Murtaugh list. I'm too old for this stuff.
Barney: And then the hospital.
Barney: Really?
Barney: Not an eight.
Barney: That girl over there.
Barney: Oh I know what we do here. Tell me when it stops.
Barney: Even when I arrived here, she still will not touch with a man. I feel good tonight, this evening will be well.
Barney: No way, no one could sleep while wearing it. Challenge accepted. I, Barney Stinson, brilliant mind in an extraordinary body, this will overalls, and lie with a woman.
Barney: No. They are called not on the shirt, or on t-shirts for wholesale repairing the car and my mother spent some time with her top. They are called overalls, and I can relate to what I want.
Barney: I offer you a drink?
Barney: What do I do?
Barney: Ted, will you calm down? I'm your pal!
Barney: And I know our relationship has suffered in this area, I assure you I'll be the perfect gentleman.
Barney: You have 10 minutes to get here, the window closes.
Barney: Yeah, because we're friends!
Barney: Really...
Barney: I'm challenged to have s*x with overalls. And if you stay on my path, then you let Barney win. And you do not want that!This place will never tell us the end of history.
Barney: Yeah, I'll sleep with her. After, he'll tell her he loves her.And you can do... what you want. Is there agreement on the order?
Barney: I wear this jumpsuit since 1:30!
Barney: Guys, let me assure you that if you let me... the window will reopen in about 10 minutes.
Barney: Well, I found! There are bars country, "the giddy ups", there are tons of guys in overalls. Copilot me!
Barney: Let me tell you where I am... I want to sleep with a girl in order to remove this jumpsuit. (From Ted) Go, go. You gotta help me, I have to remove this damn thing.
Barney:... seen.
Barney: Guys, guys! Guess what Robin has done.
Barney: You're currently whining?
Barney: Not as much as me, Robin. Guys, guys! Guess what Robin has done.
Barney: And then I just tell you guys what Robin has done, but you were there for. I must tell you the rest of the wedding. Aunt Meredith!
Barney: Robin whining during the song Clint. Oh, I've already said. The super good sister of Ted, Heather!
Barney: Uncle Larry, sky gods. Niagara Falls. It is empty.
Barney: Sorry Robin. They are all out of pretzels. And I know how you're emotional. (He gives her a stack of paper towels) Shh. Leave it alone.
Barney: She cried to the song of Clint.
Barney: And that was fine with Blair Witch, and she tried to haggle on closing costs?
Barney: Is it in the room with us right now, Ted?
Barney: The dumbest thing that ON've ever done.
Barney: No, it's too dumb to whether adult. It should be child when it happened.
Barney: Put rockets in...
Barney: Gamin.
Barney: You know, I'm glad Robin have guessed. Because it is really sensitive and fragile. I talk about the times she cried during the song Clint. And while I whisper, I hope she hears me.
Barney: I know it's silly, but... And the dragon. They are happy, you know?
Barney: I shall spin you 500 dollars if it happened to you instead of me.
Barney: Thank you, Robin. You saved me an explanation and an excruciating public humiliation. Guys! Guys! Guess what Robin has done.
Barney: Wait, you're...
Barney: Wait, wait. You will inspect the place where now?
Barney: It was Robin! "What! "Yes, it was Robin who cried at the song Clint! But she said... I know what she said. But that's not what she wanted you to know.
Barney: Of course.
Barney: sh1t.
Barney: I see a complaint.
Barney: Thank you. My God.
Barney: OK, buddy. Sometimes people make bad decisions in life. Like your mother.
Barney: Ted, as you know, I've always been really, really addicted to your mother.
Barney: Actually, Virginia and I spent a special time in 2006.Before Clint.
Barney: I wanted to be your father!
Barney: Do not answer me, young man. That's why I cried at the song of Clint. Because that b*st*rd stole your mother. And now all that remains for me... is the memory of the drop at the airport.
Barney: And that's how you got the pin? Incredible. You... So... here we go.
Barney: It is a good time. Not much traffic...
Barney: Is it true? Hmm. I can... Listen... Ted's mother. I... I should really...
Barney: Okay, that's good. Well, I invented the last, but everything else, I swear it was true. Come on, man. Your mother is a cougar.
Barney: Okay, this is a Mellencamp.
Barney: Your mother and I were at second base.
Barney: Your team lost 20 minutes ago.
Barney: Something strange is going on. I was down at the hardware store trying to get a little somethin' somethin'.
Barney: There are four kinds of women who go to the hardware store by themselves.
Barney: Single, recently single, recently divorced, lesbian who will let me watch.
Barney: Sorry. Five. Recently widowed. So, I'm talking to this girl...
Barney: Look, I'm sure he's in a better place. Now let's find you a sturdier ladder.
Barney: I was only gone for a second when...
Barney: See? Skid-proof.
Barney: The same thing happened at the pet store yesterday.
Barney: God bless you, Ted. You're reading my blog.
Barney: I'd call your ex a dog, but that would be an insult to little Ladybug here.
Barney: Not without a chew toy from Uncle Barney first. And when I got back... I'm sorry,I'm already spoiling her but diamond in the rough... Could your heart just melt?
Barney: Weird, right? Yeah. The same thing happened last week at the museum.
Barney: Lily.
Barney: No. Marshall.
Barney: Oh. No. Robin.
Barney: Bingo! So, I was talking to this girl...
Barney: At this point, about 83%. Soon, these audio guides will be all that I have left.
Barney: My God, you are beautiful. How about I get you a headset so you can see with your ears like I do? I couldn't have been gone more than 20 seconds, but when I came back... Hmm.You know, I also love the smell of great art.
Barney: Why does this keep happening?
Barney: Oh, really? Then why am I not in prison for perjury? But I don't want to talk about work. Something weird is going on here.
Barney: Alan Alda. It was Alan Alda.
Barney: Who was that, um, guy from Mash? The main guy. What...? Hawkeye from Mash. How can I be blanking on this?
Barney: No.
Barney: Oh, my God. Where is she?
Barney: Well, she-she said I hooked up with her? What was her name? What did she look like?
Barney: Dead in the eyes with an aura of self-loathing and despair?
Barney: That's all of them. Okay. Stay calm. Let's think this through. One of the girls who I lied to, seduced and abandoned is trying to ruin my life. Shouldn't be too hard to figure out which one it is. Oh, dear God!
Barney: Some woman that I slept with and screwed over is trying to ruin my life. God, why is this happening to me?
Barney: Nah, it's not Karma. She's stripping in Vegas. Plus, we're good.
Barney: My list? Dude, do not pretend you're not the kind of guy who keeps a list of all the girls he's slept with.
Barney: Ted, don't be crass. I would never demean the women that I've slept with by putting their names on some tawdry list.
Barney: This is a scrapbook of all of the women I've slept with. I made it at the Scrapbook Barn on 7th. Ask for Heloise. Tell her I sent you. What do you think, Lil? You recognize the saboteur?
Barney: All of them, but only about half buy a copy on the way out.
Barney: Absolutely. And what I do with these women should be between me and them. And you guys. And Heloise. She helped me do the decoupage.
Barney: This is impossible. There's too many girls. How the hell am I gonna narrow this down?
Barney: The top 64 women I've slept with, split into four regions. This tournament will systematically narrow down which girl has the most cause to hate my guts. Last girl standing has to be the saboteur.
Barney: Okay, okay, everybody! Hands.
Barney: Okay, toss up. "Thought I was Jorge Posada," or "You have my dead wife's kidney?"
Barney: That's true...
Barney: Down to the sweet 16. And coming out of the Upper West Side, we have the number three seed, "Girl who thought I owned Google," up against the number seven seed, "Girl who thought I was a scuba instructor."
Barney: Yeah, she did.
Barney: I'm going with Evil Twin.
Barney: Sorry, but I did sleep with that girl twice. As Barney and Larney. Okay, we're down to the Final Four. What do you think, people? Come on, dig deep.
Barney: Come on! Marshall?
Barney: Mosby?
Barney: Okay. Then this is as far as we get. The Final Four. It's got to be Meg, Anna, Kate or Holly. We are gonna track these girls down, and you're going to tell me which one approached you at the bar.
Barney: Okay, there's her building. When she comes out, I'm gonna hide, and once you figure out if she's the girl from the bar, we run like hell.
Barney: What do you mean "no"?
Barney: Are you nuts? That would involve me speaking to a woman I've already had s*x with, which, frankly, is a little t like changing the oil in a rental car.
Barney: Lily, this girl hates me. I hooked up with her in an apartment I was pretending was my own, told her I loved her, and then ditched her there. She got arrested for trespassing, bit a cop, and spent eight days in jail. Oh, crap, there she is! If she sees me, she's gonna kill me!
Barney: If she kills me, I want you to go into my apartment, grab the metal briefcase under my bed and throw it in the East River.
Barney: Look, Meg, we need to talk.
Barney: And I forgive you. I love you.
Barney: So you remember who this one is, right?
Barney: Right, and if you recall, her computer had a web cam and a T-1 line, so I...
Barney: Ah, there she is.
Barney: You're really enjoying this, aren't you?
Barney: Anna, hi.
Barney: What Web site?
Barney: You're right, I do deserve that. That's all I came here to say. You know what? I don't care who knows about it. Excuse me. Excuse me. I, Ted Mosby, am a jerk to women. Tell your sisters. Tell your daughters to stay away! Ted-Mosby-Is-A-Jerk-dot-com.
Barney: She's...
Barney: Is it her?
Barney: You look good. Have you lost weight?
Barney: We're down to the number one seed. I knew it was Holly. It had to be Holly. Man, I was hoping it wasn't Holly.
Barney: But in my defense, she was kind of annoying.
Barney: Holly.
Barney: Well then, to the last Fourth of July weekend I'll spend getting eaten alive by mosquitoes.
Barney: No, the worst part is that we still have no idea who my stalker is.
Barney: That's not a bad idea.
Barney: I'm in.
Barney: Talking, we should be talking. Words. Here are words. Why is this so hard? Laughter!
Barney: Hey, there, how are you doing?
Barney: Wow, you really are awful at this, aren't you?
Barney: It's supposed to look like we're about to hook up, Robin.
Barney: Usually I just lean in and whisper this one thing in their ear. You're a little turned on right now, aren't you?
Barney: Uh, I'm going to go to the bathroom now, but, uh, when I come back we'll go to my place and have s*x.
Barney: I don't recognize her. She's not on the Top 64.
Barney: I don't even recognize her. I don't remember you. I've spent the last two days trying to remember every girl that I've slept with and all the horrible things that I have done to them. And I have done some horrible things. I mean, at one point, I'm pretty sure I sold a woman. I didn't speak the language, but I shook a guy's hand, he gave me the keys to a Mercedes, and I left her there. I'm the guy who keeps a scrapbook of all of the women I have slept with, but I never thought I was the guy who would sleep with a girl and not even remember her. So from the bottom of my heart, for whatever I did to you, I apologize.
Barney: What? What?
Barney: So I apologized for nothing?
Barney: I can't say I blame you.
Barney: Dude, you can't whip that out at brunch.
Barney: That's crazy. Nobody's turned on by men's calves. They're a thoroughly unerotic body part.
Barney: I'll be waiting by the phone for your apology.
Barney: I can't say I blame you.
Barney: Uh... I'm here to meet your parents. They must be dying to meet me after all the legendary Barney stories you've told them.
Barney: What?
Barney: But I'm your best friend.
Barney: I'm the most important person in your life.
Barney: How could your parents not know about me? I'm delightful.
Barney: Oh, really? Then I guess those shoes aren't the thing you're most wrong about today.
Barney: Barney Stinson. An honor to meet the two of you. That needlepoint "Bless This Mess" pillow you made for Ted - what a stitch. Stitch! Did that just happen? (Ted's parents and Barney laugh)
Barney: I know.
Barney: Well, lucky for you, I happen to know the head waitress, which is ironic because...
Barney: Ironic because we both work at a homeless shelter where I serve the food. Where do you volunteer, Robin?
Barney: Robin, I'm his best friend. That's a commitment. Girlfriend? That's like a bad flu. Out of your system after a couple weeks in bed. High five!
Barney: Yes, you can, Virginia. There's a story behind that broach, and I'm going to hear it.
Barney: No, Virginia, you're delightful, I am deligh-ted. And he's just Ted. I'm really not planning these things; they just keep happening.
Barney: Anyone up for a drink at MacLaren's?
Barney: St. Peter's, 8:45 a.m., it's my favorite service.
Barney: I'll save you a seat.
Barney: Susan, her name is Virginia.
Barney: Dude, I am sincerely ticked at your dad right now.
Barney: Last night, we go to MacLaren's for a drink, right?
Barney: Oh, I'm no hero, Wendy. You know who is a hero? My Dalmatian, Smokey. He... didn't... make it out. I'm sorry.
Barney: I'm... oh. (They hug).
Barney: I'm not done. So, your dad stays to finish his drink, but I take off because I have to be up early for Mass with your mom.
Barney: Anyway, I realize that I left my phone on the bar, so I come back...
Barney: I know. Can you believe your dad rack-jacked me like that?
Barney: Ted, it's a well-known statistic that 83% of people married longer than six months are seeing someone on the side.
Barney: You think I'm lying. Well, have you done any surveys on the subject? Because the good people at www.swingers.open-marriage-is-natural-legalize-polygamy.org have, and they beg to differ.
Barney: Oh, and I suppose I didn't get a real T-shirt for running in their 10K.
Barney: Well, you didn't get your dad's close-the-deal gene, that's for sure.
Barney: Ooh, a piano!
Barney: What happened to Marshall and Lily?
Barney: You know, he mentioned he was divorced last night. I totally spaced on that. Ooh, no line at the omelet station.
Barney: ♪ And we bang chicks in Ted's room. ♪
Barney: What? That's... What is that word you taught me? "Bull" something?
Barney: But you're supposed to take me to see that Zeppelin cover band next week. The night is gonna be... Led-and-Jerry.
Barney: A drunk audience.
Barney: Bye.
Barney: I am so angry at my dad! Guess who called me today. Go on, guess.
Barney: My dad!
Barney: Barney Stinson.
Barney: Ooh, hold on, let me check my personality. Oh, no. Turns out I would never do that in a million years.
Barney: You do not know how right you are.
Barney: Zero right! We're not getting too old for anything.
Barney: I have to face an ugly truth. Jerry Whittaker, my own father, is anti-awesome-etic. I know Crazy Jerry's still in there somewhere, but he's trapped under 20 years of lawnmower parties and carpool barbecues.
Barney:Well, this Saturday night, I am bustin' him out. I'm gonna make Jerry realize he was wrong about giving up his old life by showing him the awesomest night of all time. And for the awesomest night of all time, I'm going to need the awesomest friends of all time. Okay, who do I know? Guys...! Do any of you know George Clooney?
Barney: Okay, my dad's almost here. I need everything to be as awesome as possible tonight.
Barney:No. That's why I brought these guys. (He gets several cards out of his inside pocket) I've made some minor improvements to your identities. Uh. Mm! You'll find them on these cards.
Barney:Yeah.
Barney:Robin, no one watches the news unless it's a car chase or a nip slip. You are now a professional scotch taster. Lily, Jerry needs to learn that other lifestyles are just as fulfilling as monogamy, so now you and Marshall are in an open marriage.
Barney:Also, Marshall, you can't just be unemployed, so you are now a gin-swilling, womanizing playwright. And, Ted, just be yourself. (chuckles) Just kidding. Here's a giant pile of topics you should avoid talking about.
Barney:Ted, card.
Barney:Finally... Robin, you're dating Ted.
Barney: I can't have any single female friends lying around. My dad'll be all, Why don't you marry Robin? You guys are cute together. Deep down, you know you were never happier than when you were with her. Uh... (chuckles) no, thanks.
Barney: And... hence new identities.
Barney: Jerry, you remember Marshall... he's a well-known writer.
Barney: Lily, his wife.
Barney: Wait, wait. Jerry, I got to tell you the truth. Guys, I'm gonna tell him. We're also a band.
Barney: Oh, we're not drinking here. Tonight we're going big. Let's see, what club should we hit first? There's Club Was, there's Wrong...
Barney: Oh, no.
Barney: No, Was wasn't where Where was, Was was where Wrong was, right?
Barney: Guys, focus.
Barney: No, Was was Closed. Once Was shut down, it reopened as Closed.
Barney: No, Shut up shut down. I can't believe I don't know the clubs anymore.
Barney: It's hopeless, isn't it?
Barney: I know. Daddy's home. And Granddaddy's home! Tonight rocks so hard!
Barney: Man, isn't this place great?
Barney: Uh, L-Lily, uh, talk about your open marriage.
Barney: Let's do shots.
Barney: No. Don't you remember what you said to me when I was a kid? "Never stop partying."
Barney: You don't remember the last thing you said to me when I was a kid? Well... you know, why don't you just go back home?
Barney: Yeah, well, I want to hang out with Crazy Jerry, not Stay-at-Home Jerome.
Barney: Can you believe it? This is awesome!
Barney: I finally know what it's like to be embarrassed by my dad.
Barney: Hey, uh, hey, Jerry, y... you really want to be out here like this?
Barney: No, of course not. I... I just...
Barney: Yeah! Let's do it! Uh, maybe fix the tie. But mostly, party!
Barney: (laughing): Hey, hey! There we go!
Barney: Oh...!
Barney: It's okay, Dad. I never thought tonight would be so awesome! So... next stop, strip club. The Lusty Leopard has a special...
Barney: What?
Barney: But all those crazy things you did.
Barney: A drunk audience.
Barney: No, no, no. You don't even know! Right here!
Barney: Oh...!
Barney: What just happened?
Barney: Well, why do all those things?
Barney: You lied to me all night for your own selfish reasons? Daddy...!
Barney: Hey, you know, a... a pretty good magician like you probably knows how to, say, get out of a standard set of handcuffs.
Barney: Well, here's something you didn't know... I'm a pretty good magician, too. (They escape and run away) Abracadabra!
Barney: We need someplace to hide.
Barney: No, Jerry, this is not the time to go to another club! We've got to get you back home in time for that trip. But there's no more trains, there's no cabs.
Barney: Step on it! Jerry...
Barney: Jerry, we have got to get you home in time for that fishing trip.
Barney: This is no time for laws!
Barney: I am not going to buckle up!
Barney: How did you do it?
Barney: How did you become this? I mean, I love my life, but... I'm not sure I like loving it. Sure, strip clubs...
Barney: Hey, I'm trying to open up to you...
Barney: When I think about going for anything more than that, I look at my life, and who I am, and... I'm too far gone. I'm broken.
Barney:So how do you do it?
Barney:Maybe I've met her already.
Barney:Maybe some other time.
Barney:I'm going fishing with my dad.
Barney: This... sucks.
Barney: I don't know. Is she fat?
Barney: I-I don't take flyers.
Barney: That's different. It was for a strip club. Two bucks off wings. How much is your flyer going to save me on wings?
Barney: Oh, Lily, I'd love to, but we're not in college and I'm not trying to sleep with you. So anyway, this mermaid...
Barney: Lily, I love you, but we're too old for this. Asking someone to come see your play is like asking someone for a ride to the airport or to crash on your couch or to help you move. Call a cab, book a room, hire some movers and repeat after me: Friends don't let friends come see their crappy play.
Barney: Yes, you should break up.
Barney: Oh, God, why is this part of the story?
Barney: What's wrong with her?
Barney: What word, "moist"?
Barney: Ah, the 2005 landmark case of Lily v. The Joey Buttafuoco Pants.
Barney: I vote they can stay. "Check out the jackass in the parachute pants" is a good icebreaker.
Barney: Marshall, it's over. We even gave you an appeal and they didn't look any better with combat boots.
Barney: I side with Robin.
Barney: Ted, your place is too cluttered. It's like you're living in a Bennigan's.
Barney: From the smell of it, I'm guessing a urine factory.
Barney: I know where I don't want to sit.
Barney: I brought a bag in case anyone needs to puke.
Barney: No? Okay.
Barney: I am outta here.
Barney: Wow, Lily, that sucked!
Barney: What? It was terrible. I mean, come on. You guys agree, right? Hey, sorry, I'm just being honest 'cause, you know, we're friends.
Barney: Yeah, if you're a Smurf.
Barney: Oh, really? You would?
Barney: Bad move, Aldrin, bad move.
Barney: Even I wouldn't do that.
Barney: Oh, I almost forgot. Flyers for my new play.
Barney: Oh, it's not a joke. It's my one-man show premiering tomorrow night. And even though it's terrible and excruciatingly long, I expect you all to be there since we're such good friends.
Barney: Unless, of course, you just want to admit that you were wrong...
Barney: Good. Okay, I gotta go rehearse. Oh, I almost forgot. Bring a poncho; the first three rows get wet.
Barney: Moist. Moist. Moist. Moist.
Barney: Moist.
Barney: I have to go refill. I'll be back in a moment. Play's not over.
Barney: Feelings. Inside. Oh, no!
Barney: Thank you, Lily. Is there anything you'd like to say about my show?
Barney: Yes! I win! I love winning! Oh, Lily. Oh, Lily, Lily, Lily. I was just getting
Barney: Pretty awful? Pretty awful?! It was a masterpiece of awful. It's genius how bad it is. I kind of wish you guys could see it.
Barney: Act two is where I really hit my stride. Spoiler alert: the robot falls in love. Lily: How about this, Barney? How about we stay and-and watch the rest of your show?
Barney: It's your funeral. Five, six, one, two.
Barney: The robot found love Confusing my circuitry My software's been hacked Toaster oven You're the one for me Two, three, four.
Barney: Robin, no, I don't want
Barney: Ah, great.
Barney: We insisted.
Barney: How's the Fiero?
Barney: Well, I'm trying, but it's...
Barney: Wait, wait, wait. Wait, I think I've got it.
Barney: Aw, nerts.
Barney: Really? Seems impossible.
Barney: With privileges, from the sound of it.
Barney: Wow. Looks like he really needs a hug. Ted.
Barney: How dare you...
Barney: Come on, Marshall. This is your Fiero. You know the rightthing to do here.
Barney: Love it? Hold on a second. Love it? I hate it!
Barney: Why? Why? Why?! Why?!
Barney: Hey. Uh, is Marshall around? I have a massage in Queens in half an hour. I need a ride.
Barney: Hey! Why don't you drive me? It'll be like a total road trip.
Barney: Yeah, we'll get, we'll get beef jerky, Triscuits.
Barney: Okay. Well, anyway, I'll cancel. See you later.
Barney: What, of course I know how to drive. I love driving. Hitting the road. Cruising the lanes. And braking. Honking. Love it. Except for lady drivers. Don't get me started on lady drivers.
Barney: Trick question.
Barney: Yes, it is.
Barney: Middle, left, right? I never learned how to drive! I grew up in the city. I never had a chance.
Barney: This isn't right. God never meant for us to travel at such breakneck speeds.
Barney: Dude, a dog.
Barney: What do I do? Tell me what to do, Ted.
Barney: Which? Which one's the break again?
Barney: Left. Oh, man, left. I'm totally blanking.
Barney: I don't know why I turned on the radio! We're going to die. Tell me what to do, Ted.
Barney: Help me, Ted! I'm being serious.
Barney: I can't move. I can't... I can't feel my... Wait. Wait. We're okay.
Barney: We're okay. It's a miracle, Ted!
Barney: ummina-hummina-hummina-hummina ummina-hummina-hummina hummina. I shouldn't even be here, thanks to that deathtrap. But fate... fate gave me a second chance. And helped me realize that our days on this planet are too few to squander. So I decided from that moment on to continue living life to its fullest.
Barney: True story.
Barney: Yes!
Barney: Rot in hell, devil steed.
Barney: Hey, what about me? What's my job? What do I get to do?
Barney: Lil, you know I can't promise that.
Barney: Guys! I just tasted an amazing caterer.
Barney: Oh, right. You're getting married. You see what I did there? Took a...
Barney: No sweat, we'll just sneak in.
Barney: Well...
Barney: Lesbian.
Barney: No, I'm trying to start a thing where the cough is separate.
Barney: Please, I'm ageless, Scherbotsky just needs a good night's sleep, and you've got "statutory" written all over your body.
Barney: Wow. Hey, Thelma, Louise, y'all don't drive off no cliffs now, ya hear? Lame! But seriously, leave me a message, and we'll meet up later.
Barney: Horrible.
Barney: You look so classy and nice. You're going to stick out like a sore thumb. Have you seen how the kids are dressing these days, with the Ashlee and the Lindsay and the Paris? They all dress like strippers. It's go ho or go home.
Barney: That's the spirit. Now, ladies, slut up!
Barney: Nice. You ladies look good, but your outfits are missing just one thing.
Barney: Two beautiful flowers for two beautiful flowers.
Barney: Oh, Robin, are you tearing up?
Barney: Hey, ho, hey!
Barney: It's cool. Time to activate plan B. Scherbotsky, how comfortable are you with a crossbow? Scherbotsky?
Barney: Don't worry about me. I'll get in. Oh... I'll get in.
Barney: She's in the bathroom.
Barney: How did you guys get in here?
Barney: You just snu... Are you serious? I've been trying to get in here all night. I finally paid a janitor 200 bucks to let me borrow this mascot costume.
Barney: You guys will thank me for this later, okay? Listen, Don, Ray, can't we all...?
Barney: And that, my friends, is why you don't get your money's worth when you wear jeans to a strip club.
Barney: "Okay"!? Awesome!!
Barney: "Okay" is the name of a club. Yeah, it's supposed to be incredibly exclusive. This friend of mine once waited outside for two hours, he couldn't get in.
Barney: No... a friend of mine named, shut up.
Barney: Yeah, he just wants to show you his own VIP if you know what I mean...
Barney:... I know that the "P" is pen1s.
Barney: All the things you do when you know where the next ten thousand lays are coming from.
Barney: Translation, she's ugly, she's ugly, she ugs in the ugly.
Barney: So, do you have any other hot single fr...
Barney: (enters) And his hair was perfect.
Barney: One of the twenty-four similarities between girls and fish is that they're both attracted to shiny objects. You really never read my blog, do you?
Barney: What the hell happened to these two?
Barney: Wow, who knew being committed in a heterosexual relationship could make a guy so gay.
Barney: My, oh, my there are some ferocious looking cutlets here tonight. Alright, hookup strategy, colon, find a cutlet; lock her in early, grind with her all night till she's mine.
Barney: Question is: do these strategies ever not work for me? Either way the answer's "about half the time".
Barney: You think?
Barney: (Subtitle) Okay, it's a little loud.
Barney: (Subtitle) Oh hey, I can't see her face. Is she hot?
Barney: Maybe theres...
Barney: a machine in...
Barney: The restroom.
Barney: Ted, bring your coat, we're leaving.
Barney: That was my cousin, Leslie.
Barney: No, no, no... we are not laughing about this, Ted. This is not going to be some funny story that we'll be telling in a couple months. It's not gonna be like, "Hey, remember that time when you were grinding with... NO! And you know why? Because, italics, this night did not happen. And you promise me that you will never, ever, ever tell another soul what transpired here tonight. You promise. Promise
Barney: Why, I didn't check a coat. And even if I did, on principle tip jars have become so...
Barney: FINE! Just... eh. (Leaves)
Barney: THEY PLAYED SOME GOOD SONGS TONIGHT.
Barney: WHAT?
Barney: WHAT?
Barney: THAT PLACE MAKES GREAT SALADS!
Barney: Ted, the only reason to wait a month for s*x is if the girl is 17 years, 11 months old.
Barney: Really?
Barney: Hundred dollars says when you turn around, I say "wow."
Barney: It's one of the many risks of the blind approach. It's usually a two-man operation where Ted signals that the target is hot. But Ted's too busy being in a lesbian relationship.
Barney: You can't just... Wow!
Barney: Not so fast, Scherbotsky. I like the way you think. That mirror thing. Simple. Elegant. Okay, limited-time offer: I need a "bro" for my bro-ings on about town. How would you like to be said bro?
Barney: You suited up!
Barney: Emilio? The woman will have...
Barney: Ah, the No. 2, a.k.a. "The Torpedo." Or, as the rollers call it, "Piramide."
Barney: Father issues. Hot.
Barney: Slut would have been better, but I'll settle for bro. Especially now that Ted's with Victoria and can't drink. Because he's pregnant. Cause he's the girl.
Barney: What up! Freeze frame high five!
Barney: Are you kidding? Ted's never been here. You've already flown higher and faster than he ever did. Still...
Barney: There is one other thing we could do. If you're up for it.
Barney: Yeah, well, enjoy it before it becomes cool again. I give it two months.
Barney: Okay, follow my lead, stay low, and never underestimate a 12-year-old with a... Scherbotsky, you have to focus! You just saved my life, didn't you?
Barney: No. Leave no man behind. Either we all get out of here or no one does.
Barney: Don't be a hero, Scherbotsky.
Barney: Damn. Want to go get a soft pretzel?
Barney: All right.
Barney: Neither have I. Of course I cheat.
Barney: Ah. I always just stacked the ships on top of each other.
Barney: Ooh, good eye, Scherbotsky. I got someone for you. Two o'clock, blue shirt.
Barney: Oh, my mistake. Or is it?
Barney: Right.
Barney: Hey.
Barney: Let's get out of here. Let's go somewhere else.
Barney: Eh, you sometimes like to do a little catch and release.
Barney: Leave no man behind. Either we all score or no one scores.
Barney: Hit!
Barney: Well, you make a good bro. You're a better Ted than Ted. Hey, in fact, you have just earned yourself an invite to Marshall's bachelor party. And you don't even have to come out of the cake.
Barney: Hard-core? That's the only way I play. (Barney strips down)
Barney: I'm birthday suiting up.vI'm sorry, did you want to undress me?
Barney: Oh, come on, you have been throwing yourself at me all night.
Barney: You invited me up to your apartment to "play Battleship." Is that not an internationally recognized term for s*x?
Barney: Great. I hope you're happy. You sunk my battleship.
Barney: But I have thought about it for three seconds, and it makes a lot of sense. We both think the marriage commitment thing's a drag. We both want something casual and fun. And we clearly get along really well.
Barney: I checked with Ted.
Barney: Ted, so now that things with you and Victoria are going pretty well, I assume you're over all the girls you were into before, right? I take your silence as a yes, so say I were to hook up with someone, say Robin, you'd be cool with that, right?
Barney: Totally gave us his blessing.
Barney: Really.
Barney: Didn't care at all. Oh. Oh...
Barney: You like Ted.
Barney: You like Ted. Wow. This is huge.
Barney: Yeah, yeah. Look, are we gonna play Battleship or what?
Barney: No. That's the bro code. A bro doesn't tell a mutual bro that a third bro has a crush on him. Just like the third bro doesn't tell the mutual bro that the original bro went bare pickle in front of her. It's quid pro bro.
Barney: Miss.
Barney: It's the lure of Ted.
Barney: A true gentleman invents an excuse to bring home a respectable lady. Something interesting or beautiful that can claim to admire for 5 minutes before it starts on the track.
Barney: It's tricky. It must be interesting enough that the girl up, but not too much not to spoil the evening.
Barney: The slot machine is too much fun. And a trampoline... that's actually too dangerous. But I finally found the perfect bait... A mini pig.
Barney: Yes, you can borrow.
Barney: Yes, completely.
Barney: It's like that. "I can not be with you". "For now."
Barney: Really? You really gonna sit and watch the door all night because Tiffany said she would try to pass?
Barney: Ted, let me be clear. That girl is poison and you have to forget your life forever.
Barney: Hold on to it. Never lets go! I have never seen more beautiful girls. They all work with Tiffany?
Barney: There can be only one explanation for that. Tiffany is a representative... e, pharmaceuticals?
Barney: And you never thought to say?
Barney: That a b... Since time immemorial there has always been a professional edge to which girls guns, like Tiffany, have flocked. I'll redo the story?
Barney: It began 2.5 million years ago. The man was a hunter.So the profession's sexiest moment? Picker. Homo erectus, indeed. With improved technology, the profession's sexiest moment was changing. I'm sure it's a hernia. You can double-check? And then the man grabbed the heavens. So girls sexy stiletto heels began and became a flight attendant. I'm right and ready to fire. Then the man said, "Life is hard. I should start taking lots of drugs. " So sexy girls landed in medical offices, hot enough to make these pills erection ironically unnecessary. So today, girls are pharma's sexiest moment.
Barney: Largue Tiffany and join the Barnacle in a buffet of girls pharma. There may be loss of clothing, knees burned, respiratory weakness and sore abs the next day. That the world give a damn five?!
Barney: There's no nights like with pharma pharma because the nights never stop! Dude, I've flirted with three of them. The fantasy. In addition, my cholesterol is low. My restless legs syndrome is cured. I am more alive than ever.
Barney: Yesterday I was with this girl so sexy that pharma should call a doctor if you have no erection for more than 4h. I have no reason people?
Barney: It's over.
Barney: The girls of pharma are more than gunnery. This is the end of an era.
Barney: Really? It starts with a Gladys. And suddenly, a few gay guys not so fabulous fall into the ranks. And before you know it, the girls look like pharma team to a Southwest flight to Albuquerque in Little Rock. It's over!
Barney: I've realized that their reign had to stop to give way to a sexy new profession. It may be... communications officer in an intergalactic spaceship to a distant solar system that we can imagine. Maybe it will be... contract. It is not known. But one thing is certain. The future shines... as a huge sun throwing rays of orange light over our heads and our spirits.
Barney: The realization that hope springs eternal. Ca and the little purple pill box found in my bag. I do not know what they are, but they are amazing!
Barney: I cannot stop staring at that girl's face.
Barney: No, Ted, I'm really looking at her face.
Barney: Puffy cheeks, smudged mascara, slightly red nose... That girl was just crying. She's so sad and defenseless. Anyone have a condom?
Barney: Okay, time's up. What are we talking about?
Barney: Why would I do that? I'll see him at poker on Tuesday.
Barney: The bus? Every time I take the bus, there is one crazy person no one wants to sit near. That's why I have never taken the bus. Plus... I can run faster than a bus.
Barney: You're all wrong... I got a way to get there so fast, I could beat all of you, even if I sat down and ordered a big, juicy steak first.
Barney: Medium rare. But that's not important right now. Look, I know the city better than any of you guys, okay?
Barney: Oh, wow!
Barney: (to the sad girl at the bar) Stay sad! I'll be back!
Barney: Hi. Can I see a menu, please? No rush.
Barney: Hey! Come on! Elizabeth!
Barney: Downtown hospital, please. It's right by Gregor's Steakhouse. Take the FDR, and maybe crank up some smooth jazz.
Barney: Oh, no. (He makes a phone call) It's Barney. Help me.
Barney: Ranjit, take me to Gregor's.
Barney: Hey, Ranjit, pull over.
Barney: Hey, toots! How about a ride? Oh. Hey, Robin, it's you.
Barney: I'm sorry. I never apologize. And why would I?
Barney: Sure. Stand a little more this way. I'm scouting some talent. Pretend we're talking about something important.
Barney: Oh, you know what? That's just getting distracting. Um, say "carrots and peas". Carrots and peas. Guys, I can't stop staring at that girl's face.
Barney: What, you really had something to talk about?
Barney: Robin, I had no idea.
Barney: No, don't stop the car.
Barney: Look, you... Wait, wait... Robin, hold on. If you want to talk, I'm right here.
Barney: Don't... You...
Barney: Faster. Mush! Mush! I need this win. I need this win.
Barney: And firing half my department freed up the money to double my own salary. And this chick from Boston was wicked hot in bed last night, and I'm getting more muscular, even though I've stopped working out, and I've got this amazing poker group.
Barney: And I smell incredible. Smell me. Just, seriously, smell me.
Barney: Stop! Too slow. Switch.
Barney: Who cares?
Barney: No!
Barney: How did that even happen?
Barney: No!
Barney: Yeah. Check it. I just drove a pedicab 26 blocks, and I still smell incredible. Smell me.
Barney: Smell me.
Barney: "Problem." Oh, poor Superman, he should really do something about his flying problem. It's not a problem if you're awesome at it.
Barney: Not a clue.
Barney: Seriously, that's the last time I'm gonna call you today. Okay. Good-bye. You didn't hang up either! I know! You hang up! You hang up! My bookie. Great guy.
Barney: Have I taught you nothing, Ted?
Barney: Suits are full of joy. They're the sartorial equivalent of a baby's smile.
Barney: "Of or pertaining to tailors or their trade." Suits are for the living. That's why when it's my time to R.I.P. I'm going out of this world the same way I came into it buck naked. Yeah. It's gonna be awesome. Open bar for the guys, open casket for the ladies. What up?!
Barney: Such a waste.
Barney: A hand-stitched, cashmere, double-breasted Dolce & Gabbana. It must be so frightened.
Barney: Oh, thank God! I'll find out.
Barney: Ted, it's not a drinking game if you drink anytime anything happens.
Barney: I don't bet. Betting's for suckers.
Barney: Fine.
Barney: Wait. This is mine, just like that? God, that feels good. No, that feels really... good. What else can we bet on?
Barney: Yeah, yeah, whatever. I'll give you the Seahawks plus six points for 500 bucks.
Barney: $50?! What fun is $50?! Why don't we just bet air?! God, Marshall! Okay, $50.
Barney: That's impossible.
Barney: What the hell, I'm in. High five!
Barney: Sorry. Solemn low five.
Barney: Hey, take this key and swallow it.
Barney: Come on, Ted, you eat salads. It'll be out by game time.
Barney: I'm not messing around, Theodore. I've got a lot of money riding on this game. If I don't handcuff myself to this radiator, I'll check the score. Please take the key.
Barney: Unlock me, Ted. I've never gone this long without calling my bookie. He worries.
Barney: Where are you going?
Barney: What? How the hell are you planning on getting in and out of a sports bar without seeing the score? There's TVs everywhere.
Barney: Sir, who won the Super Bowl?
Barney: You missed...?! How could he miss...? Excuse me! Who won the Super Bowl?!
Barney: Oh, my...! Emmitt Smith! Oh, thank God.
Barney: You got to tell me, who won the Super Bowl?
Barney: But you're Emmitt Smith. You're a football player, it's Super Bowl Sunday. What could possibly be more important than football?!
Barney: No...!
Barney: I met Emmitt Smith today.
Barney: Well, I was frantically running down the street trying to find out the score to the game...
Barney: I didn't only lose the game, I lost every single prop bet. Total penalty yardage, number of replay-challenges, coin toss... What are the odds of losing the coin toss?
Barney: Interceptions, field-goals, total sacks, whether or not there'd be a safety, first...
Barney: Thank you, Jim. I'm glad to be back on the show.
Barney: Hold on, Jimbo, it is extraordinary.
Barney: It all started when I decided to start a small challenge.
Barney: Whatever the girl I'm trying to point is that I go with her tonight. And... they're off!
Barney: Jim, there is nothing in my usual way to pack.
Barney: That brings us to the second night. You see the bomb that pampers its Black Russian (Vodka and coffee liqueur)? She left to exchange it with a White American. Enter me five! You know... If you're not careful, you'll lose me.
Barney: I guess that's just what they said when I was gone.
Barney: Jim, I can tell you that I was gone, so I wanted a little spice.
Barney: I think I'll take small tits tonight.
Barney: Lily, it's people too.
Barney: I had left to do... flawless.
Barney: It was faultless. 7 nights, 7 girls, 0 rejection.
Barney: Yeah. The only player in history to have accomplished both Pete was Drexell 'The mustache' in 1896.
Barney: You and me in the closet of the Spanish supermarket next door.
Barney: I can even say, without a fault. I'd love to say the same of my friends.
Barney: Well done, Jim.
Barney: Hey!
Barney: Absolutely. A background. It could not get better. I make fun of that? I need you.
Barney: Which of these girls look the most stupid?
Barney: Thank you, Skip.
Barney: No, sir. I like to play by the rules. While I can not say I did not propose to.
Barney: No thank you.
Barney: It's 8:00.
Barney: I've never touched. I can pee in a jar if you like, Jim Nantz.
Barney: Ted, relax. I am already 6 of 6.
Barney: Yeah. I ate at the Tavern of vegetables, I started talking to the Swedish Top Model, and the next moment we batifolait in the back of a carriage. Go my beautiful, Hue!
Barney: I ate at the "Staten Island Chili's," and I jumped a hairdresser completely stuffed. Are you happy, Ulysses?
Barney: No vain, ok? Between number 5 and I, there was a connection. She will resume her studies, she has a child or who is studying... something with "studies".
Barney: I do not know what to tell you, Lily is always trying to ruin me any.
Barney: You have the eye to notice such details, Jim Nantz.
Barney: I wish I had power.
Barney: Well, thank you to her, the only thing that can prevent a stroke insured was about to walk out the door. A member of the New York Yankees World Champions in 2009.
Barney: You wanna come to my house and watch the collection of snowballs?
Barney: But not play well enough. All this week was a waste of time. And tomorrow I'm getting fired.
Barney: You share a toothbrush?
Barney:... Huh?
Barney: Martini?
Barney: Wow, to be honest, this is not my habit, but I feel a real connection, Number 7... Christy. I beg you. I did it! I did it!
Barney: Thank you, Jim. I would never have done it without the help of my friends.
Barney: Uh, Jim, I told you I wanted to talk about it.
Barney: What a c**t.
Barney: I barely slept.
Barney: Man, I can't believe these are vegan.
Barney: Oh, nothing. I must have coffee with Nora. She is still angry, so I need some "sympathy points". She loves musicals, so I'll tell him that I fell off stage during a performance of "Man of La Mancha." What do you think?
Barney: A one-man show... I love it!
Barney: You're right. A cervical neck brace! Thank you, Lil. I should have to talk to you soon. I trained all day with these crutches and one who has left in my hall is likely to need it.
Barney: Hi Nora, thank you for coming.
Barney: My naked...? Oh, that's nothing. I was playing in a One Man Show at Fiddler. There was this scene...
Barney: Wait, Nora, waiting... No, please. I'm sorry.
Barney: Someone who likes you, really. And suspicious, and probably accurately you do it over more later, and therefore he feels the need... I'm sorry, you spoke of this fantastic pair of tits, right? Because I seek, and I do not see them.
Barney: Okay, I did not know. Mea culpa. So, from now, more lies. I never lie to you. I'm serious. Ask me anything.
Barney: Have I ever... If I'm totally honest... Yes.
Barney: More than once... Wow, this is... I guess if we... so, technically, there were a number of times I've lied to a woman to sleep with her.
Barney: Nine or ten for most. There has been a 4 once. It was an easy girl.But, Nora, after that, I had to flee so fast. Honesty is good.
Barney: You want me to tell all the lies I have told to put a woman in my bed?
Barney: You are good.
Barney: I do not have time to explain how I got there. I just need someone to suck the poison. The surgeon gave me a new face, darling. You realize that I am alive? My name is David Beckham. If I castais only the white swan, is the role for you. No, I am a lesbian. What I wear is just very realistic.
Barney: Oh, once I am the soul man. There was this pretty girl who only go out with black.
Barney: And that made all the lies related to space. Let the world of sports. Oh wait, I forgot for a space: "I was bitten by a snake space. You have to suck all the poison around my... "
Barney: So that was cool. I can remember, or...?
Barney: Well, I count three for and one against.
Barney: Because you are sat here all night. You could leave, but you did not. Listen, Nora, these lies, it was the old me. But I swear I try to change.You... make me want to change.
Barney: I will prove it. I'll show you how much I'm serious. I will not leave this restaurant as I have not got a second date with you.
Barney: I do not laugh. It is a restaurant 24h/24. I will stay forever if necessary. And I will. Just water for me please.
Barney: Oh! Hi guys! Oh! My neck! Uh... oh! Hey! Look at this!
Barney: Oh, I told Nora that I would not leave until I have no second appointment, and I intend to do. I am here since 9 o'clock. I still need another minute. Say I'm crazy, but I'll stay here as long as it will not be returned.
Barney: I have found that to be true.
Barney: Mona.
Barney: Watch it more closely. Rock your world.
Barney: You mind if I charge my phone?
Barney: Oh, my God! (barney's holding a painting)
Barney: Do you know about this?
Barney: Only the greatest thing ever. Wait, wait, wait-- that's not enough buildup. If they were to cure cancer tomorrow, this would still be the greatest thing to happen all week. Okay. Now you're ready for naked Marshall.
Barney: I know, right? Behind the piano this whole time.
Barney: Oh, come on, Robin.
Barney: I know! We're gonna have so much fun!
Barney: Oh, hey, Marshall. Have a seat. I know how much you love stools.
Barney: Hey, guys. Guess what I got. A new dart.
Barney: Oh, yes, Robin, I just love new dart. Nude art.
Barney: We totally saw your butt.
Barney: Oh, no, what's the matter, Marshall?
Barney: I'll tell you where it is if you'll answer these riddles three.
Barney: Yo, why you gotta ruin my riddles?
Barney: Oh, no. Someone put your painting up behind the bar. Classic! What a memorable prank.
Barney: Easy, Scherbatsky. Finesse. I've got a five-year rollout plan. I'll have you know that painting's got commitments all over the city. Then, after New York...
Barney: Eh, we're not making fun of the painting, we're just making fun of Marshall. The painting's actually really great.
Barney: Yeah.
Barney: Paint me.
Barney: Paint me.
Barney: Paint me.
Barney: We knew we could torture Marshall because he has shame. I do not. In my body, where the shame gland should be, there's a second awesome gland. True story.
Barney: Yeah. A nude Barney is a challenge. But I think you're talented enough to immortalize this. Now is the time-- I'm 31. I'm at the peak of my physical beauty. If I were a woman, I'd have passed it long, long ago. Long ago.
Barney: I'll give you $5,000.
Barney: Hey, hey! I don't want you phoning this in. This painting could, someday, become a serious work of art. I mean, you have been blessed with an amazing gift.
Barney: I meant me. Now, I like how you captured Marshall's essence. Goofy and unburdened, with wit. But me, I want something more regal. Something my progeny could look at and say, "There's stands Barnabus Stinson." He was wise... and strong.
Barney: I get that a lot.
Barney: Paint faster!
Barney: Yeah. Wait, wait! That wasn't enough buildup. I need... In a world without justice, one man...
Barney: All right.
Barney: We had a deal!
Barney: You...!
Barney: Before you say anything, I'll give you an extra five grand.
Barney: You people are so easy to control. Dance for me, puppets, dance.
Barney: Thank you very much, Lily.
Barney: A smooth area?! You gave me the Ken doll?! Marshall and Lily get out of the apartment. She left out Little Barney. Barnacle Junior. My Barnana is... Barnito Supreme.
Barney: Ted, I am happy for you. Sorry, not for you, not to be you.
Barney: Only two things can cause this turmoil.
Barney: Ladies and gentlemen, the McLaren's hired a sexy barmaid.
Barney: What... are you crazy? It's a sexy barmaid. Do you know how long I've waited for me... My friends, I slept with many women in my glory days. Lawyers, professors, poets, doctors, professional riders, and animators... A butcher, a baker, a candle maker. Yes, we got to the part where it rhymes. A teacher, a restorative, an observer... A puppeteer, a croupier, a housewife, it is also a job, guys. A circuit court judge...
Barney: I never, never slept with a barmaid sexy, until tonight.
Barney: Wish me luck.
Barney: Guess who will not fall under his spell? I will make him "Do not try, baby. Papa needs a gin and tonic. "And when she will, I recracherai saying" Do it again. " The dominant male where it should be: on top, and after a few minutes below. Why should I do anything?
Barney: Amateurs.
Barney: Do not even try, baby. Wait, what?
Barney: Uh...
Barney: No matter. You understand why I'm the only guy she does not know this bar?
Barney: It's easy. I just have to stop wearing costumes.
Barney: True... But for these two... And, for that... Finally, for her... I'll stop wearing, wait...
Barney: The costumes and complexed. I hate them. I hate them.
Barney: I arrive in a second.
Barney: So young. You can not do anything else?
Barney: It can... As an organ donor?
Barney: But I... Do it.
Barney: Sorry. I know. I know.
Barney: We have the remains cremated. Its buttons have saved a sick jacket of the Upper East Side.
Barney: No. My costume gave his life for this cause, and I do not should rest before these two... Well, it... Finally,... Be it mine.
Barney: It was Italian. Classic, elegant. And my God he knew how to deal with women. They could not say no.
Barney: 7 years. I miss him so much!
Barney: Thank you, old friend. You go on a good shot.
Barney: It was so special, you know? We should observe a minute of silence. Followed by about 20 minutes of grunting.
Barney: Okay. Expected. No, this is not the bathroom. This is...
Barney: I'm the suit-sitting for someone.
Barney: Costumes!
Barney: Costumes!
Barney: Do we see.
Barney: I'll stop. These are the costumes. Stops just bullshit.Two, three, four! Girls come and depart, but the clothes remain constant! Each buddy dépote and rambling, it is no substitute!Sorry, my costumes, I give you my life. My Sunday clothes are my best friends! The casual clothes go in the basket because nothing goes better with the undisputed often praised, claiming to fame... a true... Expect more... Costume...
Barney: Mind you, it is rather barrel. (Back at Barney) I choose you you, baby. Tomorrow morning, I get rid of these costumes.
Barney: Yeah. (They kiss) I will do you nothing!
Barney: I hope I can pass this hot dog.
Barney: Oh, honey.
Barney: Why do they call 'em coasters?
Barney: Ted, a word. God, I hate these situations. What are we gonna do about this?
Barney: Come on, Ted, it's obvious. Honey's vibing on me.
Barney: It's called body language. Remember when she was touching your arm and leaning in real close?
Barney: Well, while that was happening, the straw in her drink was pointed right at me. I mean... that's as clear as a signal gets, so... I'm so sorry, man.
Barney: Does anyone know why we're here?
Barney: Guys, just let the man explain how it's all about his wearing a lady's watch.
Barney: Hey, Marshall.
Barney: I'm up on burners, playa. Too many crazies had my old number, so now I'm all about disposable cell phones. I'll use one for a while, have my fun, then dump it and get a new one. And then I'll do the same with my phone.
Barney: Dude, she doesn't know how to tell a story. I'll tell you that story.
Barney: That is exactly how it happened. So Ted did his best to impress her, but as per yoozh, he bored the pants very much on her.
Barney: Anyway, I get Honey back to her place.
Barney: Who's your daddy?
Barney: Sure, I'll just summarize it. (imitating squeaky bedsprings)
Barney: Only way I know how. Any-who, next day, I'm going into work. I run into Zoey.
Barney: Hey, Zoey. That cousin of yours... Honey... yowsa! I must say, your family tree has got a couple of pretty big coconuts.
Barney: Yeah, we had a great time last night. And then just hand stuff in the morning, so...
Barney: Nope, he let me have her. I have to say, it was pretty noble of him. He fell on his sword so that she could fall on mine. I won't bore you with the details, but to summarize... (imitating squeaky bedsprings)
Barney: She hugged me. What was that all about?
Barney: Who's your daddy?
Barney: So I wrote him a letter. And I poured my heart out. And I gave him my number and I told him to call me. And he still hasn't called me.
Barney: I mean, I shouldn't be surprised. Clearly, he wants nothing to do with me.
Barney: I mean, why else would he let 30 years go by? He's ashamed to have me as a son.
Barney: Four. Four Nobel Prizes.
Barney: Only three.
Barney: Ah, tweed. Textile of the eunuch.
Barney: Because the people who wear them are constantly going, "Aw, geez, why can't I get laid?"
Barney: (in the corridor) Worst night ever.
Barney: It was like we were on a date with a sad, chubby girl our mom made us call.
Barney: And they kept shoving platters of food in our faces.
Barney: Um, we-we-we didn't realize there was gonna be dinner. We sucked down a couple tacos outside the subway.
Barney: And if anything didn't go according to plan, they would freak out.
Barney: This is a web siteMarshall already made about last night. (he takes a computer) It's called itwasthebestnightever.com.
Barney: Needless to say, we've both changed our e-mail addresses.
Barney: I mean, we knew we were gonna have fun tonight, but we had no idea how much.
Barney: Let's do it again, soon.
Barney: Uh, no, it doesn't.
Barney: Ted, let me ask you a question. Where does this girl live, exactly?
Barney: (he laughs) You're the sexless innkeeper.
Barney: Ted, many a man--nay, many a soul--has their own tale of the sexless innkeeper. Why, I had run-in with one just last year. I even composed a poem about it. Would you care to hear it?
Barney: T'was the night before new year's, and the weather grew mean. It was 3:00 in the morning, And I was stranded in queens. (2008, the whole story of Barney is illustrated with images) The tavern grew empty, the gas lights grew dim. The horse-drawn carriages were all but snowed in...
Barney: Ted, it's a poem. Last call was approaching, and my fortunes looked bleak. Then I turned to my left and stifled a shriek. She had a peach fuzz beard and weighed 16 stone. She gobbled up hot wings and swallowed the bones. I muffled a scream and threw up in my mouth.I asked, "where do you live?"And she said, "one block south.". I swallowed my pride and six shots of whiskey. And prayed to the gods that she wasn't too frisky. Back in her cave, she prepared us a snack. 'neath her mighty hooves, the floorboards did crack. But when she returned, she found a sound sleeper. And thus she became the sexless innkeeper. And so are you
Barney: Ted, you mentioned that you live right upstairs. She saw the tweed jacket
Barney: I'm not the sexless innkeeper. Ted, that girl had no intention of ever hooking up with you.
Barney: Look! I'm sorry that we have been dodging your calls, but we respect you guys too much as friends to give you some song and dance. You deserve the truth. (he sighs) The US Navy has found intelligent alien life at the bottom of the ocean. For reasons I can't explain, Robin and I have been tapped to lead the expedition.
Barney: Plus, the alien thing.
Barney: I think they bought it.
Barney: Ted, I could listen to this guilt trip all day, But don't you have to get back up to the inn? I mean, who's working the front desk?
Barney: To your point, Ted, as an innkeeper. Do you do that cheapy thing where you only change the linens upon request? I mean, I mean, I mean, how much water is that actually saving?
Barney: Mint on the pillow, Ted! And don't charge for wi-fi. It seems greedy! It does.
Barney: Hey. Long time no see. Have a seat.
Barney: Hey, maybe all six of us could hang out.
Barney: Who the hell are these people?
Barney: Pfft. Not us.
Barney: Hey, why don't we call that weird couple down the hall from you? You know, with the ferrets? Maybe they want to come over and play taboo.
Barney: Maybe. But they're Armani.
Barney: Then what are you doing, standing out in the rain with us?
Barney: We'll never sleep on thegouda again.
Barney: No, not really.
Barney: With quill?
Barney: No way. You made that up.
Barney: Whew!
Barney: Oh, really, Marshall? Nothing comes to mind?
Barney: Wait-wait-wait a minute!
Barney: Um, are you coloring in your butt?
Barney: So wear another one.
Barney: Dude, you show up to an interview in that, even the hippie lawyers from Granola Mountain Earth Pals will hackey sack you straight out the door.
Barney: Okay, tomorrow... oh, and I should mention this is going to rock your world-- tomorrow I'm taking you to my personal tailor.
Barney: Relax, my guy does everything for one third the cost. And there is no way you're getting married in that sarcastic-quotation-marks "suit." Tomorrow, noon, my tailor.
Barney: Noon. See you then.
Barney: Look, do you want a quality suit and a free rabbit or not? Ted, Sergei says stop moping around. You're distracting him from his process.
Barney: Don't knock long-distance relationships. I really think they can work.
Barney: Absolutely. I'm juggling four right now. There's Lisa in Madrid, there's Erica in Tokyo, there's Laura in Denmark, and Kelly on 34th Street. The lass thinks I'm a humble sheep shearer from Killarney.
Barney: Are you sure?
Barney: Oh, excellent. We'll take this one.
Barney: Here. Play with this pin cushion.
Barney: Marshall, I can't let you waste a suit this nice fighting a losing battle for our planet's survival. This is a suit for winners. I am getting you an interview at my office. We need good men like you in our legal department. We get sued a lot.
Barney: Oh, come on, dude! Three months working with me, you'll make more than Lily makes in a year.
Barney: Look at us: two guys in suits. You feel that slight tingle? That's every girl in the bar wanting you, and every guy wanting to be you. Actually, it's mostly me, but you're getting some of the splash.
Barney: So, have you thought more about coming to work for Barney Corp?
Barney: Yet. Oh, I almost forgot. Sergei sent me your bill.
Barney: Yeah, must be a $12,000 suit. Oh, well, guess you'll have to come work at my company.
Barney: I most certainly did...
Barney: 9:00 a.m., and you'll need new shoes. Don't worry, I know a guy.
Barney: "I'm probably saying some political stuff right now to sound smart."
Barney: Whoa. Is there going to be a fight?
Barney: You guys are idiots!
Barney: We just sent you a picture of her from six months ago.
Barney: When little Jack's not turning double plays, he's turning heads with this home run of an outfit!
Barney: Mm-hmm. And yes... we can.
Barney: Hey. What's wrong?
Barney: Shh, shh, shh. What you need to do is talk through this stuff.
Barney: And then, once you're off the phone with Lily, I'll be down in the bar ready to have s*x. Mm-kay?
Barney: She really said that?
Barney: Yes, totally. Yeah. Only thing, and this is just me--
Barney: I like my testicles attached to my body, rather than rolling around next to some eyeliner in Robin's purse. Stinson out!
Barney: ...rather than rolling around next to some eyeliner in Robin's purse. Stinson out!
Barney: Stinson back in. Say, hypothetically, I did want to change who I am to become a better boyfriend to Robin, which I do not! What kind of changes are we talking about?
Barney: Okay.
Barney: I'm bored.
Barney: Can we draw boobs on the chalkboard?
Barney:  No, like, really big boobs.
Barney: Can we have class outside?
Barney: What? I'm tweeting about you. You should be flattered. How do you spell blah-blah-blah- "H's" or no?
Barney: They said I had A-D... something. Can we have class outside?
Barney: Do you think I should get Sports Illustrated for 70% off the cover price? Can we have class outside? I got to find a way to reach this kid.
Barney: You guys just had s*x? Oh! Wasn't me.
Barney: Okay.
Barney: That's a building.
Barney: Dude!
Barney: Whoa...
Barney: "You're an idiot"?
Barney: I can't believe I'm taking sexual advice from Ted Mosby. That's like taking fashion advice from... well, Ted Mosby.
Barney: What do you mean?
Barney: Yeah, it's boring as hell and I'm not learning anything.
Barney: Uh-huh. Uh, can you hear this, Professor? (showing is thumb down) Or should I turn it up for you? (he turns it up).
Barney: What...
Barney: Trick question. Get her butterscotch.
Barney: Butterscotch is to Canadian women what chocolate is to American women.
Barney: To become the most successful female TV journalist of all time.
Barney: No! Robin's deep-seated need for attention can traced back to her father's emotional distance, and no amount of success will ever make up for what she truly needs, which is six simple words from her Dad: "Robin, I'm proud of you, eh?"
Barney: "Oh, Captain! My Captain!"
Barney: I know, right? The end? Tears.
Barney: I got this. So, emperor penguins-- crazy, huh?
Barney: Marshall, did you sells out?
Barney: On the bright side, he came in handy standing in for you during the role-playing exercises.
Barney: Hey! He is an expert. He's a great teacher!
Barney: That is a huge violation of my privacy! Go on.
Barney: Hey. Before you say anything, I am done with this stupid Robin 101, okay? Here, I'll get rid of the notebook. (he throws it on the barrel) But there's... there's something that I did want to say to you. Robin, I have been with a lot of women, blondes, brunettes, redheads, big boobs, small
Barney: Hmm?
Barney: And your work address.
Barney: Whoa.
Barney: Use your words, Ted.
Barney: The belt?
Barney: But that's impossible. You were up here less than half an hour ago.
Barney: Don't get cocky. Wimbledon lasts a fortnight.
Barney: You take too long to get ready
Barney: And then he starts on his hair. Ace.
Barney: Just go without us, we'll be there in five minutes.
Barney: So many questions. Firstly, what do you think would happen if a guy walked into that store wearing a suit of boots?
Barney: FYI, it doesn't matter, baby. Guys just wanna get on the green. They don't mind going through the rough.
Barney: Stinson.
Barney: Yeah, we're not gonna make it.
Barney: Yeah, pants are off.
Barney: That's 'cause you distracted me. You've been hanging crumpet ever since the third set.
Barney: Stinson.
Barney: You mean, the girl who chalked your pool cue and snuck down the fire escape.
Barney: So you now have two on the line?
Barney: Go for the new girl.
Barney: Given the choice, always party with Dr. Strangelove.
Barney: Two girls are allegedly vying for Ted's affections and I think...
Barney: That's what I thought about your bangers and mash down there but I guess we're both wrong, governor.
Barney: No way, no way, no way!
Barney: Put him on speaker.
Barney: So what you're saying to us right now is you have a shot at the belt?
Barney: That's right, it's resplendent.
Barney: I never kid. Remember you said if I ever slept with that girl from Days of our Lives, I'd be the king? Well...
Barney: All right, Ted, if you're about to go for the belt, then the bylaws require me to ask the following questions. One, is the aggregate age of all the participants under 83?
Barney: Two, is the aggregate weight of all participants under 400 pounds.
Barney: Theodore Mosby, are you paying these women?
Barney: Ted?
Barney: Oh, hold on. Ted's texting me. (reading text) We're combing upsars.
Barney: I cannot allow Ted to do this.
Barney: Because the belt is my birthright. You can't claim it before I do. That would be like Jimmy Olsen capturing Lex Luther while Superman watches impotently from the bedroom.
Barney: I've never ridden the tricycle. I was on the verge last year, it was so close.
Barney: So, ladies, why don't we move this party to a more horizontal location?
Barney: I'll get the video camera.
Barney: OK then.
Barney: Oh my God.
Barney: Leave him alone! Sometimes even the greatest warriors shoot themselves in the foot.
Barney: Oh no, the night's ruined!
Barney: Yes it is. Whatever this night was heading towards is ruined. Where's my coat?
Barney: Because you get up in your head, man. Start thinking, I can't do this. It's two women. That's two of everything, four of some things. The logistics alone are enough to cripple even a pro like me.
Barney: The best chance in the world. Fear took the belt from me. Fear rode the tricycle that night, my friends. But fear will not get a second turn.
Barney: No, because I now realize it isn't my destiny to win the belt. It is my destiny to help my friend win it. Ted is fated to go there first. He is our Neil Armstrong. (laughs) Space-suit-up, Ted, 'cause you're going to the moon. Step 1.
Barney: That's your excuse to unleash pretext for physical contact number one.
Barney: OK, wait for it.
Barney: Yes you can.
Barney: So, what happened next? Did you do it? Ted: Doesn't seem right to talk about it.
Barney: What? No! Tell me. Don't tell me because you don't have to because you didn't do it.
Barney: You didn't do it. You did it. You did it, didn't you? Did you?
Barney: You didn't do it. Yes, you did. You did. No, you... Just tell me!
Barney: Because you didn't do it. He didn't do it. You did it, you did it, you did it. Tell me, did you?
Barney: Ted, belt.
Barney: Did? Tell me. You know if he did it?
Barney: So, Robin, you ever report on train wrecks? 'Cause I just saw one. What up? Tiny five.
Barney: Please. Kids, let's rap. You guys don't give half a brown Crayola what I do for a living, do you?
Barney: No. I know what you want. Magic.
Barney: Oh, you mean how Robin's in love with Ted?
Barney: Yeah, she told me already. Go on.
Barney: Well, I guess I'm just better friends with her than you are.
Barney: That is a lie!
Barney: Okay, that's it! You and me! I'm not afraid of you!
Barney: What? No. It's 2:30.
Barney: You know, I have found, in my travels... that all the best things in life happen after 2:00 a.m. When I look back at the best stories of my life-- the Liberty Bell incident, the little scrape I got in at the Russian Embassy, the almost four-way.
Barney: I said "almost." All those things happened after 2:00 a.m. because after 2:00 a.m. is when things get-- audience, say it with me-- legendary.
Barney: What's that? Interesting theory, Barney, but I'll need some proof? Okay. Korean Elvis. How would you like to have a drink with me and my friends?
Barney: And it begins.
Barney: Come on, Lily. How many women can say they've been personally serenaded by Korean Elvis?
Barney: No! No, come on.
Barney: Dude, we haen't hit legendary yet. We're only at the "le". We still got the "gen." The "da." The "ry."
Barney: You want the long version or the short version?
Barney: Short version. Who's your daddy?
Barney: Challenge accepted.
Barney: I, Barney Stinson, will pick up a girl whilst talking like a little boy.
Barney: Oh, Esther gets naked. But she doesn't dance.
Barney: That was my card!
Barney: Hey, bro. Thanks for making such a hottie. (weak laughter) Who's your daddy?
Barney: I'm dying out here. Talking like a little boy is not working with the ladies.
Barney: (in childlike voice) Wow, lady. You got some tig ol' bitties! Gosh! Your body's a perfect... this many. (To another girl) Hi. Do you want to wrestle with our special bathing suit places? Come on!
Barney: (little boy voice) Hey, want to have a three-way with me and my imaginary friend? His name's Otis. Hey, hey, want to come to my house and play telephone? I got the string; you got the cans. (giggles) I wet myself! Will you change me? Can't blame her on that one. Guys... I have some terrible, terrible news. I, Barney Stinson, can't pick up a girl whilst talking like a little boy. Challenge forfeited.
Barney: (whispers) I'm sorry.
Barney: Challenge accept...
Barney: Hey.
Barney: No, I didn't feel like you needed me at all.
Barney: Wait, where are you... That's a compliment. You are the least needy woman I've ever met-- that's awesome. I mean, no guy's gonna say "Who's your daddy?" to Robin Scherbatsky. You're your own daddy. And mommy. And weird survivalist uncle who lives in a cabin with a shotgun blaming stuff on the government. And that is what makes you the most... amazing, strong... independent woman I've ever banged.
Barney: (baby voice): Uh-oh, I'm in "twubble."
Barney: Last night, after admitting defeat, I just let myself go.
Barney: No! It's my ice cream; you can't have any.
Barney: Challenge completed! (chuckles) Now, uh, can you get this freak out of here? I'm really scared.
Barney: So, she's hot.
Barney: Then she's crazy.
Barney: Ted, the only hot girls that troll the Internet for dudes are crazy, hookers or dudes.
Barney: There's no way she's above the line on the hot-crazy scale.
Barney: Let me illustrate.
Barney: A girl is allowed to be crazy...
Barney:... as long as she is equally hot.
Barney: Thus, if she's this crazy, she has to be this hot.
Barney: If she's this crazy, she has to be this hot.
Barney: You want the girl to be above this line
Barney: Also known as the Vicky Mendoza diagonal. This girl I dated, she played jump rope with that line. She'd shave her head...
Barney:...then lose ten pounds.
Barney: She'd stab me with a fork...
Barney:... then get a boob job.
Barney: I should give her a call.
Barney: I don't know, Ted, I don't know if I can just play along with your crazy girlfriend's fake story. Now, if you had said fake breasts...
Barney: OK, we'll see.
Barney: It's crazy how cute that is. It's crazy.
Barney: Really? Sixteen no's. Really?
Barney: Oh, here we go.
Barney: Your own line of handbags? That's crazy.
Barney: OK, Ted, this is a crazy story. You're gonna love it.
Barney: Tonight's the first time I'm taking my deaf brother out since our mom died.
Barney: No, it's OK. I have to take care of him now. Of course, I have had to put my dreams on hold in order to do it, but I'm happy to. He's my brother and I love him. I'm sorry, it's all still so fresh.
Barney: Wow, you bought that?
Barney: Are you a total idiot, Ted?
Barney: I like you Ted.
Barney: Ted, I'm gonna teach you how to live.
Barney: Barney. We met at the urinal.
Barney: Lesson one, lose the goatee, it doesn't go with your suit.
Barney: Lesson two, get a suit. Sutis are cool. Exhibit A.
Barney: Lesson three, don't even think about getting married till your thirty. And lesson four, be totally silent for the next five minutes.
Barney: Hey, Audrey, this is my deaf brother, Edward.
Barney: (yelling at Ted) Edward, this is Audrey.
Barney: He doesn't sign. He's embarrassed by his hands. They're tiny and lady-like.
Barney: What? You are over your hand issues. It's about time.
Barney: And even though that girl ended up giving me a fake number, I knew that Ted and I would be each other's wingmen forever.
Barney: Great, funny. God, with a wingman like Ted, I might need to resort to meeting someone in a super desperate and lame way, like online. Online. Online.
Barney: Yeah, that never happens. Oh wait, except you and Robin. That's how you guys met, right?
Barney: Well, we're closing in on the half. Let's see how Blah-blah's doing on the crazy-hot scale.
Barney: She started the night here
Barney: But as the night's progressed, she's gotten crazier but no hotter which has caused her to drift across the Mendoza diagonal and dangerously close to the Shelley Gillespie zone.
Barney: Another girl I dated. She gained twenty pounds and tried to kill me with a brick.
Barney: How much fun is this? All of us reminiscing about how we met me? Robin, have I told you how I met Marshall? Robin: Yeah, like five or six times.
Barney: It was right over there.
Barney: Here's your problem, you've only slept with one woman. Those kind of stats are only okay if you're eleven. But tonight, we're getting you a new girl because Marshall Eriksen, from this moment on, I make all your decisions for you.
Barney: I'm teaching Ted how to live, and lucky you, I have room for one more student. Think of me as Yoda, only instead of being little and green, I wear suits and I'm awesome. I'm your bro. I'm bro-da. And tonight you are gonna use The Force to get the hottest chick in this bar into bed.
Barney: No, The Force. It's a Star Wars reference.
Barney: Yes, you are, with the hottie that just walked in. Look at her.
Barney: How much hotter is she than your girlfriend? Marshall: There's no comparison. What do you think, Ted? Go for it? Ted: Oh, don't do it, man. Think about Lily.
Barney: Yes, yes, pep talk. You can do this, but to be more accurate, you probably can't. You're way out of practice and she is way too hot for you. So, remember, tonight isn't about scoring, it's about believing that you can do it even though you probably can't. Go get him, tiger.
Barney: Poor guy's gonna crash and burn.
Barney: That man is a god.
Barney: I thought it was a Mr. Miyagi kind of thing.
Barney: Worst superheroes ever.
Barney: World of Warcraft? The online role playing game? That's how you two met online?
Barney: I watch this young man dancing near the jukebox, and I can not help thinking... Stella may have made the right choice. Ouch!
Barney: Assumption. He is not pretending to be happy. Ted is really happy. He did not want to marry from the start. Ted had the best train dodge since Stand by Me Well, not the first kid, but others.
Barney: Hey, kid.
Barney: I did not know you'd be here. Girls stairwell.
Barney: Guys, let him go. He is happy. Listen, if Ted was married, then he would be married, he would live in New Jersey, and he would be married. It is well. Good, let's eat. Let Flat Michael's?
Barney: Okay, Ted, is there a place in Manhattan where one can dine?
Barney: I will not in this table. Possibly, in this one.
Barney: Where may well be nuts Ted? You should check the garage in the grip of Stella.
Barney: Lily, you're all been there. When we loose one, it's not pretty.
Barney: The kids are great.
Barney: I am a person who... Well, are facing. There are a bunch of people I do not want to see... as the group of "girls that I skipped"... but if one of them came here, I would stay there, and I would look into his eyes. For some, this would be the first time.
Barney: Son of a bitch.
Barney: Do you mind?
Barney: Becca is this girl who lives in the North. I saw her from time to time.
Barney: Bedford Hills Federal Penitentiary.
Barney: And yes, the visits were of a conjugal nature.
Barney: Really. And that I had with Becca was a perfect relationship. She was allowed to call me once a week. If it becomes too sticky, the armed guards stoppaient. I've never had to pay for dinner. In fact, this is false. I pay taxes. I guess we all paid for dinner. Thank you, guys. Anyway, at the last visit, I screwed up.
Barney: I know it's hard, baby, but I'm in a prison too.Imprisoned in my heart. This room is ready or what? We can...?
Barney: That's why I'm here, baby. I am your strength. I'm...Oh, my God. Hello, stranger. (He hangs up with the first woman prisoner and will talk to another who has just arrived) Barney Stinson, attorney. Let's talk about your output.
Barney: Now I have letters from Becca who say, "I'll come see you the day I get out of here. I'll hang your eyes in my rearview mirror. "Women, eh?
Barney: Boy, this sure is another table. What are we talking?
Barney: Wait a second. Sorry, continues.
Barney: My poor. Being forced to grow up in Canada with America, right next door.
Barney: The blue line?
Barney: It's hot.
Barney: There, there.
Barney: You can fly it into the lamp? Fasten your seat belts!Not you, Ted.
Barney: Come on, Ted. She left you on the altar.
Barney: I have ants in my leg!
Barney: From cold blood.
Barney: And maybe you already know someone who went down to the courthouse and registered as an officiant so that he or she-- he-- could perform the ceremony.
Barney: Because it subtly implants in the mind of every woman there that when I ask a question, you say, "I do." Yeah.
Barney: Is she hot? I'd love to be able to cross "harp player" off my list.
Barney: Dude, I'm not gonna count how many pages the list is. I'm not crass.
Barney: Sweet! I can cross off two things.
Barney: Can I grab a scotch and soda real quick?
Barney: Wow. You just cost yourself a big tip, buddy.
Barney: You allowed to accept criticism? You, sir, are an ass... buddy.
Barney: Hey, you want to know what line doesn't work on a harp player? "Hey, baby, want to pluck?"
Barney: Not even a little. Hey! Who's Bill?
Barney: Yeah. This guy came up to me at the bar.
Barney: Uh... Don't think they do that anymore.
Barney: He kind of did.
Barney: I'll get it.
Barney: He's great. He's about to get his hair cut.
Barney: Me, too. I was up all night.
Barney: Hey, Bill.
Barney: I need a glass of wine.
Barney: It's for the bride, so...
Barney: White. And, uh... she'd also like a scotch and soda.
Barney: She'd also like a bowl of smoked almonds.
Barney: Well, it's only the biggest day of her life, so...The barman leaves... Let the games begin.
Barney: Here. Can't stay. Got to try something.
Barney: Hey.
Barney: Can I have your phone number?
Barney: It's for the bride.
Barney: The bride wants you to walk slower.
Barney: Well, it's not too short.
Barney: You totally do. And not even the good Backstreet Boys, the older, lame dance move, comeback tour Backstreet Boys.
Barney: Ah, let me see what I can do.
Barney: I have a superpower.
Barney: Could I have everyone's attention, please? It's for the bride. One, the bride would... like all of this tension out of my shoulders. And she would like, let's say, you in the inappropriatel short dress to rub them. Two... What was two?
Barney: The bride needs this.
Barney: To be honest, I'm, uh, I'm jealous I don't get to wear it.
Barney: It would cover up the problem. It's festive and it celebrates the heritage of this great nation.
Barney: Yes. Yes, I can. Uh, excuse me, guys. You all dropped something: your jaws-- because Barney Stinson is about to aid and abet a marriage.
Barney: Thank you all for coming. For those of you who don't know me... I'm not the biggest believer in marriage. But... you two are so great together, you know? It's like you were, uh, made for each other.
Barney: No, I'm not. I'm not, I'm not, I'm not, I'm not, I'm not. Lily and Marshall... when everyone sees you, they... see true love. It's the best love... Can we just, um, move on to the rings or something?
Barney: It's totally okay.
Barney: Marshall, do you take Lily to be your wife to have and to hold from this day forward?
Barney: I can't From this day forward so as long as you both shall live?
Barney: Lily, do you promise to take Marshall to be your husband to have and to hold... live?
Barney: Okay, then, by the power invested in me by the very bitter old Pakistani man who works down at the courthouse on Lafayette Street, I now pronounce you man and wife. You may kiss the bride.
Barney: I don't know where you heard that. It was a disaster.
Barney: You want to grab a drink right now?
Barney: Absolutely.
Barney: She didn't want to get drinks. And as soon as a girl says she doesn't want to get drinks, well...
Barney: You want to grab a drink right now?
Barney: Absolutely.
Barney: It's a shame, too. She was a really great laser tag partner. She's tiny, so she's allowed to push kids.
Barney: What? Nora? No, I don't.
Barney: That's... Nora. Sorry, sorry. I was thinking of a funny thing that Nora said. Hmm. Stop it. No... ra. Nah... Damn it, what is the matter with me?
Barney: Call her? she had a nice face, her booty was in place, but Barney don't chase.
Barney: Totally.
Barney: Like Prince.
Barney: Oh. Ha-wink
Barney: Lily, in my travels, I've developed a finely calibrated sense of how long it's been since... How do I not put this delicately?... a girl's been porked. And, boo, you've been pork-free so long, you're practically kosher.
Barney: Five weeks, three days by my estimation.
Barney: I tried. They're pretty strict with backgrounds.
Barney: 18 weeks.
Barney: Shh. Child, listen. If you're really hurting for it, I'd be more than happy to throw you one.
Barney: We're exes. We're probably due for a backslide. Or we could just do it the normal way.
Barney: Yeah?
Barney: Robin, you could not be more... What do you mean I missed my shot?
Barney: What?
Barney: But "L'Amour" means love! They're going to the cafe of love! I'm fine. It's fine. Point is, Robin, I don't even like Nora. Damn it!
Barney: Dude, don't do that. All they're going to hear is "$12 million," and all you're going to hear is the sound of the door smacking your fired ass. And some muffled laughter. Which I apologize for in advance.
Barney: You lying little minx. I happened to be at Cafe L'Amour tonight from 5:00 p.m. until closing, reading a newspaper with two holes cut out of it, and I never saw Nora or this Italian race car driver she's dating.
Barney: Come on, you just know he's an Italian race car driver.
Barney: No, I'm not. I'm Barney Stinson. I don't get smitten, I smite!
Barney: No, I'm not. I can't be anyone's boyfriend, Robin. If I got serious with Nora, it would be like if Mother Teresa focused all her attention on one really hot orphan. With great pen1s comes great responsibility.
Barney: Sorry?
Barney: Careful, Robin, I'll do it.
Barney: Don't poke the dragon, Robin, 'cause the dragon will poke you back.
Barney: All right, Robin, give it to me.
Barney: The number. Give me the number, 'cause I really can't tell... Is that a seven or a nine?
Barney: A fi...? In what moon man language is that a five?
Barney: How am I supposed to see that's a five?
Barney: Fine, fine, fine. I have a phone call to make.
Barney: Why?
Barney: How dare you?
Barney: It's true.
Barney: No, it was me. And I meant it.
Barney: I Can Vote? Street bitch! Street bitch!
Barney: You remember the yoga teacher that got you into my birthday?
Barney: Thank you. You believe not just enter. Look! Look! Why not look at you! This is Slash from Guns N'Roses!
Barney: And we have had. We had a group photo with Slash on my birthday. Great, huh? Eh?
Barney: False!
Barney: And me too. He has how many hands?
Barney: Yes, at this point, I have never an old head on the photos. Neither ever or always.
Barney: Nope, not at all.
Barney: Not the Barnacle. I always look awesome mortally. Not like Marshall, who seems to be ingeniously death.
Barney: You really put a knot!
Barney: Of course.
Barney: You sure?
Barney: It's physically impossible for me to take a picture ugly. I know why. Ask God.
Barney: You sure?
Barney: The camera loves me. Much more than that. The device I want. The unit wants to put on underwear, put an Al Green CD, dim the lights and do all the work while I was still lying with closed eyes.
Barney: They would be if Marshall was not on it.
Barney: It is said that it was after 40 years we know each other really.
Barney: What? Where?
Barney: Is there anything in the sauce that you've made? It tastes like... coriander. And... you know that cilantro makes me...
Barney: Ted, have you ignored all my teachings? Ted: For the most part, yeah.
Barney: You don't bring a date to a wedding. That's like bringing a deer carcass on a hunting trip. Oh Ted, oh Ted, no, no date.
Barney: Ted, it's a simile.
Barney: Don't beat yourself up. He'll be fine. I mean, the guy's like a billionaire. He can put his platinum card on a fishing line and reel in 10 chicks hotter than you.
Barney: What I don't get is, why is Claudia marrying Stuart? She's way hotter than him. How way? Way way.
Barney: What?
Barney: What up?
Barney: Seriously, Claudia and Stuart?! I mean, I've hooked up with the odd lass who was beneath my level of attractiveness, but, you know, I was drunk. There's no way Claudia has been drunk for three years.
Barney: Invigorating, thanks.
Barney: But to be fair, she's also hot.
Barney: Yeah, right.
Barney: Yeah, I don't think you did. You know why? Because deep down, you didn't want to show up at this thing with a date. See, for all your big talk about being ready for a relationship, deep down you're single. It's your default setting. Ted, you know what's in the back of your brain?
Barney: Behind a curtain, in a dark little room, secretly controlling your every move...
Barney: A little Barney. And you know what he said? (changing tone of voice) "Ted, you will bring no dates to this wedding. You will hit on drunk bridesmaids with actual-size Barney."
Barney: Hi, sad-eyes. What's got you down? Claudia: Stuart and I just broke up.
Barney: Oh, God, I'm so sorry. That's just, that's just... (to bartender) two vodka cranberries.
Barney: Remember? When it comes to you, how could I forget?
Barney: (to bartender) They all drink vodka cranberries.
Barney: So, is there anything else you need, sweetie?
Barney: No, but I do have a hug.
Barney: (looking up, whispers) Thank you.
Barney: That's just, that's... (yelling over to bartender) two more vodka cranberries please.
Barney: Claudia, it's all gonna be OK.
Barney: Isn't it weird that we should run into each other like this? Two souls of equal levels of attractiveness, both fitting together like two pieces of a very attractive puzzle.
Barney: Oww
Barney: Wait, my eyes or my testicles? Lily: One of each.
Barney: All right, all right.
Barney: Man, you know something, Stuart's my new hero. If that dude can bag a nine, I gotta be able to bag like a sixteen.
Barney: Those two eight's right over there. Yeah.
Barney: Speaking of easy, bridesmaids, Ted. Bridesmaids.
Barney: Being single's the best.
Barney: Answer to no one.
Barney: Never having to go to a farmer's market.
Barney: OK, ah, doing some math here. Table six has got three bridesmaids, an eight, an eight and a seven. I am willing to give you one of the eight's, lowering myself to a fifteen, which means you owe me...
Barney: Hey, guys!
Barney: Does anyone know who won the Superbowl?
Barney: I won! Because I'm now in possession of a magic phone that always rings. And you know who's always usually on the other end? A chick. So how many chicks do I have calling me now? Infinity! Guys, remember Ranjit?
Barney: OK I've enlisted Ranjit's services as my personal driver because for the next week I'll be sleeping with hundreds of women and I don't want to take the subway cause... you know... germs!
Barney: Oh, indubitably! I'm meeting the first one here any minute. Keep your eyes pealed for a red sweater. Based on her texts, she's dirty, dyslexic and want to 96 me, semi-colon and parenthesis.
Barney: Magic phone, guys. (whispers) Magic phone!
Barney: Guys, guys, guys, we're on me now. And it is getting in-teh-resting. Looks at these texts. Read this one. Yowza! Now look at this one. Does she text her mother with those fingers? Now look at this one... or this one, or this one, or this one, or...
Barney: I can't do that, Ted. I just can't hook up with a girl if there is a hotter girl out there with whom up can be hooked.
Barney: I know, isn't it wonderful? (answers phone) Go for Barney. Cut to the chase, what's your cup size?...Oh, hi Mom!
Barney: (walks by, phone ringing)Or this one, or this one, or this one...
Barney: There is no place I would rather be and no one I would rather be with... (phone rings) I should get that. (picks up in the kitchen) Go for Barney... Look, I'm sort of in the middle of someone, something right now and I... You're a hot lady bullfighter?... (to the girl in his room) You gotta go.
Barney: McLaren's pub.
Barney: Well, heeelllooo.
Barney: There is no place I would rather be, and no one I would rather be... (phone rings) Would you excuse me for one moment? (picks up in the kitchen) Go for Barney, look, I... You're a gold medalist japanese figure skater? (to the lady bullfighter) Adios, muchacha!
Barney: McLaren's pub.
Barney: Well, heeelllooo.
Barney: No place I'd rather be, no one I'd rather b... (phone rings) baaah... for Pete's sake. (picks up in the kitchen) You're a HOT chick? (to the skater) Sayonara.
Barney: McLaren's pub.
Barney: Well, heeelllooo.
Barney: OK.
Barney: Ay ay ay.
Barney: Yeah of course. Why, why wouldn't I be?... (picks up) Go for Barney.
Barney: I'm free.
Barney: Ahh now this feels right. There is no place I would rather be, and no one I would rather be... (hears THE phone ringing)
Barney: Did you hear that?
Barney: Shhhhhhhh. (loses his mind) aaahhhh
Barney: McLaren's pub!!
Barney: (crying) Go-o for Barrr-neeeeyy. (back to business) D cups, really?
Barney: Get rid of it. This phone is cursed. Cursed, I tell you! I tried to ignore it but it just never stops ringing. It's ruining my life! I should get that. (Marshall takes it away from him) No, please, please, please, Marshall, let me answer it, it could be an emergency, she could be trapped in a giant bra.
Barney: (mumbles) OK... (cries into Ranjit's shoulder)
Barney: I need it back. Where is the phone? Well, heeellooooo. Oh I met you already. Where is the phone?
Barney: Where?
Barney: My phone. I'm taking it back. And I'm taking your cool nickname too. Barney Westside speaking.
Barney: (picks up) Hey, baby...
Barney: It's not your phone. (they fight over it)
Barney: "Bogeyman with a teleprompter." That's hilarious! Great joke, Robin, great joke.
Barney: Are you kidding? That was a great joke. It's smart, funny, beautiful, the whole package. It's everything you're afraid to let yourself want. In a joke. "Bogeyman with a teleprompter." Classic.
Barney: I could tell you knew something was up with me, and you're right. But I can't tell you what it is. I should tell you, but I can't! I have to. I never will! I'm going to. Let's just drop it. What's up with you?
Barney: I think I'm in love with Robin.
Barney: It's not "sweet." It's like a disease. I slept with Robin one time and I caught feelings. I caught feelings bad. I used protection and everything.
Barney: They're terrible! I can't eat, I can't sleep. She's all I think about. I close my eyes, I see Robin. I, I hear a song; it reminds me of Robin.
Barney: I sleep with that chick, I'm thinking about Robin.
Barney: I'm sorry, I don't follow you. That's like saying, "How can an ant carry "20 times its body weight, but root beer floats are still delicious?" Are the two even related? Really?
Barney: "Boyfriend"? I don't want to be Robin's boyfriend.
Barney: I don't know. I just want to be with her. All the time. I want to hear about her day and tell her about mine. I want to hold her hand and smell her hair. But I don't want to be her stupid boyfriend.
Barney: Look, Lily, are you going to help me out with this or not?
Barney: Deal.
Barney: So just call her up?
Barney: Yeah, but those were just booty calls.
Barney: Hey, baby, it's Barney. You busy tonight? Sweet. See you in half an hour? Can't wait.
Barney: Sweet.
Barney: It's no worse than your super-obvious code words.
Barney: Ah, ah, it's her, it's Robin. What do I do? No-no-no-no, aah! Robin... Great to hear from you. To what do I owe the pleasure?
Barney: How are you feeling today?
Barney: At what age did you first get your period?
Barney: No, I did not.
Barney: Robin, I was wondering if... Nothing. Gotta go. Bye. That was just a practical joke. I'm not really in love with Robin. You should've seen the look on your face. There's cameras right there and there and there. What a legendary prank that we're never going to speak of again.
Barney: Where are the boys? I thought this was a group thing.
Barney: Why?
Barney: Wait, wait, I can't do this. She'll never take me seriously. She thinks I'm some womanizing idiot.
Barney: You mean the insecure, touchy-feely she-male who sounded alarmingly close to Ted?
Barney: Wish me luck.
Barney: So, Robin... tell me about your day, and not just what happened, how you felt about what happened.
Barney: I'm not looking to problem-solve, I'm just looking to listen.
Barney: Like what?
Barney: I'm being Barney, and I think tonight's going to be de... wait for it... lightful. Delightful.
Barney: Is insurance going to cover that? Sometimes they don't.
Barney: Your teeth look fantastic.
Barney: Thanks.
Barney: I don't always want to be that guy. Sometimes I want to be someone you can have an actual conversation with. Now, tell me something about you that I don't know yet. Seriously.
Barney: Why not?
Barney: We both know you're more than that. Promise me you'll apply.
Barney: Promise me you'll apply.
Barney: To taking chances.
Barney: You know, Robin, there's actually something, I do want to talk to you about.
Barney: Of course it is. One more for the road?
Barney: So, here's the deal.
Barney: Would you excuse us for one sec? What are you doing?
Barney: Yeah, I'm nervous for the other team 'cause when I step up to that plate... I am not a New York Yankee. Any other night, I would probably try to convince you that I am, but I'm not. I'm just some guy who's in love with the girl that just left, and she's never going to feel the same way. So I'm just going to go.
Barney: And that was it.
Barney: My name, and tell your nephews to bring their mitts. They're going to be in foul ball country. Come on. The Robin stuff was completely true.
Barney: I choose bimbos.
Barney: Bimbos make me happy. Bimbos make me feel alive. Bimbos make me want to pretend to be a better man. This whole thing with Robin was just a fling, but at the end of the day, my heart belongs to bimbos.
Barney: Oh, I'm not confused. You know who is confused? Bimbos. They're easily confused. It's one of the thousand little things I love about them. I love their vacant, trusting stares, their sluggish, unencumbered minds, their unresolved daddy issues. I love them and they love me. Bimbos have always been there for me, through thick and thin. Mostly thin. B- man don't do thick crust. What up?
Barney: Mind-blowing entertainment, like a naked fire show or a naked magic show.
Barney: Guess what I have behind my back.
Barney: Not a good game but okay. Five tickets well placed to Robots vs. Wrestlers.
Barney: You know Robots vs. Wrestlers?
Barney: That's exactly it, according to the website!
Barney: Uh... Robin. I know... She lives with her boyfriend and she said not wanting to hang out with us, but it's Robots vs. Wrestlers. Robots vs.... Wrestlers!
Barney: She said no? How could she? Robots vs. Wrestlers of our tradition is the largest group.
Barney: It's Robots vs. Wrestlers, Lily. This is obviously a tradition. It starts like this. First, Robin moves in with Don and Marshall and Lily have a baby, then Ted...
Barney: I was going to say "was found eaten by her cats," but it's not good either. Everybody leaves me, and I like it!
Barney: You're right. I exaggerate with this story of Robin. What is an announcement? Wife Robin Don. I'll die alone! Ted eventually eaten by her cats!
Barney: Marissa Heller? She looks good. Face, breasts, describe. Begins with the breasts.
Barney: We change the plan for Saturday. Evening Marissa Heller for alcohol and Robots vs. Wrestlers. But one of us should pretend to Marissa Heller.
Barney: Guys, we get together. Lil, you can do... All you have to watch the guy in front, say your name is Marissa Heller, and it passes. And I repeat, to be sure, no accent.
Barney: I do we go to the party, that's what! (He goes to Marissa) We met at the meeting of ornithophilic.
Barney: Lovers of wicker?
Barney: I said I'd get us.
Barney: In a coined word "asshole-Apocalypse."
Barney: This morning I made the heart of the Ambassador of the Netherlands. I hope he gets better.
Barney: As Undersecretary of Finance, I had a great influence on this legislation. Now, I wonder if you will accompany me in the map room to stimulate my package.
Barney: Zsa Zsa Gabor is still sexy, but other than that, it is rotten this holiday.
Barney: But you never missed Robots vs. Wrestlers. It happens that way. First Robin us loose, and now you? And for those pretentious snobs and old game?
Barney: It's an evening.
Barney: It means everything. If you come not to Robots vs. Wrestlers, it's the end of our friendship.
Barney: All right. So you do most of our group, forever. You can ask to return in 2 years. Come see wrestlers fight like robots. I'm embarrassed. I forgot something.
Barney: You crazy not me, Marshall. Let's be honest. The group is finite. Ted is gone, like Robin. That separates us as well.
Barney: Wait. Why do you say that all of a sudden? My God, you're pregnant!
Barney: My God, have you ever had the baby! It is just behind me, huh?
Barney: You can at least promise to not get pregnant within a year?
Barney: You can not?
Barney: No! You can not have children! You want to raise a child in this crazy world.
Barney: Okay, Lily, I have no choice. If you have a daughter, day, no, the minute she is 18... Gong!
Barney: I hope Ted is unhappy.
Barney: Okay, you can have a baby, but only under the following conditions: 1-You promise to always love me more than the baby, 2-Once a month, I can use to shake the baby, 3 - It may include a drop baby from the first floor and that saves me; 4-No breastfeeding in front of me. Forget the five-four, get out your breasts when you want.
Barney: Rule number 83. If something out of the baby ends up on my costume, I can touch the breasts of Lily.
Barney: It is not I who make the rules.
Barney: Look who thinks he can come here and repeat the group. Well, you can forget. Pity, remake the group! I want to lose anyone yet! We're sorry. You can recite all the poems of asshole that you want, we never say anything bad on it, I promise.
Barney: You know what I love about Halloween? It's the one night of the year chicks use to unleash their inner ho-bag. If a girl dresses up as she a witch, she's a slutty witch. If she's a cat, she's a slutty cat. If she's a nurse...
Barney: She's a slutty nurse.
Barney: And she called it the Tootsie Roll.
Barney: You know, Ted, it's been four years. She could be engaged or married or, God forbid, fat.
Barney: No, no, not again. Not this year. You're going as my wingman. Flight suit up!
Barney: Oh you're dangerous, Maverick. Your ego's writing check your body can't cash. OK. Here's the plan, and I crap you not. I'm getting us into the Victoria's Secret Halloween party. Trust me, by the end of the night, your chad will not be hanging.
Barney: Hm, (putting up left hand) Victoria's Secret models prancing around in bras and panties, or (putting up right hand) Yale preppies reuniting their stupid a capella group. What's that left hand? Right hand sucks? Word.
Barney: Well, boys, looks like it's just the three of us. What's that? Self-five? Nice. (high fives himself) We out.
Barney: I can't believe you talked me into this.
Barney: This party sucks. There are seven chicks here.
Barney: There are six chicks here.
Barney: Hey.
Barney: So, what does a fella have to do to get lei'd around here? Yeah.
Barney: It isn't funny if you explain the joke.
Barney: Let's bail.
Barney: Name one person you know at this party.
Barney: OK, I'm leaving, but just know that this Victoria's Secret party is on a yacht. And what will be sticking to that yacht? The Barnacle. (points to self)
Barney: Yeah, the Barnacle.
Barney: That's it. Barnacle out. (Barney walks away)
Barney: That's right.
Barney: Every Halloween, I bring a spare costume in case I strike out with the hottest girl at the party. That way I have a second chance to make a first impression.
Barney: What's with the face?
Barney: So go to the bathroom.
Barney: So pee off the roof. Ooh, Ted, pee off the roof.
Barney: Come on, Ted, who are you going to listen to? Me or Mr. Goody-goody over there.
Barney: Let me guess. Every guy has used the lei'd line on you tonight.
Barney: I apologize for my gender. Let me make it up to you. Make you a drink.
Barney: I'm also a horny devil. (pointing to horns on top of head) Yeah.
Barney: OK Victoria's Secret party right now.
Barney: Come on, I can't stand to watching my delusional friend waste another precious Halloween. The Slutty Pumpkin is not coming.
Barney: Oy.
Barney: Wow. I did not understand a word you just said. Lingerie models on a boat!
Barney: No, see ya. (evil laughs, sparks something in his hands) Ow.
Barney: You are such a loser. Come on, I came back for you, Ted. I penguin-suited up to show you the error of your ways. And to score hula girl's number. Check and check.
Barney: Yes, it is.
Barney: What? No no, that's some other guy and he was a kick-ass fighter pilot
Barney: Yeah, well, you did, thanks.
Barney: Uh, I don't think so. I earned it fair and square. I'm calling you.
Barney: But how will you know it's me? I'm a master of disguise. Yeah.
Barney: Come on, Ted, Victoria's Secret party now. Let's go.
Barney: Fine. Fine. (puts his flipper up towards Ted)
Barney: I'm flippering you off.
Barney: Go for Barney.
Barney: A sasquatch?
Barney: Yes! Look at you. You suited in an unmistakably upward direction.
Barney: Yeah, hell, yeah. I got 'em all: Teamwork, Courage, Awesomeness...
Barney: Yeah, I had it made. Sit.
Barney: Please.
Barney: Hey, Blauman, Bilson, this is Marshall. These guys are in legal. You're gonna be working with them.
Barney: Marshall? Sidebar. Your tie is steak sauce. It means A-1. A-1? Get it? Try to keep up.
Barney: What? No. We're having so much fun. You, me, working together. It's great.
Barney: Please.
Barney: Oh, of course it's not for you. It's for Lily.
Barney: Marshall. Lily's a catch. But do you really think you're going to hang onto a girl that great without the package?
Barney: The package. The house. The car. Sending your kids to a great school. A vacation once in a while.
Barney: Well, no-- now she doesn't, but how's she going to feel in a couple years, when she's supporting you on a kindergarten teacher's salary while you're off in court defending some... endangered... South American... flying beaver.
Barney: Okay. But will you be happy knowing you could have made her a lot happier.
Barney: Marshall, consider the penguins.
Barney: On the wall.
Barney: Look at yourself, Marshall. You're not happy. And you know why? Because you're different. Now, I suppose you could learn to love yourself for the unique little snowflake that you are, or... you could change your entire personality, which is just so much easier.
Barney: Okay, I'm psyched about this. But if I'm going to mentor you, I need to know you're psyched about this, too.
Barney: Yeah, but it's one thing to say it, it's another thing to show it. Show it.
Barney: What was that? Marshall, I should feel tremors of psychitude rock my body like a seizure. That was like a declawed pregnant cat on a porch swing idly swatting at a fly on a lazy Sunday afternoon.
Barney: Show me you're psyched! Let's do this! Ow! That hurt!
Barney: And then you slip it to the guy with a discreet handshake and he'll get it done.
Barney: Whatever.
Barney: There's always a guy.
Barney: You sure? You want to practice your story one more time?
Barney: Nah. I'm so over karaoke.
Barney: Oh, don't get me wrong. I'm good. The best, really. But it's the greatest samurai who lets his sword rust in its scabbard.
Barney: All women of New York. That's right, Barney Stinson is back on the market. Mother, lock your daughters. Daughters, lock your MAQACENJaR.
Barney: You have the right answer!
Barney: Since I went out with Robin there is a trick that I have not used as much as I wanted. It is... rather large, surprisingly heavy, with the skin, and it's black. My friends, this is the book of... Roles.
Barney: The Roles book contains all the scams, trickery, deception, underhand, cunning, nonsense, and embobinages tricks I used, or expected use, to nab the girls and do their business.
Barney: It's all there. Everything, starting from the basic, like Le Bois Do Not Ca...
Barney: Do not drink it. I saw a guy put something.
Barney: This guy.
Barney:... Until more advanced maneuvers, such as the Ms. Stinsfire.
Barney: Glad you asked. The Lorenzon Von Matterhorn will be my comeback on stage. Or, you know, in my bed. In fact, my bed is on a stage. I put it on a platform and installed lighting. A real production. Barney goes!
Barney: My hen, Ted did not miss much. She is brainy, boring, a bit boring in bed. In fact it would have been perfect for Ted.Oops! (Lily hits him) If I had known she was there for Ted, I would have obviously not done, but... given the circumstances, I think Ted would be proud of me. I managed The Lorenzo Von Matterhorn.
Barney: Glad you asked.
Barney: To achieve the Lorenzo Von Matterhorn is what you need, basic knowledge in web design and a truly unique fake name. So think about your fake name right away. You? Fine.Now choose your target. (It is now at the bar) Preferably a girl with a great big... phone. (He approaches the counter Shelly installed) Yeah that's me.
Barney: I'm Lorenzo Von Matterhorn.
Barney: Yes. You do not know who I am, does not it? It feels good for once. Nice to meet you...
Barney: Shelly? Again, I'm Lorenzo Von Matterhorn. It is written as it is pronounced, with two "T". (He leaves) Then, once you leave, she takes out her phone and tries Lorenzo Von Matterhorn on the Internet. And that's when she discovers... A series of fake websites, all devoted to the incredible life of Lorenzo Von Matterhorn. A false item of business on Lorenzo, the hermit billionaire. The fake of the Explorer Club newsletter on his trip to the North Pole in an airship, a feat of imagination and challenge. The fake medical journal with a story to make you cry the doctors saying that a reduction of the pen1s is not an option. And time to return... (Barney returns to Shelly) I hate to be cheeky, but I can offer you a coffee?
Barney: How much is a coffee today, $ 50? And here we go.
Barney: Why would it be inconsolable? The airship of Lorenzo will not disappear in the Arctic for a week. Sorry if this is that someone told her that it was lies.
Barney: Oh my God! Well, I hope you are pleased with you.
Barney: Thou hast broken my heart.
Barney: You! She will never trust a man. You've spoiled for Ted.Not to mention Julio Von Matterhorn, the twin brother of Lorenzo.
Barney: Actually, I'm in a top secret government space program called Secret NASA... Sn&aring;sa.
Barney: No Moon you know, but I went on Slune.
Barney: Tours to two euros?! None of these towers is. The Tower A except two Euros.
Barney: I am the bassist for Tower Two Euros. And even that involves expensive hair extensions. Now, if you allow, I have to prepare for the event tonight. The I exécuterais he will not come.Glad you asked.
Barney: The To run it will not come, you will need the observation deck of the Empire State Building. Got it? Fine. For generations, this is the place chosen by New Yorkers for reunion with their lost lovers of view, you need to go to every girl and say, "He will not come."
Barney: Let it go. (He goes to another woman) He will not come.(Then another) He will not come. She's not coming? Sorry. (The woman leaves) Until... He will not come.
Barney: I tried the he will not come, and it worked. Monstrous.You should have seen this girl.
Barney: So, we came up to me, and I go to my room to prepare the camera... lighting candles... and when I go out, nobody, paper and more roles! We all know who is responsible for that.
Barney: Al-Qaeda.
Barney: You... enfoirée dirty!
Barney: An actress. Of course. That explains his perfect diction and style of Drag.
Barney: You would not dare.
Barney: You did not say nonsense.
Barney: Slim.
Barney: I was abandoned at the altar.
Barney: Only if you rub hard enough.
Barney: If you wonder, I would be at McLaren's playing a character from the Book of roles being called The Diver. That's all.
Barney: Now you want to know what the diver. In fact, it was on the last page of the Book, but I pulled in case. But do not worry.You will see it in action. You see the blonde next to the bar?Cizzible repérizzée.
Barney: Forget it, kid. If anyone should be angry with me, this is Robin. She loves the book.
Barney: But what...? The Book of the Rolls, this is gold. Granted this is truly spectacular.
Barney: I did not know you felt it. I was so caught up with my own projects as... Damn, she looks out there. Quickly dispersed.
Barney: Hello, Claire. I am Lieutenant Frank Lyman. I train dolphins bomb detectors for... You know what? I can not do that.Robin, I'm sorry. I think this break is harder for me than expected.The Book of roles was just a way to change my mind.
Barney: Is it true? Claire, you must have heard a lot about the real Barney tonight. Want some coffee?
Barney: A Pringles, but still.
Barney: Step one, talk to a friend Book Roles. Step two, play with one of his colleagues and make angry she steals the Book.Step three, put the combi and say you will do a final round, The Diver with the sexy girl next to the bar. Your friend, let's call her Lily, told him everything about the book. Now the hard part.When Lily and daughter are questioning The Diver, remove the mask, and pull out the stops on your deepest insecurities that do not exist because you are awesome. Sad for you, Lily talks about you to the girl who agrees to have coffee. And... is... gone.
Barney: I have to, it's my birthday present to Ted.
Barney: Ah... Happy birthday, Ted.
Barney: Uh, excuse me, has anyone ever told y... Oh, my God.
Barney: Oh! Call an ambulance!
Barney: Try not to speak. Here, sit down. Just don't talk, don't talk.
Barney: I'm serious, call 911.
Barney: Shh! Shh! Just don't move. Don't move. Just try... Here, have some water. Water! Here, drink this. Shh! Shh!
Barney: Oh, thank God, you're here.
Barney: I think there might be some internal bleeding. Probably some fractures. We got to get her to the hospital.
Barney: You've had a terrible fall.
Barney: Really? 'Cause I could swear you fell straight out of heaven. Angel... Give him your number. What? Give him your number. What?
Barney: Come on, guys, you're embarrassing me.
Barney: What are you...? Come on. They're not going to stop 'til you give me your number.
Barney: It works!
Barney: Thank you, everyone. Thank you, everyone. It's been fun. It's Wendy the waitress. Tip her well. Thanks a lot, guys. Troilus and Cressida. Neighborhood Playhouse. Check them out, they're good.
Barney: Binoculars. Second pair on my desk.
Barney: Just take a look, will ya? Okay, corner office. Top floor. Check out that guy. Name's Clark Butterfield. He works over at Nicholson, Hewitt and West and every morning, he orders a sandwich from the deli downstairs.
Barney: So guess what I did to that sandwich? Here, I took a picture.
Barney: And now I'm e-mailing said picture to him.
Barney: Who knows? This feud goes so far back I can't remember who fired the first shot.
Barney: Totally. Well, look, if you would just... help me fill out these forms, that would be great.
Barney: Butterfield is going to retaliate within the next four hours. That's been his pattern. This is war, Eriksen. I need you to clear your schedule, call Lily, tell her you'll be home late.
Barney: Stu... Come on, man, I didn't recruit you to work here for your lawyering skills. I recruited you to be my executive mischief consultant.
Barney: Tracy, could you come in here, please? Would you please inform Mr. Eriksen that I'm no longer speaking to him.
Barney: Will you taste this latte for me? I think they gave me decaf.
Barney: That's what I thought, too. Then I got this e-mail from Butterfield.
Barney: It got me as well.
Barney: Because now... you're in.
Barney: Yeah, it's probably a good idea.
Barney: Anything, bro.
Barney: No.
Barney: What are you doing in Duchess County?
Barney: I wish I could help, buddy, but I'm stuck here at work. We're kind of swamped.
Barney: Yeah. He's stuck in Duchess County.
Barney: Hey, check out this one. It actually looks like Butterfield.
Barney: You thinking about coming to work here full-time?
Barney: Thanks, Tracy.
Barney: Of course we are. Were you going to think of that?
Barney: That would have been bad.
Barney: Oh, man, I'm so excited. I couldn't sleep last night. I bet you guys couldn't either.
Barney: Ah, only the gala event for the grand opening of Sharper Image's 500th store. Didn't you get my email?
Barney: Come on, it's on me! I'm buying three of you foot massagers and one of you a nose hair trimmer. You know who you are.
Barney: Come on, let's go.
Barney: To the Willowbrook Mall!
Barney: Why not?
Barney: Ted, you should be happy Robin has a secret. The more you learn about a person, the better chance you have of hitting the fatal 'oh' moment.
Barney: Yeah, that moment when you find out that one detail about a person that is going to be a deal breaker.
Barney: Oh.
Barney: Oh.
Barney: Oh.
Barney: So, trust me, you want to postpone knowing anything about each other for as long as possible.
Barney: You are such a cutie pie. Here's a quarter, go play something on the jukebox.
Barney: I can think of tons of things there's no way Marshall told you
Barney: Do you know about the time the Marshall was in Trenton?
Barney: Bill's bachelor party in Memphis.
Barney: OK, Seattle.
Barney: Damn.
Barney: Fine, do you want to know what Robin's secret is?
Barney: Of course I know. She couldn't look at us. Her face got flushed. That's shame. Our friend, Robin, used to do p0rn, wait for it, ography.
Barney: They speak French there too? God! That place is a mess.
Barney: Guys, there's not way Robin's married. It's ludicrous to even suggest it.
Barney: 'Cause it's p0rn.
Barney: 20,000 says it's p0rn.
Barney: Well then, what do you have?
Barney: I got it. The ultimate wager. Slap bet.
Barney: Your hand is monstrous.
Barney: I'm pretty sure we're gonna call is mistress.
Barney: Don't get too cocky, Slappy. I just got a shipment of p0rn from Canada I have to go through.
Barney: Just because you were right doesn't mean I'm wrong.
Barney: Canadian p0rn. Trust me when I tell you their universal health care system doesn't cover breast implants. If I have to sit through one more flat-chested Nova Scotian riding a Mountie on the back of a Zamboni, I'll go "oat" of my mind.
Barney: You, you got something to say to me?
Barney: Don't count on it. I've been practicing on a tree trunk.
Barney: Oh my God. Are you gonna cry? Marshall: No. You're gonna cry.
Barney: So I just got a very interesting phone call.
Barney: I know Robin's secret.
Barney: That's right, I know your secret, Robin. Or should I say Robin Sparkles? Robin: How do you know that name? Barney: 'Cause I know the truth. And I am about to show it to you right now.
Barney: Gather around, Ted, you're gonna wanna see this.
Barney: What?
Barney: Yeah, it's not gonna stay a secret. You see, in my research, I came upon a certain gentleman in Malaysia who is in possession of a certain video tape. He just emailed me that it will be up and running on MySpace in about, right now!
Barney: Robin's world is about to be turned upside-down. I mean, I'm guessing.
Barney: Robin, please don't panic. I'm only going to show enough to prove to Marshall that I was right.
Barney: Yeah you were.
Barney: They never do.
Barney: It always does.
Barney: Well, obviously, I've been proven right, so in the interest of Robin's dignity, I won't show anymore. Plus, it's getting late. It's already slap o'clock.
Barney: I'm gonna go with the five for eternity.
Barney: Wow, we're gonna watch this a lot. Robin: I even wore a bedazzled jean jacket.
Barney: Did you have to laugh like that every time? Robin: Yes.
Barney: Yeah, Lily, listen.
Barney: Robin's more than just awe-"some." She's awe-"quite a bit." She's awe-"a whole darn lot."
Barney: Oh yeah.
Barney: Yeah, It's us. You understand, right?
Barney: That, my friend, is the Dominator 8000, the best bullwhip on the market, according to my whip guy. Yeah, I have a whip guy.
Barney: You're still seeing that guy?
Barney: I should go, too. I hooked up with this Chinese girl last night and I don't know, it's weird. I already feel like seconds.
Barney: All summer.
Barney: Girlfriend?
Barney: Yeah, yeah.
Barney: Yes, we should. Or. Or...
Barney: Yes, we do. Or. Or...
Barney: Yeah, the talk sucks. You have to, like, talk. And be all, "I don't know.
Barney: Well, that and the fact that elaborate lies really turn us on.
Barney: Or. Or...
Barney: Ted, now's not a good time. Where do you keep your condoms?
Barney: Okay, look, mistake number 1 was taking that girl's question. You don't take questions on the first day. It shows weakness. Mistake number 2 was you should've hit that. Dude, your pants were already off, you had a classroom full of people to cheer you on, and you can't knock her up 'cause it's a dream. Class dismissed.
Barney: Exactly.
Barney: Amen.
Barney: Run tell that.
Barney: Yes! No! Lily, private convo time.
Barney: Lily, can't you just let us be happy?
Barney: And that's not happy?
Barney: Why? Give me one good reason.
Barney: Waow, You can't even think of one. Headlights. Dear. Lily, for the last time, things with me and Robin are as good as they can possibly be. Oh, hey, look, Brad's here.
Barney: Hey Brad.
Barney: We're not gonna have the talk.
Barney: Thank you, Ted.
Barney: What?!
Barney: How do you keep a girl from becoming your girlfriend? Simple, the rules for girls are the same as the rules for gremlins.
Barney: Gremlins. Rule number 1. Never get them wet. In otherords, don't let her take a shower at your place. Number 2. Keep them away from sunlight. I.E. Don't ever see them
Barney: No, Ted. Brunch is not cool.
Barney: Simple. Remember in the movie Predator...
Barney: I've done all three of those things with Robin. Is she my girlfriend?
Barney: Hey Brad!
Barney: Brad, we can't fight like this all night! We both got some good shots in. Let's call a truce!
Barney: Wow, wow, wow, Girlfriend? Hey, come on.
Barney: A bit strongly. She's not my girlfriend.
Barney: Because of that? Come on. That's my thing. I'm always punching guys. Girls... I'll punch a baby. I don't care.
Barney: Hey, sorry I went little too far last night.
Barney: No, I meant punching Brad.
Barney: No.
Barney: We are not having the talk!
Barney: Never take questions on the first day. It shows weakness. Also, don't look right here (showing girl's boobs). Okay, good luck. Byesies.
Barney: (from Robin's room) Hey, Ted, door five! Were you there?
Barney: Fine. But how do these things even work? What do we say?
Barney: I know, right?
Barney: I don't know. I mean, it's not like I don't like you. I just haven't had a girlfriend
Barney: Maybe we should go back to being just friends.
Barney: Good. Me, neither.
Barney: We're not good at being friends. We're not good at being in a relationship. What are we good at?
Barney: I don't know. If we're gonna do it again, I'm gonna need some Gatorade...
Barney: And Robin's my girlfriend. I know it sounds nuts, but it feels good to say.
Barney: And if the alternative is not being together, then it's worth taking this risk 'cause... she's awesome.
Barney: She can handle her Scotch.
Barney: And she's my girlfriend.
Barney: Hook, line, and sinker. We are good.
Barney: You know, brunch actually does sound kind of good.
Barney: Flugelhorn?
Barney: I think the whole point of getting married was that you didn't have to do that anymore.
Barney: Whoa. Whoa. What are death folders?
Barney: Yeah. Wait, why?
Barney: That's right. Unless... you die between now and then. Ooh. But, come on, that's never gonna happen.
Barney: No way at all. In fact, I dare God to smite down this perfectly healthy...
Barney: Whoa. Are you topless? Ted, check this out.
Barney: You haven't changed, Scherbatsky. You're a sophisticated, scotch-swilling, cigar-smoking, red-meat-eating, gun-toting new yorker.
Barney: What you are not is a massage-giving, windsurfing, bongo-playing, teetotaling, vegan, peacenik, hippy like you soon to be ex-boyfriend, Gael. Back me up here, Ted.
Barney: Please, vacation romances have an expiration date. Gael's got a "Best if banged by" sticker on him. Once your romance starts to stink, you'll dump his ass down the drain like sour milk and go back to being "Unevolved Robin", the one we actually like. Back me up here, Ted.
Barney: I'm telling you, within three days...
Barney: Within a triad of solar periods, you'll recognize your dearth of compatibility with your paramour and conclude your association.
Barney: This is all gonna returns to masticate you in the gluteals. Support my hypotehesis, Ted.
Barney: That guy...
Barney: Well. You and me, we have to bend over backwards to get a woman to, well, bend over backwards. But that guy... every woman in the bar is hanging on his every slightly mispronounced word. And why?
Barney: No. Because he's from out of town.
Barney: Yeah. Actually... You know where I've been meaning to visit?
Barney: (With southern accent) Uh, hey, uh, howdy, ladies. Hate to bother you. We seem to be a little bit lost. Would you happen to know which street the statue of liberty's on?
Barney: Oh, it's right. And, thank you very... Uh, my name is, uh, Ignatius Peabody Nobel, from East Westerton, Missouri. And this is my friend... Ted.
Barney: Hi, Colleen.
Barney: Hi, Lindsay.
Barney: Yeah.
Barney: Well. Hotdog! Should we... you want to just meet here in front of Mac... MacLaren's pub?
Barney: All right.
Barney: Okay. All right.
Barney: This is the easiest date ever. You know what I'm gonna try next? A knock, knock joke.
Barney: Ted, Ted, Ted. Dude.
Barney: Right. Stay with me. We are on the cusp of moving from out-of-towners to in-their-pantsers. Ay-o?
Barney: Nice. (The girls are coming in) Nice. Hey, nice.
Barney: Knock, knock.
Barney: Yes, we do.
Barney: Everything's so bright, even at night. No wonder the city never sleeps. (Barney and Colleen laughing)
Barney: (scoffing) Now he knows all the streets. Someone's been watching too many "Steinfield reruns". (Woman laughing, Ted laughts sarcastically)
Barney: Ted. I think these local new yorkers know more about the city than we do, so relax. We're in very capable hands.
Barney: Well. I only had traveler's checks.
Barney: What?! This night couldn't have gone any better. We've just survived a mugging. You know what that means.
Barney: "Thank God we're alive" s*x. It's even better than "I can't believe you just proposed to me" s*x, which I've only had, like, four of five times. Ted, please, we are so close.
Barney: Mmm-mm. Me too. So where do you live?
Barney: Theodore.
Barney: Teddy?
Barney: Oh, no.
Barney: (with an accent) You're not from Missouri? Well, I will be a monkey's unc...
Barney: Hey, um, sir, can we get ride, too?
Barney: Welcome home, Scherbatsky.
Barney: Listening.
Barney: No, I must go.
Barney: Maybe I did not like. My God, you think that the male spirit is really so simple, we all have a favorite type? Lord.Asian, big tits. I go to the bathroom, then I'm going.
Barney: OK, to Saturday. (Marshall is in the doorway) I was thinking of a brunch, and perhaps a hike. I love you too.
Barney: A plus.
Barney: Nowhere. At the beach. It's winter. Laser Tag. At home. Shut up! It is you who are going somewhere.
Barney: What are you doing here?
Barney: Who?
Barney: These are my friends. Ted, Marshall, Lily and Robin.Guys, here is Loretta. My mother.
Barney: Mom!
Barney: Yes, you got me. I guess you can leave.
Barney: Ted, Marshall, Lily, Robin. I present to you Betty... my wife. And my son, Tyler.
Barney: She wants me to live long.
Barney: Me too.
Barney: Will in, little rascal! I'll see you at the bar?
Barney: It's a long story. As you know, my father had to leave my mother when I was a baby because he became presenter of the Just Price.
Barney: She had to raise my brother and I, all alone. And his only wish was that his son did not end up alone like her. And there seven years, she fell ill.
Barney: I do not think she was going to make. So I decided to fulfill his wish. Mom. This is Betty. We're engaged.
Barney: I hired an actress to play my girlfriend "Betty". His real name is Margaret. It is mainly small theaters. Superb actress.In it a Moliere. I say no more. This is political. I should not talk about it. But there is a problem. Betty has a slight tendency to improvise.
Barney: You see, Mom? I found someone who makes me happy. As you wished.
Barney: And then my mother went better. It was miraculous.But I had to keep "Betty" and make a casting to find my son, Tyler.
Barney: For a while, it was enough to borrow / keep the baby from neighbors. And once at Christmas, my mother was drunk at the grog, I went out with a bag of flour and a Chucky mask.But eventually I had to audition.
Barney: four, eight... thirteen, you stay. The other, you can leave.
Barney: Apparently I'm better actor than your son. Bring those from 11!
Barney: And that's how the role of Tyler went to... Grant.
Barney: Really? Look. Tyler? Tyler? Tyler? Grant?
Barney: You see? This is amateur work. Believe me, the child stars had better possession in the 80s.
Barney: Karate Kid's a great movie. This is the story of a young karate enthusiast whose dreams led him to Karate Championship All Star Valley. Unfortunately, he loses in the final against another loser. But he learned an important lesson in accepting his defeat.
Barney: No, I'm for the other loser from New Jersey who barely knows karate. When I watch Karate Kid, I'm for real karate kid: Johnny Lawrence of Cobra Kai dojo. Do not get dumber than you are, Lily.
Barney: No, no question. The truth would kill her.
Barney: On the bed "race car"?
Barney: We talked about it a million times! You get no slogan!
Barney: I can make another cast. Will remember your sentences for the big dinner scene.
Barney: Just a little script. Things that my mother will be pleased to hear.
Barney: The nostrils dilated. They do it when she gets mad. I love it. As now. Like now!
Barney: Sorry, my little bear. Continues. You really like that for a relationship.
Barney: Funny story, the other night, this little rascal had a nightmare. He came to tell us what it was, you remember what you said?
Barney: Page 4...
Barney: Tyler said: "In my nightmare, mom and you did not know how much I loved you. So I'm here to say it was great...like that. "
Barney: We're a happy family.
Barney: No weak link in this scene. Bravo!
Barney: Go and eat your ice.
Barney: Guess who is not lactose intolerant: Tyler. Tyler will go there and enjoy every bite.
Barney: Yum!
Barney: You're not gonna get us out a slogan.
Barney: I, yes. Follow me. I... been betrayed by my best friend.How could you do that, Ted? Think of the poor Tyler who tries valiantly to hold back tears. It's good my boy, you can cry.Weep!
Barney: What can you have to say for yourself?
Barney: Sorry. What?
Barney: For God's sake, what are you talking?
Barney: No, not at all.
Barney: Mom, you leave us a moment?
Barney: You've lost your mind?
Barney: What's wrong with you? How do I explain this to my mother?
Barney: Mom, I've got something to tell you. Something I should have told you long ago. Tyler is dying. And Betty said that when he is gone, it will go out. So it may soon be over.
Barney: None of this is true! The truth is that... Betty and Tyler are actors I hired to pretend to be my family.
Barney: I just wanted you to think I had the life you wanted for me. I wanted you to be proud of me. It sounds crazy, and I'm sorry, Mom.
Barney: No.
Barney: Really?
Barney: Is it not?
Barney: I know! They are not horrible? So really, you angry with me?
Barney: Really?
Barney: I'm really relieved because in reality, I am also far from being a married man can be. My stories with women you would shock and horrify you.
Barney: Seriously, you can not imagine what I could do.
Barney: Mom!
Barney: I'll try.
Barney: Nope!
Barney: Hans Gruber, the villain class. At the end, it is trapped.This is the title character.
Barney: The teacher who is watching. This is the only one who passes the whole movie in a suit.
Barney: What is the title, Robin? Who among us has not shed a tear when his small red eye goes to the end and he can not kill these people? Sorry. The film...
Barney: They even try to help!
Barney: I'm not impressed by the talent here tonight. And more I drink, the less it is attractive. I'm a whiskey and Coke in the Cantina scene in Star Wars.
Barney: Absolutely not.
Barney: There is so much to learn. You are only victims of...the effect cheerleaders. Good question. The effect cheerleading is when a group of women air cannon, but only in groups. As with the cheerleaders. They look like cannon, but take them individually? Cod.
Barney: Look at it carefully. Individually.
Barney: And this, my friends, is "the effect cheerleaders." Also known as the paradox of a bridesmaid syndrome sorority, and for a brief moment in the 90s, the conspiracy of the Spice Girls.Scary Spice, indeed. (His phone rings) Barney Stinson. OK.Understood. Great, we remember.
Barney: Apparently, I'll be a father.
Barney: It's a girl I plugged in a few weeks ago. It is not certain.She sees the doctor tomorrow.
Barney: No part of Barney Stinson does not run at less than 110%. If one of my Michael Phelps escaped, he swims for gold. It's a nightmare. I want no children. How can want to have children without being mad?
Barney: God? It's me, Barney. Are you okay? I know we will not speak often, a bunch of girls said your name on my account. Great. But, God... If you could get out of there, I swear I'll never, never... never, never, never... (His phone rings and people have turned to him) Wait, man. Barney to the device.Really?
Barney: Good news! I'm not a father!
Barney: This is the best time of my life, Marshall. What I feel in having no children? I have never thought something like it as much. That's why I created a public holiday. Now, today is "Day of Non-fathers."
Barney: Why not? Everyone has one: mothers, fathers, soldiers. Why not a day for singles who like it?
Barney: Hi. How are the children?
Barney: That's it!
Barney: The No-Fathers Day is a success! Laraby Finklestein and help me celebrate. Matt. Mugs "Best Non-Father of the world." There... T-shirts "Who is your daddy? "Available on fetedesnonperes.com. Looking greeting cards.
Barney: Look at the illustration.
Barney: Because at the Non-Fathers Day, you have a Thai girl you a blowjob. Tope, puns!
Barney: My brother, lay your hand on the box tops and repeat after me. Me, the false name you give to women.
Barney: Swear to always choose the wet t-shirts to wet diapers.
Barney: Welcome to our fraternity of non-paternity. In is one of ours.
Barney: Guys, you did not... This is a picture of me without children. And with macaroni glued to the frame. Guys, I love it.
Barney: The last great idea for Fathers Day-No, a pregnancy test, but instead of a blue line, there is a small blue Barney who does that.
Barney: What are you talking? This is a good group of friends.
Barney: No, Ted. It works for girls.
Barney: Sock.
Barney: "And the cat is in the cradle and the silver spoon Little Boy Blue and the Man on the Moon. When are you going back home, Dad? I do not know when we're together then, son I know we will have a good time. "
Barney: No, it's like it'll change everything. Oh, Ted, you are so screwed.
Barney: Because I look good. Now focus, you and Marshall are roommates. You have an amazing apartment. Marshall and Lily just got engaged
Barney: So, you're not still gonna be his roommate when he gets married, are you? Someone's going to move out. So who's it gonna be?
Barney: You blew it, dude. Now that Lily's there, it's a whole new dynamic. They're edging you out.
Barney: Just keep your eyes open. That's all I'm saying, Ted. Little things are gonna be changing around that apartment.
Barney: Sort of on a date with her.
Barney: I found her online. I'm tired of the whole bar scene, the one-night hookups. I'm looking for a soul-mate, someone who I can love and cuddle, or so it says in my profile. (evil laugh) But this girl, she wants the same stuff and it's bumming me out. All right, Ted, call me from the hospital.
Barney: Well, stay tuned, I'm working on some stuff. But in the meantime, wish me luck.
Barney: Hello? Robin: Hi there, sexy.
Barney: Hello, Aunt Kathy, what's up?
Barney: An accident? Well, is Uncle Rudy gonna be OK? Robin: Aunt Kathy's got an itch that only you can scratch, big boy.
Barney: Oh God! Why did he think he could build his own helicopter?
Barney: Well, if he needs a transplant, he can have mine. I'll be right there.
Barney: See you guys later.
Barney: Told you. That Lily, she's a shrewd one.
Barney: Healthy communication? That's the worst idea ever. Look, you held off their first advance. That's good. Now it's time to counter-strike.
Barney: You gotta mark your territory, and I don't mean missing the toilet. You gotta do something big.
Barney: Bigger.
Barney: Katie's here. OK, real quick, last night, epiphany! I realized what the world of dating needs. Ready? A lemon law.
Barney: Exactly. From the moment the date begins you have five minutes to decide whether you're going to commit to an entire evening. And if you don't, it's no hard feelings just good night, thanks for playing, see you never. Huh? Huh? The lemon law, it's gonna be a thing, possibly starting right now.
Barney: Hi Katie. Barney.
Barney: Hm, yeah. Katie, you are about to be a part of history.
Barney: No, I'm a visionary. Lemon law, it's gonna be a thing!
Barney: No, wrong, lemon law is awesome.
Barney: OK, you're on a blind date, sitting across the table is that guy.
Barney: You really think it'll take more than five minutes to realize there will be no date number two?
Barney: Bad move, Scherbatsky.
Barney: Hi, have you met Robin?
Barney: (laughs) Time's running out, Scherbatsky. Last chance for the lemon law.
Barney: 4:56, 4:57, 4:58.
Barney: Say I'm right and this could all be over. This could be your call from the hospital.
Barney: So get this, I was on a date with this girl, Jackie.
Barney: What? You said she's fine. So, anyway, I was on date with this girl, Jackie.
Barney: Wow, Jackie, you make a really great first impression. I have a feeling that tonight you might end up being Jackie O.
Barney: It's out there, it's a thing. The lemon law is a thing. Damn, I should have called it Barney's law.
Barney: And to the lemon law.
Barney: Self-clink.
Barney: Dude, this is your chance.
Barney: Let me free, Marshall.
Barney: The Robin.
Barney: Tell people what?
Barney: Tell people what?
Barney: Tell people what?
Barney: Oh, okay. Tell people what?
Barney: Absolutely. Tell people what?
Barney: Hey. Barney Stinson. Lovely dress. I know, I'm sick of these things, too. It's like the same wedding over and over again. You're totally right. You want to dance? Great, see you out there. Tell people what?
Barney: Okay. (Barney leaves)
Barney: Tell people what?
Barney: Fine.
Barney: Oh, my God, just tell me!
Barney: What list?
Barney: Oh, like First Corinthians? That Bible verse? They do that at every wedding.
Barney: Anyway, guys, we're kind of in the middle of something, so if you could go bicker or share a tense, sexless silence or whatever married people do somewhere else, that'd be great.
Barney: Are those mini quiches? (Marshall and Lily run) Tell the secret.
Barney: Oh, right, that was you. I knew that was somebody I knew.
Barney: Maybe in your life-- I got a lot of stuff going on.
Barney: Oh, that's right, they moved that table back toward the kitchen, because that's where they're setting up a surprise chocolate fountain. Oh, no, I gave it away.(Lily and Marshall leave) So what was in the glass?
Barney: You said that already!
Barney: Don't get married.
Barney: An engagement ring?No. No, no, no, no, no, no. Ted, you cannot do
Barney: So what happened next?
Barney: Oh, my God. You guys broke up. You guys broke up. I can't believe it.
Barney: Run? Your strategy was run?
Barney: No es posible! Nobody moves to Argentina. The Argentinean peso has dropped two-thirds in five years, the government is opposed to free market reforms, and the railroad has been a mess since the breakup of Ferrocarriles Argentinos. I hooked up with an Argentinean exchange student in a Porta-John outside Yankee Stadium. Man, she was chatty.
Barney: You caught the bouquet?
Barney: That's when you run. Tell me you ran, Ted.
Barney: No.
Barney: No. Robin, you're not... No, say the story's not over.
Barney: Say the story's not over! Oh, God, this is the 12th most worried I've ever been that someone's pregnant.
Barney: Getting married, having kids. It's all a mistake. It's a horrible, horrible mistake.
Barney: You did break up.
Barney: You're not pregnant?
Barney: An-And Marshall and Lily don't know?
Barney: You guys okay?
Barney: I'm really sorry about you and Robin. I know I was always joking around about wanting you two to break up, but you were really good together.
Barney: The one. Oh, Ted, no. Do not tell me you're going to start searching for "the one" again. The only time I want to hear you saying "the one" is if it's followed by the word "hundredth." What up?
Barney: Really? 'Cause... you know, you've been in a relationship for a year. You're going to... be a little rusty.
Barney: I'm just saying... you're gonna need, need, need some help out there.
Barney: Ted?
Barney: Do you think... Do you think maybe you might... need a wingman again?
Barney: Yes! Yes! We're back. We are back. And Ted, my boy, it's going to be legend... Wait for it...
Barney: She said "doody."
Barney: Wait a minute! Today, we are gonna make Marshall laugh.
Barney: Ted, what's the one thing that always cracks him up?
Barney: Internet footage of a guy getting hit in the nuts, exactly! So we are gonna get our bro a four-star nad rattler. You search knees, feet, banisters, fire hydrants and diving boards, and I'll cover bats, rackets, hockey sticks, golf clubs and riding crops.
Barney: Uh... Claws, paws, talons, hooves, beaks and clenched monkey fists. We can do this!
Barney: Marshall Eriksen, you could use a laugh.
Barney: See? 'Cause, 'cause he got hit...
Barney: This next clip is entitled, "Guy Playing Bagpipes Gets Hit in the Nuts by Low-Flying Seagull"
Barney: Here he comes... Oh! Oh! 'Cause he gets hit right in the nuts.
Barney: Fall off. Shorts just fall right off.
Barney: Exactly. All those "famous last word" people supposedly said? They're all made up. Like that patriotic dude, Nathan Hale, from third-grade history?
Barney: You know what his real last words were?
Barney: True story.
Barney: So?
Barney: It doesn't. That's true.
Barney: Man, I always thought I had it rough not really knowing my dad, but... now I realize at least I'll never have to suffer like this. Our next video is called "German Shepherd Activates Tennis Ball Cannon While Fat Kid Sips Energy Drink."
Barney: And here's your phone number back.
Barney: Yeah. Showing videos of guys getting hit in the nuts wasn't going to do anything. I'm just stupid.
Barney: What we need to do is hit each other in the nuts.
Barney: She's right. Your dad was hilarious.
Barney: Hey, Mom. I'm ready to meet my dad.
Barney: Sick. Yeah. Dude. Working together is gonna be legen... Wait for it. I'll send you an inter-office memo with the rest 'cause we freakin' work together!
Barney: Oh, big news. The board finally settled on a site for the building.
Barney: Sure. What's up?
Barney: Not now, Trish!
Barney: Legendary! So, what's on your mind?
Barney: You're kidding me.
Barney: Snakes.
Barney: I don't recall saying "snakes". Ted, I know you love crappy old stuff no one cares about. But I'm gonna give you four words to live by: New is always better.
Barney: You know who's a million times hotter than the hottest girl I've ever slept with? Her okay-looking friend I haven't seen naked. Why? Because new is always better.
Barney: Everything.
Barney: Yeah. The first three barely mention the intricacies of intergalactic trade law.
Barney: Axl's really matured as a songwriter, Ted.
Barney: A glass of the J-Jumbo Jim's Grape Scotch sounds lovely. Lots of ice. New is always better, Ted! That's a rule. Just like bigger is always better!
Barney: How can you speak of such things?
Barney: How can you speak of such things?
Barney: I do not do that.
Barney: Boobs? Damn it. But... seriously. Boobs?
Barney: Speaking of disappointing weenies... Ted, tell them what you told me.
Barney: I still don't get this. Why, all of a sudden, out of nowhere, do you want to ruin... Wait a minute. Who's the girl?
Barney: Boobs?
Barney: Whose dream?
Barney: Oh, Ted, that's so romantic. I want to fill a pillowcase with dead batteries and beat you with it.
Barney: And you said...?
Barney: Hmm. Grape scotch. Not bad. Ted, you only think The Arcadian needs to be saved because some pretty girl thinks that. And seriously... Boobs?
Barney: And what did this "Zoey" say when she found out that you're the one tearing down her beloved Arcadian? That you, Ted Mosby, are the Architect Of Destruction?
Barney: This whole Arcadian thing is classic Mosby. Changing your personality to fit some girl.
Barney: Asian girls love them some Jews.
Barney: No. Technically, they were eggs.
Barney: I don't recall saying "eggs."
Barney: Ted, this woman is an anarchist, a sociopath, a lunatic, and for the love of God, boobs?!
Barney: Momentary grudging respect.
Barney: Ted, that is never gonna happen.
Barney: Simple. I rented the chair. The bunny was here already. That was lucky. I waited to do the dramatic swivel until I heard your key enter the door.
Barney: I had to. Now that you have no shot with the girl, you'll realize you never cared about the building, and everything can go back to normal.
Barney: Don't you get it, Ted? We're tearing down The Arcadian either way. It's a stupid old piece-of-crap, run-down, snake-infested dump!
Barney: Who mentioned snakes?! And stop shouting! You're scaring Cottontail.
Barney: You took longer to get here than I thought, we bonded, I'm keeping her. The point is, you now have a chance to design your own building. Dude, you can do whatever you want with it.
Barney: So you're back in?
